MR diagnosis of rotator cuff tears of the shoulder: value of using T2-weighted fat-saturated images.The purpose of this study was to compare the use of fat-saturated T2-weighted spin-echo MR imaging with that of conventional T2-weighted spin-echo MR imaging to detect full- and partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff of the shoulder, using arthroscopy as the standard for the diagnosis.Forty-nine consecutive patients with shoulder pain who had both MR imaging and arthroscopy of their affected shoulders were studied. The study group consisted of 10 patients with full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff, 20 with partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff, and 19 with intact rotator cuff tendons proved arthroscopically. All patients had T1-weighted, conventional T2-weighted, and fat-saturated T2-weighted MR images obtained in a plane slightly oblique to the coronal plane along the long axis of the supraspinous tendon. The images were divided into two sets, one including both T1-weighted and conventional T2-weighted images, the other including T1-weighted and fat-saturated T2-weighted images. Two musculoskeletal radiologists reviewed each set of MR images in a blinded fashion. The reviewers were asked to decide whether the rotator cuff showed a full-thickness tear, a partial-thickness tear, or no tear on each set of images. In the case of partial-thickness tears, the reviewers were asked to indicate which surface (bursal or joint) of the rotator cuff was affected. These data were correlated with the arthroscopic findings and with each other using McNemar and kappa analysis.Detection of full-thickness tears was excellent for both reviewers using either imaging technique. However, when the fat-saturated technique was used, the sensitivity increased significantly, from 80% to 100%. Detection of partial-thickness tears was poor with conventional spin-echo MR imaging (15%). Although significantly improved when fat saturation was used (35%), detection rates were still lower than rates reported in the literature. Identification of the torn surface of the rotator cuff was correct in 50% of cases in which partial-thickness tears were successfully identified. Fat saturation decreased the specificity of identification of both partial and full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff but significantly increased the specificity with which intact rotator cuffs were identified.Use of the fat-saturation technique improved detection of both full-thickness and partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff on MR images compared with standard spin-echo imaging techniques. Despite this improvement, detection of partial-thickness tears was poor with both techniques. Furthermore, correct identification of which surface of the rotator cuff was torn in patients with partial tears was nearly random.[Contribution of gradient-echo MRI in the study of subacromial pathology: correlation between surgery and arthrography].30 asymptomatic volunteer subjects and more than 400 patients with suspected rotator cuff lesions were examined by MRI at 0.5 T using T2*-PD weighted gradient echo (T2-GEI) sequences. Its superiority over T2 spin echo imaging was established in previous studies. The results were compared to those of surgery in 87 cases and arthrography in 233 cases (associated with CT arthrography in 70 cases). In the operated patients, T2-GEI and arthrography correctly diagnosed 49 complete ruptures (CR). T2-GEI was found to be superior to arthrography for defining the real extent of the rupture, the degree of tendon retraction and the local muscular trophicity, essential information to define the therapeutic indications. In contrast, among 22 lesions of the long biceps tendon, correctly demonstrated by arthrography or CT arthrography, 5 intracapsular lesions were not detected by MRI. MRI was able to detect 8 lesions of the anterior labrum associated with a CR not demonstrated by arthrography. Lastly, among the 18 cases of partial inferior rupture (PIR), 6 partial superficial ruptures and 14 cases of inflammatory changes, correctly diagnosed by MRI, only 8 PIR were also demonstrated by arthrography. For the non-operated patients investigated by the two modalities (146 cases), T2-GEI and arthrography were concordant in 43 cases. In contrast, 103 intact cuffs on arthrography showed features on T2-GEI compatible with tendinopathy without rupture, bursitis and degenerative changes. In the absence of very fine surgical or histological correlations for these small lesions, it is impossible, at the present time, to determine the real sensitivity and specificity of MRI.[Echography of the shoulder with the patient supine in the diagnosis of rotator cuff rupture].We report a new method for shoulder sonography (US): the patient lies supine and his/her arm is positioned so as to optimize tendon depiction. The supraspinatus tendon, which is the most frequently involved structure in rotator cuff tears, is studied with the patient's arm dropped, elbow extended and forearm prone. Our series consisted of 49 surgical patients (arthroscopy in 16 and open surgery in 33 patients): US sensitivity in tear depiction was 84.8%, specificity 100% and accuracy 89.8%. Medium-small tears appeared as transonic areas within tendon substance and/or tendon focal thinning. Large tears appeared as: (a) missed or markedly thinned rotator cuff, with deltoid muscle approximation to the humeral head surface, (b) plenty of fluid collected around bulky tear margins. The US images of 36 patients were then reviewed and the details discussed. A new sign was observed in medium-small tears, that is a sharp hyperechoic band encircling the humeral cartilage (the compass sign). In conclusion, we believe that US performed with the patient in supine recumbency is easier to perform and provides a bigger field of view of the supraspinatus tendon; it also permits to keep stretched rotator cuff, with consequent image quality improvement.Rotator cuff disease: assessment with MR arthrography versus standard MR imaging in 36 patients with arthroscopic confirmation.Standard proton-density- and T2-weighted magnetic resonance (MR) imaging and MR arthrography were used to depict rotator cuff disease in 36 shoulders in 36 patients; the findings were compared with arthroscopic findings in every patient. In 19 rotator cuffs normal at arthroscopy, MR arthrography revealed no tear in 16 patients, a partial tear in one patient, and a full-thickness tear in two patients. Standard proton-density- and T2-weighted images were normal in 15 of these patients and revealed a partial tear in two patients and a full-thickness tear in two patients. In 13 partial tears found at arthroscopy, MR arthrography showed a partial tear in six patients, no tear in five patients, and a full-thickness tear in two patients; standard MR imaging revealed a partial tear in one patient, no tear in 10 patients, and a full-thickness tear in two patients. All four full-thickness tears proved with arthroscopy were correctly diagnosed with both MR imaging methods. The main advantage of MR arthrography was better depiction of partial tears in the articular surface.[Possibilities of shoulder arthroscopy in comparison with magnetic resonance tomography and arthro-computerized tomography].In the last 15 years the methods of examination of the shoulder have intensively expounded. According to a well documented retrospective study we describe the value of the shoulder arthroscopy and its correlation to MRI and arthro-CT findings. MRI represents nowadays the best way of exploring rotator cuff lesions and of investigating an impingement syndrome. Associated with a contrast medium its ability to clear up an anterior or posterior shoulder instability is now superior to the arthro-CT's. The arthroscopy allows the dynamic exploration of the joint and can be used not only as a diagnostic but also as a therapeutic procedure.Subscapularis tendon tears: detection and grading at MR arthrography.To assess diagnostic accuracy in the detection and grading of subscapularis tendon lesions at magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography.MR arthrograms in 50 consecutive patients (29 with normal subscapularis tendons, 11 with a lesion in the cranial quarter, seven with a major tear but not complete detachment, three with complete detachment) with arthroscopic or surgical confirmation were evaluated independently by two radiologists. Diagnosis was established on findings from transverse and/or parasagittal images.With transverse images alone, sensitivity was 95%/100% (reader 1/reader 2); specificity was 55%/62%. With parasagittal images alone, sensitivity was 91%/91%; specificity was 76%/90%. With combined images, sensitivity was 91%/91%; specificity was 86%/79%. Interobserver agreement was substantial (kappa = 0.67). Forty-one of 50 (82%) grades for subscapularis abnormalities matched at MR imaging and surgery; nine mismatches differed by only one degree. Several signs were specific (90%-100%) but insensitive (29%-62%); these included leakage of contrast material onto the lesser tuberosity, fatty degeneration of the subscapularis muscle, and abnormality in the course of the long biceps tendon (luxation, subluxation).MR arthrography is accurate in the detection and grading of subscapularis tendon lesions. Specificity of findings on transverse images for this diagnosis can be improved by including indirect signs and findings on parasagittal images.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff.The authors suggest that sonography may be the best screening study for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Ultrasonographic analysis of shoulder rotator cuff tears.Seventy-nine shoulders suspected of rotator cuff tears were examined by ultrasonography (US) and forty-three received surgery. Long and short axis scans were performed and findings of each were separately classified according to a five-grade system, and the results were correlated with the actual extent of tear observed during surgery. Internal echogenicity and subacromial impingement were analyzed before and after surgery. A accuracy of US in detecting rotator cuff tears was analyzed. In addition, the correlation between cuff shape observed by US before surgery and actual shape observed during surgery was assessed. It was noted that cuff thinning and abnormalities in shape did not recover to normal after surgery. However, in the cases of discontinuities observed by US before surgery, US findings indicated that the torn cuff was anchored to the greater tuberosity and functional during active motion. Although post-operative US findings were not normal, clinical results were good in most cases. Sensitivity of US for detecting rotator cuff tear was 100% and specificity 94%. US is non-invasive, cost effective and allows the physician to examine the joint while it is in motion. Therefore, at this time, we use US as a screening method for detecting rotator cuff tears. Furthermore, US allows us to check for re-tears while the joint is in motion, which is essential for accurate diagnosis.Can isotropic fast gradient echo imaging be substituted for conventional T1 weighted sequences in shoulder MR arthrography at 3 Tesla?To assess the practical utility of isotropic shoulder imaging in patients undergoing MR arthrography. Isotropic shoulder imaging can be performed in less than three minutes with use of fast gradients.Two experienced musculoskeletal radiologists retrospectively interpreted MR images of the shoulder in 100 consecutive patients undergoing MR arthrography of the shoulder. All patients underwent MRI of the shoulder in oblique coronal, oblique sagittal, and axial planes on a 3.0-Tesla MRI system. All patients had conventional fast spin-echo T1-weighted imaging. All patients also had thin section (0.4 mm) isotropic spoiled gradient echo images performed. A total of 67 of the 100 patients underwent subsequent arthroscopy and results were compared with MR interpretations.There were 41 full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, nine partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (seven articular surface and two bursal surface), 21 superior labral, 18 anterior labral, and seven posterior labral tears demonstrated by consensus retrospective reading of the 100 shoulder MR exams. There was no difference in interpretation of the isotropic images as compared to the conventionally acquired images in the oblique coronal, oblique sagittal, and axial planes. Some patients had more than one finding on each exam. A total of 67 patients went on to arthroscopy. There were 41 full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, nine partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, 21 superior labral, 18 anterior labral, and seven posterior labral tears demonstrated on arthroscopy. All full- and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears seen at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MR reading. A total of 19 out of the 21 patients with superior labral anterior posterior (SLAP) tears at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MR reading. A total of 16 of the 18 anterior labral tears and six of the seven posterior labral tears seen at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MR reading. Some of the 67 patients had more than one finding on arthroscopy.Isotropic imaging of the shoulder is practical in clinical imaging when performed with use of fast gradients on a 3-Tesla system. Isotropic imaging provides the same clinical information as conventional imaging and can be acquired in less than three minutes.[Magnetic resonance of the shoulder: technic, anatomy ana clinical results].MR imaging was employed in 232 patients with traumatic or degenerative lesions of the shoulder. MR diagnosis was compared with arthrotomic findings in 19 cases, and with arthroscopic results in 3 cases. MR technique is here presented and the choice of scanning planes is discussed, together with the sequences of image acquisition and with the features of the surface coil employed. Axial, sagittal, and coronal scans were used in all cases. Both sagittal and coronal planes were performed obliquely on the basis of precise anatomical structures. T1-weighted sequences were used for they are reliable in locating the various anatomical structures and efficient in defining the several different pathologic conditions. The role of T2-weighted sequences was complementary, and they were employed in selected cases only. A surface coil is presented with a particular configuration of easy clinical use and with such technical features as to allow reduced fields to be imaged, with good spatial resolution. MR imaging could demonstrate with equal accuracy both skeletal-cartilage components and capsulo-ligamentous structures, thus defining associated lesions and small tears. In both degenerative and traumatic lesions of the rotator cuff, MR imaging showed both extent and entity of the pathologic process, with high accuracy in defining the impingement syndrome. MR imaging allowed the depiction of the anterior and posterior glenoid labra, even without intraarticular contrast media. Moreover, MR imaging made it possible to recognize both fractures and degenerative processes within the glenoid labrum on the basis of their signal intensities. This preliminary experience allows the authors to conclude that MR imaging is an accurate and non-invasive diagnostic method for the study of traumatic lesions and of degenerative changes of the shoulder.[Ultrasound diagnosis of the rotator cuff].Shoulder sonography is a well-established and standardized method to evaluate the status of the rotator cuff, the long head of the biceps, and the subacromial and subdeltoid bursae. Using high-frequency linear probes, the sensitivity in detecting total tears sized 0.5 cm and greater is > 90% and in detecting partial thickness tears of at least one-third of the cuff substance > 75% when using the dual-criteria standard. Ultrasound achieves comparable or better results than native magnetic resonance tomography at far less cost. False results can be excluded in the majority of cases by strict adherence to a dual-criteria model. The ability to display the joint's soft tissue structures in real time is unique up to now. The limits of sonography are (1) in the estimation of tear size in global tears as retraction of tendon stumps under the acromion cannot be visualized and (2) in the evaluation of status of rotator cuff muscles since volumetric information about atrophy can be gained by ultrasonography, but a differentiation between simple atrophy and fatty degeneration is not possible.MR imaging of rotator cuff tendon tears: comparison of T2*-weighted gradient-echo and conventional dual-echo sequences.Although MR imaging evaluation of the rotator cuff is usually done with proton density- and T2-weighted spin-echo techniques, interest also exists in T2*-weighted gradient-recalled echo techniques. The shorter scan times of T2*-weighted sequences can be used to increase the number of signal averages and thus improve the signal-to-noise ratio. Our purpose in this study was to compare the sensitivity and specificity of oblique coronal T2*-weighted MR image interpretations with conventional dual-echo T2-weighted MR image interpretations when diagnosing rotator cuff tears.Forty-seven consecutive patients who underwent both MR imaging and shoulder arthroscopy were included in this study. The MR examination included both a 7 min 20 sec acquisition time proton density- and T2-weighted oblique coronal sequence and a 7 min 5 sec T2*-weighted oblique coronal sequence. The oblique coronal dual-echo T2-weighted images were evaluated by two of the authors independently, who were unaware of the arthroscopic findings. Each of the two observers graded each cuff as being intact, having a partial-thickness tear, or having a full-thickness tear. After a 3-week interval, each of the two observers then interpreted the T2*-weighted oblique coronal MR images in the same manner. Sensitivity and specificity for the two sets of interpretations were calculated in terms of the ability of the observers to use the two sequences to distinguish an intact cuff from a rotator cuff tear and to distinguish a partial-thickness cuff tear from an intact cuff or full-thickness tear. The results were then compared using Student's t test calculations.For distinguishing an intact cuff from a torn cuff, the sensitivity of the observers' interpretations was lower for the T2*-weighted images than for the conventional dual-echo T2-weighted images. The specificity also decreased with interpretation of the T2*-weighted images for one observer and was unchanged for the second observer. For distinguishing a partial-thickness cuff tear from a non-partial-thickness cuff tear (intact or full-thickness tear), the sensitivity and specificity of both observers decreased with interpretations of the T2*-weighted images when compared with the conventional dual-echo T2-weighted images. The results did not reach statistical significance.In this small study evaluating the ability of observers to diagnose rotator cuff tears on oblique coronal MR images only, interpretations of T2*-weighted images tended to be less sensitive and specific than interpretations of standard dual-echo T2-weighted images.3-T MRI of the shoulder: is MR arthrography necessary?The purpose of this study is to report the diagnostic sensitivity of 3-T conventional MRI versus MR arthrography of the shoulder in the same patient population.One hundred fifty consecutive conventional shoulder MRI and MR arthrography examinations performed on patients 50 years or younger who subsequently underwent arthroscopy were reviewed retrospectively by consensus reading by two musculoskeletal radiologists. All patients selected for arthroscopy had abnormal findings on clinical examination and MRI or MR arthrography. All 150 patients were referred from one orthopedic group. All patients consented to undergo both MRI and MR arthrography. None had undergone prior shoulder surgery. Full- or partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, superior labral anterior-to-posterior (SLAP) tears, and anterior or posterior labral tears were assessed.Three full-thickness and nine partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, seven SLAP tears, six anterior labral tears, and two posterior labral tears were seen on MR arthrography but not on conventional MRI. All additional MR arthrography findings were confirmed at arthroscopy. On conventional MRI, sensitivities and specificities compared with arthroscopy were as follows: anterior labral tear, 83% sensitivity and 100% specificity; posterior labral tear, 84% and 100%; SLAP tear, 83% and 99%; supraspinatus tendon tear, 92% and 100%; partial-thickness articular surface tear, 68% and 100%; and partial-thickness bursal surface tear, 84% and 100%. On MR arthrography, sensitivities and specificities compared with arthroscopy were as follows: anterior labral tear, 98% sensitivity and 100% specificity; posterior labral tear, 95% and 100%; SLAP tear, 98% and 99%; supraspinatus tendon tear, 100% and 100%; partial-thickness articular surface tear, 97% and 100%; and partial-thickness bursal surface tear, 84% and 100%. MR arthrography showed a statistical improvement in sensitivity (p<0.05) for detection of partial-thickness articular surface supraspinatus tears, anterior labral tears, and SLAP tears at 3 T.In this series, MR arthrography showed statistically significant increased sensitivity for detection of partial-thickness articular surface supraspinatus tears, anterior labral tears, and SLAP tears compared with conventional MRI at 3 T. On the basis of the above findings, we perform 3-T MR arthrography on patients for whom anterior labral tears, SLAP tears, and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears are suspected clinically.[Diagnostic imaging of the shoulder joint in impingement].Site and size of rotator-cuff tear. Findings at ultrasound, double-contrast arthrography, and computed tomography arthrography with surgical correlation.The authors discuss findings of ultrasound (US), double-contrast arthrography (AG), and contrast computed tomography arthrography (CTA) in assessing precise site and size of rotator-cuff tears.Eighty-six patients were compared prospectively in a masked fashion; the results of surgery were studied in 25 patients and the results of arthroscopy were studied in 61 patients.Ultrasound detected 80% (8 of 10) of the partial-thickness tears and 90% (18 of 20) of the full-thickness tears. Arthrography and CTA had identical results with 70% sensitivity (7 of 10) in partial-thickness tears; AG showed 90% (18 of 20) and CTA 95% (19 of 20) of the full-thickness tears. Arthrography had two false-positive findings, and US and CTA had one each. The size of a tear could be evaluated correctly with AG in 30% (9 of 30), with US in 70% (21 of 30) and with CTA in 76% (23 of 30). More extensive tears were encountered at US than had been found at surgery in 2% (2 of 86) and less extensive tears in 9% (8 of 86); CTA depicted more extensive tears in 2% (2 of 86) and less extensive tears in 6% (6 of 86), respectively. The site of a tear could be evaluated with AG in 30% (9 of 30); US and CTA showed the site correctly in every patient in which the tear could be diagnosed.Ultrasound and CTA were equally accurate in diagnosing and evaluating the size and site of rotator-cuff tears. Double-contrast AG was less accurate in the diagnosis of tears and the size and site of tears clearly could be assessed worse.Rotator cuff lesions: signal patterns at MR imaging.The signal intensity patterns of rotator cuff lesions at magnetic resonance (MR) imaging were evaluated in 80 patients who had surgical correlation and in 13 asymptomatic individuals (14 shoulders). Six cadaver shoulders were examined with MR, and histologic correlation was obtained in four. All studies were performed at 1.5 T with a flexible circular surface coil. The accuracy of MR imaging in detection of full-thickness cuff tears (31 patients) was 0.95 and of partial thickness tears (16 patients), 0.84. The most common and accurate pattern for full-thickness cuff tears (22 of 31 tears) was a region of intense signal seen on T2-weighted images. Less often the torn region consisted of an extremely degenerated and attenuated tendon with moderate signal intensity or was obscured by low-signal-intensity scar. The intense signal pattern on T2-weighted images was also accurate, although a less common finding (seven of 16 cases), in the diagnosis of partial tears. Tendinitis was recognized as focal or diffuse regions of increased signal intensity or a nonhomogeneous pattern of increased signal often associated with tendinous enlargement. In some patients, manifestations of subacromial-subdeltoid bursitis was present. Tendon degeneration was also manifested as regions of increased signal intensity. Some similarity and overlap of signal patterns of partial interstitial tears, tendinitis, and tendon degeneration are observed.Ultrasound compared with magnetic resonance imaging for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears: a critically appraised topic.Is shoulder arthrography considered an acceptable alternative to MR imaging in the evaluation of rotator cuff tears?Assessment of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum using an extremity MR system: MR results compared to surgical findings from a multi-center study.To conduct a multi-center assessment of the use of a 0.2-T, extremity MR system (E-scan; General Electric Lunar Corp. and Esaote, Genoa, Italy) for identifying tears of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum.A retrospective study was performed involving 160 patients (age range, 15-84 years old) from five facilities in the United States, comparing shoulder MR imaging to surgical findings. MR imaging of the shoulder was conducted as follows: shoulder coil; T1-weighted spin echo, coronal-oblique and axial images; short Tau inversion recovery (STIR), coronal-oblique images and axial images; and T2-weighted spin echo, coronal-oblique and sagittal-oblique images. The MR examinations were interpreted in an independent, prospective manner by two radiologists with extensive musculoskeletal MRI experience. Arthroscopic (N = 103) or open surgical (N = 57) procedures were performed within a mean of 53 days after MR imaging.Surgical findings demonstrated rotator cuff tears in 131 patients and labral tears in 60 patients. For the rotator cuff, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 90%, 93%, 98%, and 68%, respectively. For the labrum, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 55%, 100%, 100%, and 82%, respectively.There was good agreement when MR results obtained using the extremity MR system were compared to surgical findings for identifying rotator cuff tears, while the sensitivity of MR imaging for determining labral tears was relatively poor. Nevertheless, these findings were comparable to those reported in the peer-reviewed literature for MR systems operating at mid-, and high-field-strengths.Supraspinatus tendon tears: comparison of US and MR arthrography with surgical correlation.The aim of this study was to compare the diagnostic reliability of US with MR arthrography in diagnosing supraspinatus tendon tears. Surgical findings were used as the gold standard in detecting tears. A total of 44 patients were assessed with transverse and longitudinal US scans with respect to the long axis of the rotator cuff tendons and then examined with MR arthrography. This technique involved free-hand injection of contrast medium into the shoulder joint. At surgery 20 incomplete and 24 complete tears were observed. Ultrasound offered good results for the large tears, but its sensitivity decreased proportionally with the size of the tears. Magnetic resonance arthrography correctly diagnosed 43 tears, whereas only one false-negative diagnosis of tendinosis was made for a partial tear on the bursal side. Since it improves the diagnosis of small tears, MR arthrography must be performed on all patients for whom surgical repair is necessary in order to restore normal functions.The clinical utility of ultrasonography for rotator cuff disease, shoulder impingement syndrome and subacromial bursitis.Periarticular shoulder disorders are common in clinical practice, and diagnosis is often difficult. Medicare statistics indicate that between 2001 and 2006 the use of diagnostic shoulder ultrasonography increased significantly. Rotator cuff disease, shoulder impingement syndrome and subacromial bursitis are among the most common diagnoses reported on shoulder ultrasonography. Shoulder ultrasonography is useful in the diagnosis of full thickness tears, but its utility for other rotator cuff disorders, shoulder impingement syndrome and subacromial bursitis is less well established.Association of sonographically detected subacromial/subdeltoid bursal effusion and intraarticular fluid with rotator cuff tear.Although an association between sonographically detected joint fluid and rotator cuff disease has been reported, the significance of sonographically detected subacromial/subdeltoid bursal effusion has not been studied. We examined a group of patients who had shoulder sonography and surgery to determine the association between bursal and joint effusion and surgically proved tears of the rotator cuff.We retrospectively reviewed the preoperative shoulder sonography reports of 163 patients for the presence of fluid within the subacromial/subdeltoid bursa or glenohumeral joint. Surgical reports were obtained to determine the status of the rotator cuff. The sonographic reports of 232 asymptomatic shoulders were also reviewed to determine the prevalence of fluid within the subacromial/subdeltoid bursa or the glenohumeral joint.Sixty-seven (41%) of the 163 patients had a joint effusion, bursal fluid, or both. Joint effusion alone was seen in 35 patients. Fourteen of these had a normal rotator cuff at surgery, and 21 had a rotator cuff tear (sensitivity, 22%; specificity, 79%; positive predictive value, 60%). Bursal fluid alone was seen in 10 patients, seven of whom had a rotator cuff tear (sensitivity, 7%; specificity, 96%; positive predictive value, 70%). In 22 patients, fluid was seen in both the bursa and the joint; 21 had surgically proved rotator cuff tears (sensitivity, 22%; specificity, 99%; positive predictive value, 95%). Of the 232 asymptomatic shoulders, 16 (6.9%) had isolated joint effusions, eight (3.4%) had isolated bursal effusions, and four (1.7%) had both joint and bursal effusions.The sonographic finding of intraarticular fluid alone (without bursal fluid) has both a low sensitivity and a low specificity for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. However, the finding of fluid in the subacromial/subdeltoid bursa, especially when combined with a joint effusion, is highly specific and has a high positive predictive value for associated rotator cuff tears. Sonographically detected fluid in both the joint and the bursa is an uncommon finding in asymptomatic shoulders. The sonographic observation of fluid in the subacromial bursa, either isolated or combined with a joint effusion, should prompt a careful evaluation of the supraspinatus tendon for tear.[Chronic shoulder pain. Ultrasonography versus surgery].This work was aimed at investigating US reliability in the diagnosis of rotator cuff lesions. A series of 554 patients with a chronically painful shoulder submitted to US was retrospectively reviewed to search for any possible rotator cuff lesion. US demonstrated total or partial cuff tears in 82 potentially surgical patients (14.8%) Then, in this group, the occurrence of every US sign was investigated. Cuff disappearance was observed in 42 patients (51.2%), convexity loss in 20 (24.4%), cuff thinning in 17 (20.75%) and focal discontinuity in 3 patients only (3.7%). In the second part of the study, we considered only 33 surgical patients. Surgery confirmed cuff tears in 30 patients (90.9%), whereas in 3 false-positive patients US had overestimated focal hyperechoic areas and tendon thinning. Thus, our study confirms the almost absolute sensitivity of some US signs of cuff lesions, e.g., cuff disappearance and convexity loss, in the screening of the patients with a chronically painful shoulder. On the contrary, when focal hyperechoic lesions or tendon thinning are present and US poorly demonstrates them, potentially surgical patients must be submitted to MRI.Indirect MR arthrography of the shoulder in detection of rotator cuff ruptures.The aim of this study was to compare the efficacy of indirect MR arthrography images obtained following intravenous contrast injection and conventional MR imaging in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Twenty-four patients with clinically suspected rotator cuff disease were examined. Conventional MR images and post-contrast indirect MR arthrography images were obtained. All images were evaluated in a blinded fashion by two musculoskeletal radiologist. Results were than analyzed depending on surgical output. The correlation coefficient (Spearman rank correlation test) and the kappa values for agreement between surgery and imaging techniques were calculated. The correlation coefficients between indirect MR arthrography and surgery for reader 1 and reader 2 were 0.9137 and 0.9773, respectively. Whereas the agreement between conventional MR imaging and surgery was moderate (n = 0.383-0.571), the agreement between indirect MR arthrography and surgery was excellent (n = 0.873-0.936). We suggest the use of indirect MR arthrography technique when conventional MR images are equivocal in diagnosis of rotator cuff disease.Shoulder Ultrasound vs MRI for rotator cuff pathology.Rotator cuff tears: assessment with MR arthrography in 275 patients with arthroscopic correlation.We assessed the diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography in the diagnosis of articular-sided partial-thickness and full-thickness rotator cuff tears in a large symptomatic population. MR arthrograms obtained in 275 patients including a study group of 139 patients with rotator cuff tears proved by arthroscopy and a control group of 136 patients with arthroscopically intact rotator cuff tendons were reviewed in random order. MR imaging was performed on a 1.0 T system (Magnetom Expert, Siemens). MR arthrograms were analyzed by two radiologists in consensus for articular-sided partial-thickness and full-thickness tears of the supraspinatus, infraspinatus, and subscapularis tendons. At arthroscopy, 197 rotator cuff tears were diagnosed, including 105 partial-thickness (93 supraspinatus, nine infraspinatus, three subscapularis) and 92 full-thickness (43 supraspinatus, 20 infraspinatus, 29 subscapularis) tendon tears. For full-thickness tears, sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 96%, 99%, and 98%, respectively, and for partial tears 80%, 97%, and 95%, respectively. False negative and positive assessments in the diagnosis of articular-sided partial-thickness tears were predominantly [78% (35/45)] observed with small articular-sided (Ellman grade1) tendon tears. MR arthrography is highly accurate in the diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and is accurate in the diagnosis of articular-sided partial-thickness tears. Limitations in the diagnosis of partial-thickness tears are mainly restricted to small articular-sided tears (Ellman grade 1) due to difficulties in differentiation between fiber tearing, tendinitis, synovitic changes, and superficial fraying at tendon margins.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff: surgical correlation.Rotator cuff tears are a common orthopedic problem. The portions of the cuff most commonly torn are accessible to sonographic examination with appropriate positioning of the shoulder. This study was undertaken to correlate the sonographic appearance of the pathologic rotator cuff with findings at the time of surgical repair. Rotator cuff tears are readily seen with high-resolution real-time sonography. Sonography can demonstrate tears not demonstrated arthrographically. In the appropriate clinical setting arthrography may not be necessary if the sonogram demonstrates characteristic findings.Rotator cuff tears: diagnostic performance of MR imaging.To determine the diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in the evaluation of suspected rotator cuff tears, eight asymptomatic volunteers and 32 patients with rotator cuff tendonopathy who underwent surgery were examined with MR imaging. Twenty-four of these patients also underwent contrast arthrography. The ability of MR imaging to depict the size of cuff tears and the quality of torn tendon edges was also evaluated. The MR imaging and arthrographic studies were reviewed without knowledge of surgical results or of the other studies. A scoring system was developed and a score assigned to each patient's MR study. The sensitivity of MR imaging for all tears (partial and full thickness) was 0.91, and the specificity was 0.88; whereas the sensitivity and specificity of arthrography were each 0.71. The scoring system improved the sensitivity to 1.0 and the specificity to 0.92. Linear regression analysis showed excellent correlation between preoperative assessment of the size of rotator cuff tears and measurement at surgery (r = .95).Evaluation of the painful shoulder. A prospective comparison of magnetic resonance imaging, computerized tomographic arthrography, ultrasonography, and operative findings.Twenty-one patients who had had pain in the shoulder for more than three months were evaluated with ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging followed by computerized tomographic arthrography. The results of the imaging studies were then compared with the operative findings. Magnetic resonance imaging was found to be the most useful modality for establishment of the etiology of pain in the shoulder due to disease of the rotator cuff, instability associated with abnormality of the glenoid labrum, subacromial impingement, stenosis of the coracoacromial arch, and osteoarthrosis of either the glenohumeral or the acromioclavicular joint. The accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging was found to depend on both the operator and the technique and was decreased in extremely obese patients, due to difficulties in positioning, and in patients who had had a previous operation. Magnetic resonance imaging was more accurate than either computerized tomographic arthrography or ultrasonography in identifying partial-thickness tears (intrasubstance changes in the rotator cuff). Magnetic resonance imaging provided the same level of accuracy as computerized tomographic arthrography in the detection of abnormalities of the glenoid labrum.[Ultrasonography of the tendons of the rotator cuffs of the shoulder].After a short review of the use of ultrasonography to study shoulder rotator tendons, the technique of the investigation is described, as well as the main landmarks, findings indicative of complete rotator cuff tear, and limitations of ultrasonography in this indication. A number of issues concerning the preoperative workup are discussed. Results in a prospective study of 100 patients are reported. Findings upon ultrasonography, arthrography, and surgical exploration in these patients are analyzed comparatively. Sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tear (RCT) were 95% and 100%, respectively. These data show that ultrasonography is a reliable investigation for confirming, detecting, and evaluating RCT, although extensive experience with the technique is required.[Ultrasound--a good alternative to MR in shoulder problems].Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder joint.Because the shoulder is the most mobile joint in the body, it is naturally predisposed to several disorders. The most commonly encountered disorders requiring diagnostic imaging are rotator cuff disease and glenohumeral instability. Plain film radiography and arthrography have for many years been the mainstays of shoulder imaging. CT added a third dimension to shoulder imaging, improving its sensitivity with respect to glenoid labral pathology. Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff showed early promise in noninvasive evaluation of cuff tears, but it did not gain universal acceptance because of various negative factors, including inadequate visualization of the cuff, poor results regarding partial tears, and most importantly, operator dependency. The development of MR imaging afforded the radiologist improved comprehensive visualization of the shoulder joint in a noninvasive manner.[Diagnosis of rotator cuff injury].Magnetic resonance-imaging studies of the shoulder. Diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff.[Arthroscopy and MRT of the shoulder--a comparative retrospective analysis].MR Imaging is proving to an effective means for evaluating the shoulder. The use of a surface coil and high resolution scanning techniques have allowed detailed analysis of normal anatomy and suspected pathology of the shoulder. On the other way arthroscopic inspection provides a more extensive visualization of the joint in different positions. 31 patients, well documented, were studied with MR Imaging and correlated with findings in arthroscopy and open revision in some cases. The MR studies were retrospective interpreted without the knowledge of the results of other diagnostic procedures. For the evaluation of rotator cuff tears MRI proved to have a sensitivity of 83.3% and an accuracy of 90.3%. When Arthroscopy was correlated with open revision the sensitivity was 61.8% and the accuracy 78%. Labral pathology and Hill-Sachs lesions will be better evaluated in arthroscopy as in MRI (sensitivity of arthroscopy 100% and of MRI 69%, accuracy of arthroscopy 100% and of MRI 87.1%). With the high resolution scanning technique and a surface coil MRI has been shown to be useful in the evaluation of rotator cuff tears and impingement syndrome but not in diagnosis of labral pathology and Hill-Sachs lesions.Acute traumatic tears of the rotator cuff: value of sonography.To determine the value of sonography in the evaluation of acute traumatic tears of the rotator cuff.Preoperative sonography was performed within 3 weeks of trauma in 184 patients, 98 of whom underwent surgery. The rotator cuff tears were preoperatively classified as partial-thickness tears or as small, large, or massive full-thickness tears. Sonographic findings were correlated with surgical findings (n = 70) and arthroscopic inspection (n = 28).Adequate examination was possible in 163 (88%) of 184 patients. Sonography demonstrated 42 (91%) of 46 full-thickness tears and seven (78%) of nine partial-thickness tears. Sonography showed more extensive tears than were found at surgery in four (4%) of 98 patients and less extensive tears in seven (7%) of 98 patients. Sonographic patterns were a defect (31 [63%] of 49 tears), focal thinning (10 [21%] of 49 tears), and nonvisualization (eight [16%] of 49 tears).Sonography is useful in the evaluation of acute shoulder trauma when a rotator cuff tear is suspected and findings at plain radiography are negative.Magnetic resonance imaging of rotator cuff lesions.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in rotator cuff diseases. Forty consecutive patients studied by MRI from September 1990 to September 1992 were included in the study. MRI was performed on a 1.5 tesla MR scanner. Each MRI study was reviewed by two radiologists experienced in rotator cuff tendons. The MRI finding was compared with the surgical result. MRI sensitivity for all tears (partial and complete) was 1.0 (22/22), specificity 0.89 (16/18), accuracy rate 0.95 (38/40), and the predictive value 0.92 (22/24). Signal changes of the rotator cuff tendon (primary signs) were the most reliable criteria in diagnosis of the tear. Changes of subacromial and subdeltoid fat planes and bursa (secondary signs) were complimentary when primary signs were indeterminant. The direction of the long axis of abnormal signal intensity in the rotator cuff tendon may be a good indicator when differentiating tears from tendinitis. We conclude that MRI shows excellent performance in the determination of the presence or absence of a rotator cuff tear.Not-so-fast MR imaging of the rotator cuff.[Lesions of the rotatory cuff: diagnostic validity of echography. Surgical findings].Ultrasonography is the method of choice in the study of rotator cuff tears, a very frequent event especially as the final outcome of the impingement syndrome. The authors investigated US sensitivity with the retrospective review of 20 surgical patients with a chronically painful shoulder. US sensitivity was 85%, with 15% false-negative results. Seventeen true-positive cases were restudied for the three main US signs of cuff tear: marked tendon thinning was observed in 64.7% of cases, cuff disappearance in 23.5% and focal discontinuity in 11.8%. This retrospective study confirms that, whenever US shows a cuff tear, the diagnosis can be made, while when US findings are negative or questionable, but clinics are positive, MRI must be performed.Diagnostic ultrasound of the shoulder--a method for experts only? Results from an orthopedic surgeon with relative inexpensive compared to operative findings.Diagnostic ultrasound examination of the shoulder is generally considered to require long experience. We examined the results of an orthopedic surgeon with little experience of ultrasound.A relatively inexperienced examiner performed preoperative ultrasound scanning of 79 patients with symptoms from the rotator cuff and/or the long head of the biceps muscle. Tears of the rotator cuff and rupture or dislocation of the long head of the biceps muscle were the positive findings of interest. Results were compared to operative findings.In 66 of 79 shoulders, ultrasonographic rotator cuff findings were confirmed at surgery (accuracy 84%). 20 of 26 full-thickness tears were diagnosed correctly. 6 of 7 partial-thickness tears were overlooked. Ultrasound was false positive in 1 case. For the long head of the biceps muscle, all 8 cases of dislocation or rupture of the tendon were diagnosed but differentiation between the two conditions was not possible in 2 cases.Our results may encourage orthopedic surgeons to start using ultrasound as a diagnostic technique for full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff and for pathology in the long head of the biceps muscle.Sonography of full-thickness supraspinatus tears: comparison of patient positioning technique with surgical correlation.Sonography has become a popular technique for the assessment of musculoskeletal disorders. Patient positioning is crucial to a thorough and accurate assessment of rotator cuff tendons. Two positions, the Crass and modified Crass, have been routinely used in the research and clinical settings to examine the supraspinatus tendon. Our study was a prospective trial to determine whether the Crass or the modified Crass position affords the most accurate measure of supraspinatus tears when compared with surgical findings.Twenty-one patients with full-thickness supraspinatus tears underwent shoulder sonography in both the Crass and the modified Crass positions. Measurements of supraspinatus tears were performed in the sagittal and transverse dimensions. Patients subsequently underwent either arthroscopic or open supraspinatus repair. Intraoperative measurements were made in two dimensions and were compared with sonographic findings.Sonography had 100% specificity in detecting full-thickness supraspinatus tears. No statistically significant difference was seen between the size of supraspinatus tears in the Crass and modified Crass positions and surgical findings in the transverse plane (p = 0.55 and 0.61, respectively). In the sagittal dimension, no statistically significant difference was seen between surgical findings and the Crass position (p = 0.14); however, a difference existed when the modified Crass position was used (p = 0.03).Sonography reliably detects and quantifies supraspinatus tears. Both the Crass and the modified Crass positions reflected the true size of supraspinatus tears in the transverse plane. In the sagittal plane, the Crass position is the more useful to quantify supraspinatus tears because the modified Crass position overestimates the size of such tears.Correlation between MRI and operative findings of the rotator cuff tear.Rotator cuff disease is one of the most common causes of shoulder pain. Various methods have been used to evaluate this problem. In this study, we determine the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the shoulder in diagnosing the rotator cuff tear based on operative findings. Ten patients with a painful shoulder requiring operation received an MRI of the shoulder before surgery. A GE 1.5 Tesla MR scanner with a five-inch planar surface coil was applied and the diagnosis was confirmed by an experienced radiologist in the field of musculoskeletal MRI. All patients underwent surgery within two weeks of MRI examination. Nine of the 10 patients were shown to have rotator cuff tear by MRI. Among the nine MRI positive patients, eight were proven to have such lesions on operation (two massive tears, four moderate complete tears, and two bursal side tears). One false-positive result was found to be an adhesive capsulitis and supraspinatus tendinitis at operation. The remaining case, diagnosed as tendinitis by MRI, turned out to be a small incomplete tear on operation. Therefore, the sensitivity of MRI for rotator cuff tear in this study was 0.89. The overall accuracy was 80%. We concluded that MRI has a high accuracy in detecting the rotator cuff tear. False-positive and false-negative diagnoses were attributed to a severe tendinitis and an incomplete tear, respectively.[Shoulder injuries in overhead athletes: utility of MR arthrography].The goal of this work was to assess the accuracy of the MR-Arthrografie in the evaluation of over head athletes injuries in comparison with athroscopy.In 29 patients (middle age: 30 years, 21 male, 8 female, age 16 - 53 years) with persistent pain after conservative therapy an Arthro-MRI with intraarticular application of gadolinum was performed prior to arthroscopic surgery. The MRI was retrospectivly analysed of three examiners independently from one another. The result were compared to the results of the Arthroscopy. Interrater Reliability was calculated by using of Cohens Kappa.The MR-Arthrography could demonstrate 8 of 9 (88.9 %) partial tears of he rotator cuff. All SLAP (Superiores Labrum from Anterior to Posterior) Lesions as well as all bankart type Lesions were recognized through the MR-Arthrography. However, dependent upon the experience of the examiner in a span between 33.3 % (fellow radiologist) and 93.3 % (consultant radiologist). We found a high agreement between consultant radiologist and shoulder surgeon with Kappa of 0.79 for rotator cuff tear-, 0.86 for Bankart- and 0.82 for SLAP-Lsionen.Full-thickness and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears: value of US signs in diagnosis.To determine which US signs are important in the diagnosis of a surgically identifiable supraspinatus tendon tear.Fifty consecutive ultrasonographic (US) studies of the shoulder in patients who underwent arthroscopic follow-up were retrospectively reviewed by a musculoskeletal radiologist. US images of the supraspinatus tendon were evaluated for tendon nonvisualization, abnormal tendon echogenicity, tendon thinning, greater tuberosity cortical irregularity, cartilage interface sign, joint fluid, and subacromial-subdeltoid bursal fluid. US findings were compared with arthroscopic results. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were calculated for each US sign in the diagnosis of full-thickness tendon tear and again for any type of supraspinatus tendon tear.Arthroscopy revealed 21 full-thickness tears, five bursal surface partial-thickness tears, 10 articular surface partial-thickness tears, and 14 patients without tear of the supraspinatus tendon. The presence of greater tuberosity cortical irregularity and joint fluid was most important in the diagnosis of full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tear (sensitivity, 60%; specificity, 100%; positive predictive value, 100%; negative predictive value, 78%; accuracy, 84%). For diagnosis of any type of supraspinatus tendon tear (partial or full thickness), tendon nonvisualization, greater tuberosity cortical irregularity, and cartilage interface sign are most important, although a combination of signs did not improve accuracy.Secondary US signs, such as greater tuberosity cortical irregularity and joint fluid, are most valuable in the diagnosis of supraspinatus tendon tear.Imaging evaluation of rotator cuff tears.Diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance imaging for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears using supplemental images in the oblique sagittal plane.The authors evaluated the diagnostic utility of supplemental imaging in the oblique sagittal (OS) plane for the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Two radiologists with varying levels of MRI experience blindly reviewed shoulder MR examinations of 50 patients for rotator cuff tears. Shoulder examinations were interpreted twice, initially using only double-echo spin-echo images obtained in the oblique coronal (OC) plane and later using double-echo spin-echo images obtained in the both the OC and OS planes. Tears were characterized according to size, location, and extent, and levels of diagnostic confidence were evaluated.Sensitivity and specificity of MR for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tear was 85% and 80%, respectively, with the OC series increasing to 95% and 93%, respectively with OCOS scans. However, these increases were not statistically significant. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves suggest a trend toward increased diagnostic confidence when supplemental OS scans are available, especially for the less experienced reader. Characterization of rotator cuff tears was not improved with additional OS images.Supplemental OS scans did not demonstrate a definite improvement in diagnostic accuracy for rotator cuff tears compared to OC scans alone. Estimations based on sample size calculations indicate that a much larger population of patients would be needed to show a statistically significant difference.MR imaging of the shoulder: diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Twenty-five patients with known or suspected tears of the rotator cuff in 26 shoulders underwent MR imaging. All patients also underwent arthrography or surgery. MR visualized abnormalities consistent with a tear in 20 of the 22 tears diagnosed by arthrography or surgery. In most cases, tears were seen as regions of increased signal intensity within the cuff on long-TR pulse sequences, although two cases simply showed an almost complete absence of normal cuff. The MR appearance of the two cases with partial tears was similar to that of full-thickness tears. Of the four cases with normal arthrograms, one case had MR findings consistent with a tear. We conclude that MR has good potential for the noninvasive diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Its ultimate role in this diagnosis must await prospective studies comparing its accuracy with that of sonography, CT, and arthrography.Evaluation of chronic tears of the rotator cuff by ultrasound. A new index.The diagnosis of chronic lesions of the rotator cuff is challenging. We have developed a new index to improve the sonographic diagnosis of chronic tears of the cuff. In a pilot study, we examined 50 asymptomatic healthy volunteers by ultrasound to establish the diameter of the rotator cuff in relation to the tendon of the long head of biceps. Subsequently, the index was calculated in 64 patients who had had shoulder pain for more than three months caused by clinically diagnosed lesions of the rotator cuff. The compensatory hypertrophy of the biceps tendon was quantified sonographically in relation to the diameter of the cuff. Comparison with the contralateral shoulder revealed a significantly higher biceps rotator-cuff ratio (p < 0.05) for patients with torn rotator cuffs. A ratio greater than 0.8 was considered pathological (index positive); the mean ratio in the control group was 0.43. The sensitivity of a positive index was 97.8%, the specificity 63.2%, the positive predictive value 86.3%, and the negative predictive value 92.4% in comparison with surgical findings. Use of the index improves sensitivity in the diagnosis of chronic tears of the cuff by ultrasound.Rotator cuff tears: prospective comparison of MR imaging with arthrography, sonography, and surgery.Thirty-eight patients with suspected rotator cuff tears were examined at 1.5 T by using a loop-gap resonator surface coil. The MR findings were compared prospectively in a blinded fashion with the results from double-contrast arthrography in all 38 patients, high-resolution sonography in 23 patients, and surgery in 16 patients. In the total group of 38 patients, MR imaging detected 22 of 22 tears and 14 of 16 intact cuffs as determined by arthrography. In the 16 surgically proved cases, MR and arthrography showed identical results, with 92% sensitivity in the diagnosis of 12 tears and 100% specificity in the diagnosis of four intact cuffs. In a subgroup of 23 patients, sonography detected nine of 15 tears and seven of eight intact cuffs as determined by comparison with arthrography. In 10 surgically proved cases, sonography was 63% sensitive in the diagnosis of eight rotator cuff tears and 50% specific in the diagnosis of two intact cuffs. For the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears, MR imaging is comparable to arthrography in both sensitivity and specificity. In this study, sonography was not as accurate in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears as were the other two techniques. These results suggest that MR imaging should be considered the noninvasive test of choice for patients with suspected rotator cuff disease.Images in clinical medicine. Rotator-cuff tear.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff. A comparison of ultrasonographic and arthroscopic findings in one hundred consecutive cases.There has been limited acceptance of shoulder ultrasonography by orthopaedic surgeons in the United States. The purpose of this retrospective study was to determine the diagnostic performance of high-resolution ultrasonography compared with arthroscopic examination for the detection and characterization of rotator cuff tears.One hundred consecutive shoulders in ninety-eight patients with shoulder pain who had undergone preoperative ultrasonography and subsequent arthroscopy were identified. The arthroscopic diagnosis was a full-thickness rotator cuff tear in sixty-five shoulders, a partial-thickness tear in fifteen, rotator cuff tendinitis in twelve, frozen shoulder in four, arthrosis of the acromioclavicular joint in two, and a superior labral tear and calcific bursitis in one shoulder each. All ultrasonographic reports were reviewed for the presence or absence of a rotator cuff tear and a biceps tendon rupture or dislocation. All arthroscopic examinations were performed according to a standardized operative procedure. The size and extent of the tear and the status of the biceps tendon were recorded for all shoulders. The findings on ultrasonography and arthroscopy then were compared for each parameter.Ultrasonography correctly identified all sixty-five full-thickness rotator cuff tears (a sensitivity of 100 percent). There were seventeen true-negative and three false-positive ultrasonograms (a specificity of 85 percent). The overall accuracy was 96 percent. The size of the tear on transverse measurement was correctly predicted in 86 percent of the shoulders with a full-thickness tear. Ultrasonography detected a tear in ten of fifteen shoulders with a partial-thickness tear that was diagnosed on arthroscopy. Five of six dislocations and seven of eleven ruptures of the biceps tendon were identified correctly.Ultrasonography was highly accurate for detecting full-thickness rotator cuff tears, characterizing their extent, and visualizing dislocations of the biceps tendon. It was less sensitive for detecting partial-thickness rotator cuff tears and ruptures of the biceps tendon.Diagnosing patients with longstanding shoulder joint pain.To examine the interobserver agreement of commonly used clinical tests and diagnoses in patients with shoulder pain, and the accuracy of these tests and ultrasonographic findings in comparison with arthroscopic findings.Eighty six patients with longstanding shoulder joint pain were "blindly" examined by two trained doctors using several clinical tests. In all patients an ultrasonographic examination was performed, and in 42 (49%) an arthroscopy.Tests for impingement showed poor to moderate agreement. Tenderness of muscles, muscle weakness, and tests for labral lesion also showed poor agreement. Pain during muscle contraction showed moderate agreement. The agreement of clinical diagnoses was poor and the accuracy was low in comparison with arthroscopy. Ultrasonography was accurate in full thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, but inaccurate for partial tears and labral lesions.Most clinical tests showed poor agreement. Clinical and ultrasonographic diagnoses had low accuracy in comparison with arthroscopy.[Shoulder joint disorder: correlation of findings by arthroscopy and magnetic resonance imaging].To evaluate the efficacy of magnetic resonance (MR) examination in intra- and extra- articular shoulder disorders, in comparison with arthroscopic findings, in patients with both acute injuries and chronic problems of the shoulder.Conventional MR images and MR arthrograms of the shoulder were obtained in 35 patients treated between January 2004 and January 2006. Each MR image was evaluated by five radiologists experienced in assessing findings on the musculoskeletal system. Subsequently, the patients underwent shoulder arthroscopy performed by shoulder arthroscopy surgeons. Each detailed arthroscopic report was compared with the pre-operative MR findings, and the sensitivity and specificity of MR examination were calculated. The arthroscopic findings served as standards of reference for comparison.SLAP lesions were found intra-operatively in seven out of the 35 patients (20 %). MR sensitivity was 43 % (3 to 7 patients) and specificity was 96 % (27 to 28). The accuracy of MR for SLAP lesion diagnosis was 86 % (30 of 35 patients). Tears in the anterior labrum were diagnosed by arthroscopy in 16 of 35 patients (46 %); MR sensitivity was 44 % (7 of 16 patients) and specificity was 89 % (17 of 19). The accuracy of MR for diagnosing labral tears was 68 % (24 of 35 patients).When designing our study, we tried to avoid limitations of similar investigations. We employed a nuclear magnetic resonance system with high resolution and standardized both the arthroscopic technique and the evaluation of MR images. Our results of diagnosing rotator cuff disorders and SLAP lesions are in agreement with those of other relevant studies. The limitation of our study was a small size of the group.Although MR imaging is a sensitive method suitable for diagnosing some shoulder disorders, the MR imaging of SLAP lesions and labral tears does not give results accurate enough to be used for pre-operative planning.[Role of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of shoulder joint injury].To define the role of ultrasonography in the diagnostic algorithm for patients with shoulder joint injury and to show its potential for the detection of rotator cuff tears and Hill-Sachs lesions.A group of 52 patients with clinical signs of shoulder disorders following trauma who were treated in the 2005-2006 period. After ultrasonographic examination, all patients were surgically treated by arthroscopy. In 12 of them an additional magnetic resonance imaging was carried out before surgery. The results of ultrasonography were compared with arthroscopic findings in terms of detection of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and Hill-Sachs lesions. These were the two most frequent traumatic lesions detected by ultrasonography.A full-thickness tear of the rotator cuff was correctly diagnosed in 13 patients. In further four the ultrasound finding was incorrectly interpreted as a moderate rotator cuff injury. For the detection of full-thickness tears, the sensitivity of the method was 76 %, its specificity was 94 % and accuracy 88 %. The detection of Hill-Sachs lesions by ultrasonography correlated with arthroscopic findings, with a sensitivity of 86 %, specificity of 93 % and accuracy of 92 %.A number of studies report on options for the ultrasonographic detection of various types of traumatic injury to shoulder structures. Examination by ultrasound shows skeletal surfaces, thus permitting detection of a minor bone injury or a Hill- Sachs defect, and reveals soft tissue shoulder structures including tendons, ligaments and bursae. In some studies the possibility of detecting rotator cuff tears by ultrasonography has been described. Although sufficient accuracy of ultrasonographic examination in this region is reported, the results are not consistent.Our results show high reliability of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of shoulder trauma. The detection of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and Hill-Sachs lesions was possible with sufficient accuracy, which makes this quick, simple and available examination a valuable diagnostic tool. The finding of a rotator cuff tear is important information for the orthopaedist and, in the majority of patients, is also an indication for surgery. An ultrasonographic examination can therefore be regarded as a standard part of the diagnostic algorithm for shoulder trauma.What is the significance on increased signal within the rotator cuff on T2-weighted images in the coronal oblique plane?Symptomatic partial rotator cuff tears: diagnostic performance of ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging with surgical correlation.The painful shoulder is a relatively common clinical entity that may be attributed to a variety of pathologies, including partial rotator cuff tears. Conservative treatment or surgical intervention may be offered, depending on the extent of the partial tear and the degree of patient discomfort.To apply ultrasound (US) imaging in order to evaluate the prevalence of partial rotator cuff tears in patients with painful shoulders.Fifty-six patients (17 men, 39 women; mean age 53.7 years) were included in the study, with symptomatic impingement syndrome of the shoulder after having failed to respond to conservative treatment. All patients underwent US and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scans prior to surgical intervention.Arthroscopy or mini-open surgery revealed 53 cases with partial tears of the rotator cuff and three with extensive tendinopathy. Both imaging modalities detected successfully 44 cases of partial tears of the supraspinatus tendon. US imaging yielded a sensitivity of 95.6%, a specificity of 70%, an accuracy of 91%, and a positive predictive accuracy of 93.6%. The corresponding values for MRI were 97.7%, 63.6%, 91%, and 91.7%, respectively.US imaging can be considered almost equally effective in detecting partial tears of the rotator cuff compared to MRI, particularly located in the area of the supraspinatus tendon. MRI may be reserved for doubtful or complex cases, in which delineation of adjacent structures is mandatory prior to surgical intervention.Sonographic evaluation of the rotator cuff: correlation with arthroscopy.High-resolution real-time sonography has been reported as a non-invasive means of evaluating the integrity of the rotator cuff. Fifty-two patients underwent both sonographic and arthroscopic evaluation of the rotator cuff. There were 42 men and 10 women with an average age of 47 years (range 28-71 years). The duration of shoulder pain averaged 24 months (range 3 months to 9 years). Thirty-five rotator cuff tears were noted arthroscopically. Twenty-seven of the tears were diagnosed by sonography for a sensitivity rate of 77%. Eleven of the 17 intact rotator cuffs were normal by sonography for a specificity rate 65%. The overall accuracy of sonography was 73% and the predictive value of a positive sonogram was 82%. Sonography appears to be a good initial screening examination in evaluating the integrity of the rotator cuff. It is noninvasive and relatively inexpensive. Technical limitations of this technique as well as the experience of the radiologist in performing and interpreting the examination play a major role in the accuracy of this test. As instrumentation improves and as experience in using this technique increases, we expect the accuracy of sonography in detecting tears of the rotator cuff to continue to improve.Diagnostic accuracy of shoulder ultrasound performed by a single operator.Both diagnostic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) are used for investigation of the presence and severity of rotator cuff lesions. There is no consensus as to which is the more accurate and cost-effective study. We sought to examine the sensitivity of ultrasound, when used by one experienced radiologist with modern equipment. We compared the ultrasound and surgical results obtained from 68 patients. Ultrasound showed a sensitivity of 89% and specificity of 100% (Positive Predictive Value 100%) for full-thickness tears, and a sensitivity of 79% and specificity of 94% (Positive Predictive Value 87%) for partial-thickness tears. We found that shoulder ultrasound, in the hands of an experienced radiologist with the use of modern high-resolution equipment, is highly sensitive in differentiating complete tears and partial-thickness tears. Our results are similar to the best published results for MRI and given that ultrasound is significantly cheaper and more available, ultrasound by an experienced radiologist should be considered as a primary diagnostic tool for imaging the rotator cuff.Sonographic detection of tears of the anterior portion of the rotator cuff (subscapularis tendon tears).We studied the value of ultrasonography in identifying tears of the most anterior portion of the rotator cuff (subscapularis tendon tears). Shoulder sonography was performed on 1640 patients with shoulder symptoms, 435 of whom underwent surgery. Among the patients who were operated on, 17 had predominantly or exclusively subscapularis tendon tears; 14 of these were full-thickness and three were partial-thickness tears. Ultrasonography demonstrated 82% (14 of 17) of the subscapularis tendon tears; 86% (12 of 14) of the full-thickness tears and 67% (2 of 3) of the partial-thickness tears were correctly diagnosed with ultrasonography. Sonography can diagnose and show the size of subscapularis tendon tears reliably, but it necessitates that the arm can be externally rotated to the maximum extent when performing the study.Sonography and visualizing rotator cuff injuries in older people.Diagnostic capabilities of shoulder ultrasonography in the detection of complete and partial rotator cuff tears.Our study assessed the accuracy of shoulder ultrasonography in detecting complete and partial rotator cuff tears. We performed a prospective study in 24 patients scheduled for shoulder arthroscopy for impingement, partial-thickness or full-thickness (complete) rotator cuff tears, adhesive capsulitis, or arthritis. Before surgery, all patients underwent diagnostic shoulder ultrasonography followed by a shoulder arthroscopy with examination of the rotator cuff. The arthroscopic findings of rotator cuff integrity were compared with the diagnoses made from ultrasonography. The ultrasonographer was not blinded to the history and examination findings, and the surgeon was not blinded to the results of the ultrasonography. Ultrasound had sensitivity and specificity rates of 80% and 100%, respectively (positive and negative predictive rates of 100% and 88%), in the diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and sensitivity and specificity rates of 71% and 100%, respectively (positive and negative predictive values of 100% and 88%), for partial-thickness tears. Although the potential for bias exists in this study, the results suggest that diagnostic ultrasound is effective in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.MR imaging of rotator cuff impingement: correlation with full-thickness rotator cuff tear.Rotator cuff tears usually derive from shoulder impingement, and need surgical treatment. This study is to verify the Magnetic Resonance Image (MRI) findings of rotator cuff impingement which are related to full-thickness rotate cuff tear (FTRCT).Totally 68 patients with shoulder impingement syndrome were studied, including 39 shoulders with surgically-proven FTRCT, and 29 shoulders without FTRCT. MRI findings of shoulder impingement were evaluated for peribursal fat plane, subacromial distance, acromion shape, subacromioclavicular space, irregularity of coracoacromial ligament and presence of subacromial spurs. The correlation with FTRCT was also determined.Peribursal fat plane obliteration (p = 0.0001), hook-shaped acromion (p = 0.0148), subacromioclavicular indentation (p = 0.0004), and decreased subacromial distance (p = 0.0005) showed significant correlation with FTRCT; however, subacromial spurs (p = 0.6238) and thickened irregular coracoacromial ligament (p = 0.1611) showed poor correlation.Specific MRI findings of rotator cuff impingement are fairly reliable and helpful for discrimination of FTRCT from non-FTRCT cases, and can be used preoperatively and noninvasively to determine the necessity of surgical repair of rotator cuff.[Normal anatomy and pathological conditions of subscapular muscle: US findings compared with surgery].To compare US results with those of surgery in the assessment of the subscapularis tendon.From January 1995 to December 1998 1500 patients underwent US of the shoulder. 12 of these patients had an injured subscapularis tendon. US results of these patients were evaluated retrospectively and compared with those of surgery. US examinations of the subscapularis tendon were performed with two US units (AU4 Idea and HDI 3000), using linear arrays 10-13 MHz transducers. The following features of the tendon were evaluated: morphology, thickness and echotexture.A) US findings. US showed: - chronic degenerative tendon changes with diffusely inhomogeneous echotexture (5 cases); - focal tears with small hypoechoic ill-defined areas or gross hypo-anechoic areas involving the full thickness of the tendon (4 cases); - complete tendon tear with disappearance on US of the subscapularis tendon or with severe thickening of the tendon (2 cases); - in 1 case of recent anterior dislocation of the shoulder a bulky hematoma was seen with coexisting thickening and subtotal tear of the tendon. B) Surgical findings. US findings were confirmerd at surgery in 10 of the 12 patients. In the patient with anterior dislocation of shoulder the diagnosis hematoma was confirmed, but the subscapularis tendon was undamaged. Moreover, in 1 out of the 5 patients with US diagnosis of chronic degenerative tendon changes, a small focal tear of the tendon was found at surgery.US is a first level investigation which is able to demonstrate early changes of the subscapularis tendon and nearby structures. Awareness of pitfalls might decrease the use of second level investigations such as CT arthrography and MR imaging, which on the other hand allow a better definition and assessment of the extent of the injury.Diagnostic and therapeutic impact of MRI and arthrography in the investigation of full-thickness rotator cuff tears.Investigation of shoulder pain is important before surgical treatment. The presence or absence of a full-thickness rotator cuff tear (FTRCT) may determine the type of surgical treatment. Both MRI and conventional arthrography can be used, but little is known about their relative diagnostic and therapeutic impact. We performed a prospective trial assessing: (a) the influence of MRI and arthrography results on the clinician's diagnostic thinking (diagnostic impact); (b) the influence of the results on the clinician's therapeutic thinking (therapeutic impact); and (c) the diagnostic performance of the two techniques in patients with surgical confirmation. A total of 104 consecutive patients with shoulder problems referred to a specialist orthopaedic shoulder clinic underwent pre-operative investigation with MRI and arthrography. The surgeon's diagnosis, diagnostic confidence and planned treatment were measured before the investigation, and then again after the results of each investigation. Before the presentation of the investigation, results, the patients were randomised into two groups. In one group MRI was presented first; in the other group, arthrography. The MRI results led to fewer changes in diagnostic category (14 of 46, 30%) than arthrography (20 of 54, 37%), but the difference was not significant (P > 0.5). Magnetic resonance imaging led to slightly more changes in planned management (17 of 47, 36%) than arthrography (14 of 55, 25%), but again the difference was not statistically significant (P > 0.3). The results of the second investigation always had less diagnostic and therapeutic impact than the first. The accuracy of MRI for FTRCT in 38 patients with surgical confirmation was 79%, sensitivity 81% and specificity 78%; the accuracy of arthrography was 82%, sensitivity 50% and specificity 96%. The clinical diagnosis and management plan can be adequately defined by a single radiological investigation. Magnetic resonance imaging and arthrography had fairly similar diagnostic and therapeutic impact and comparable accuracy, although MRI was more sensitive and less specific. Magnetic resonance imaging may be the preferred investigation because of its better demonstration of soft tissue anatomy.Shoulder impingement syndrome: MR findings in 53 shoulders.The shoulder impingement syndrome refers to a condition in which the supraspinatus tendon and subacromial bursa are chronically entrapped between the humeral head inferiorly and either the anterior acromion itself, spurs of the anterior acromion or acromioclavicular joint, or the coracoacromial ligament superiorly. As a result, the space for the bursa and tendon is reduced, and repeated trauma to these structures leads to bursitis and rotator cuff injury. Although pain and limitation of motion are common early findings, the diagnosis is often delayed until a complete tear of the rotator cuff has occurred. In an attempt to determine if MR can be used to depict the abnormalities associated with impingement syndrome (subacromial bursitis, supraspinatus tendinitis, and rotator cuff tear), we reviewed 107 MR scans of painful shoulders. Changes consistent with impingement syndrome were found in 53 patients (50%), 32 of whom underwent subsequent arthrography or surgery. MR was found capable of depicting several soft-tissue and bony abnormalities that have been clinically described in impingement syndrome. In regions of inflammation, we found that the supraspinatus tendon and/or the subacromial bursa were compressed by spurs (25 shoulders), capsular hypertrophy of the acromioclavicular joint (six shoulders), and/or low-lying acromion (14 shoulders). While T1-weighted MR imaging was highly sensitive to abnormalities of the supraspinatus tendon, tendinitis could be differentiated from a small tear of the supraspinatus tendon only with T2-weighted imaging. Large, full-thickness tears, especially if chronic, produced characteristic MR findings on both T1- and T2-weighted images. We conclude that MR can be used to detect several abnormalities associated with the shoulder impingement syndrome.Rotator cuff: evaluation with fat-suppressed MR arthrography.Thirty-seven shoulders with rotator cuff diagnoses proved at arthrography, arthroscopy, or open surgery were examined prospectively with magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography. T1-weighted MR images were obtained with and without fat suppression after intraarticular injection of gadopentetate dimeglumine. Without fat suppression, overall accuracy was 84%. False-positive full-thickness tears were diagnosed in three patients who were proved to have partial tears. False-negative normal tendons were diagnosed in two patients who had partial tears. The corresponding sensitivity and specificity were 90% and 75%, respectively. With the aid of fat-suppressed imaging, full-thickness and partial cuff tears were identified with 100% sensitivity and specificity. Fat-suppressed images also showed intratendinous contrast material imbibition in three torn cuffs with frayed, friable tendon margins. Fat suppression in MR arthrography is valuable in the differentiation of partial from full-thickness cuff tears and in the detection of small partial tears of the inferior tendon surface.Evaluation of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum using a 0.2-Tesla extremity magnetic resonance (MR) system: MR results compared to surgical findings.The purpose of this investigation was to evaluate the diagnostic capabilities of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) performed using a dedicated-extremity MR system in detecting lesions of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum. This retrospective study compared the MR results obtained in 47 patients that underwent MRI using a 0.2-Tesla extremity MR system (E-scan) to the surgical findings. MR images of the shoulder were obtained as follows: shoulder coil, T1-weighted, coronal-oblique and axial images; short Tau inversion recovery (STIR), coronal-oblique images; and T2-weighted, coronal-oblique, sagittal-oblique, and axial images. The MR examinations were interpreted by three highly experienced, musculoskeletal radiologists. Open surgical (N = 26) or arthroscopic (N = 21) procedures were performed within a mean time of 33 days after MRI. The surgical findings revealed rotator cuff tears in 28 patients and labral lesions in 9 patients. For the rotator cuff tears, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 89%, 100%, 100%, and 90%, respectively. For the labral lesions, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 89%, 95%, 80%, and 97%, respectively. The findings indicated that there was good agreement comparing the MR results obtained using the low-field extremity MR system to the surgical findings for determination of lesions of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum. Notably, the statistical values determined for the use of this MR system were comparable to those reported in the peer-reviewed literature for the use of whole-body, mid- and high-field-strength MR systems.Effect of field of view on MR diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.To determine the effect of decreasing the field of view (FOV) on the accuracy of MR for diagnosing rotator cuff tears.One hundred shoulder MR scans with surgical correlation were evaluated for the presence or absence of a cuff tear. The sensitivity and specificity of MR relative to the surgical results were determined for the 59 patients scanned with a 24-cm FOV, and the 41 patients scanned with an 18-cm FOV. All other imaging parameters including acquisition time were identical. The sensitivity and specificity of the two groups were compared using a t-test.The specificity of MR for diagnosing a rotator cuff tear improved from 0.65 for the 24-cm FOV group to 0.89 for the 18-cm FOV group (P = 0.04). The sensitivity changed from 0.91 to 0.96 (P = 0.25).Reducing the FOV from 24 cm to 18 cm results in a statistically significant improvement in specificity of MR for diagnosing rotator cuff tears.Magnetic resonance imaging studies of the shoulder: diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff.MR evaluation of rotator cuff pathology using T2-weighted fast spin-echo technique with and without fat suppression.This study was designed to compare MR imaging findings from T2-weighted fast spin-echo images with and without fat suppression and then to compare surgical results with those MR imaging interpretations in the evaluation of rotator cuff disease.T2-weighted fast spin-echo images--with and without fat suppression--of 177 shoulder MR imaging studies were reviewed separately in a retrospective, randomized, and blinded fashion. Both sets of images were read in conjunction with the corresponding proton density-weighted images. The diagnosis of normal tendon, tendinosis, degeneration, and partial- and full-thickness tears was made using established criteria.T2-weighted fast spin-echo techniques with and without fat suppression showed excellent agreement in the diagnosis of normal tendon (kappa=.90) amd full-thickness tears (kappa=.98), good agreement for partial tears (kappa=.70) and moderate agreement for the combined group of tendinosis and degeneration (kappa=.53). MR imaging and surgical correlation in 43 patients showed 86% specificity (95% confidence interval, 65-96%) for intact tendons, and 100% sensitivity (95% confidence interval, 82-100%) for full-thickness tears on T2-weighted fast spin-echo imaging--both without and with fat suppression. For partial tears, MR imaging showed a sensitivity of 92% (95% confidence interval, 65-99%) with fat suppression and 67% (95% confidence interval, 39-86%) without fat suppression.T2-weighted fast spin-echo imaging--with or without fat suppression--is a highly sensitive technique in the diagnosis of normal tendons and complete tears of the rotator cuff. Because of increased lesion conspicuity, fat suppression tends to perform better in the diagnosis of partial tears.MR imaging of the rotator cuff mechanism: comparison of spin-echo and turbo spin-echo sequences.Although well documented in other MR imaging applications, the value of turbo spin-echo sequences in evaluating the shoulder has not been addressed. This study was designed to directly compare matched spin-echo and turbo spin-echo sequences in the MR imaging evaluation of the rotator cuff.Using otherwise matched double-echo sequences of equal time duration, we performed 123 paired spin-echo (TR/TE, 200/25,75; one excitation) and turbo spin-echo (3500-5000/22,90; two excitations) sequences in the paracoronal and/or parasagittal plane of the shoulders of 76 patients referred to our institution for possible rotator cuff tear. The sequences were retrospectively analyzed for cuff signal and morphology, fluid conspicuity, coracoacromial arch morphology, and bone marrow signal abnormalities. Surgical and nonsurgical clinical results were correlated when available.We found 100% diagnostic correlation between spin-echo and turbo spin-echo sequences for rotator cuff integrity. Surgical data were available for 26 patients, and clinical follow-up for another 37. For complete rotator cuff tear in the surgical subpopulation, sensitivity was 89%, specificity was 94%, and diagnostic accuracy was 24 of 26 (92%). We found no diagnostically significant difference between the two imaging sequences for fluid conspicuity, coracoacromial morphology, or marrow signal. Signal-to-noise ratios were superior in the turbo spin-echo sequences.Turbo spin-echo sequences are an accurate and efficient tool in the MR imaging evaluation of the rotator cuff. Potential benefits include time saving, increased spatial resolution, and improved signal-to-noise ratio.Ultrasonography and arthrography in the diagnosis of tears of the rotator cuff.The accuracy of ultrasonography and arthrography in the prediction of lesions of the rotator cuff was evaluated and compared with the operative findings in a retrospective study of forty-nine patients (forty-nine shoulders). In the detection of full-thickness (stage-III) tears of the rotator cuff, ultrasonography had an over-all sensitivity of 74 per cent, a specificity of 95 per cent, an accuracy of 84 per cent, a predictive value of a positive test of 95 per cent, and a predictive value of a negative test of 75 per cent. In contrast, arthrography demonstrated a sensitivity of 93 per cent, a specificity of 95 per cent, an accuracy of 94 per cent, a predictive value of a positive test of 96 per cent, and a predictive value of a negative test of 91 per cent. Ultrasonography could not reliably differentiate between partial (stage-II) and full-thickness (stage-III) tears. Lesions of the long head of the biceps brachii tendon were recorded by ultrasonography for twenty-two patients (45 per cent) and by arthrography for eleven patients (22 per cent). The ultrasonographic finding of fluid in the sheath of this tendon is not a reliable sign of a lesion in the tendon.[Normal anatomy and pathologic features of the supraspinatus muscle: comparison between ultrasonography and surgery. Analysis of the potential sources of diagnostic errors].The supraspinatus muscle performs about 60% of the elevation-abduction motion of the arm; therefore, it has a prominent functional role among the extrarotational muscles of the shoulder and is the most injured in subacromial space conditions. Seventy-four patients, aged 21-64 years, were examined to compare ultrasonography (US) results with surgical findings in supraspinatus conditions and to analyze the possible pitfalls in US diagnosis. All the patients underwent conventional X-ray, US and then surgery or arthroscopy. The following criteria were considered: morphology, thickness, echotexture, the convexity of the superior border of supraspinatus tendon, the relationships with the subacromial bursa and the tendon of the biceps long head, the regularity of the bone cortex of the humeral head. US showed: chronic degenerative tendinopathy in 10 patients; perforating focal injuries in 21 patients; deep focal injuries in 10 patients; intramural focal injuries in 6 patients; superficial focal injuries in 8 patients; complete tendon tear with detachment in 19 cases. 62/74 US diagnoses were surgically confirmed, with a specificity of 83.7%. In our experience, US provided very useful information about the pattern, size and site of the injuries and was very helpful in the surgical planning.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder. Sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value.The sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value of magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff, glenohumeral capsule, and glenoid labrum were evaluated in ninety-one patients and fifteen asymptomatic volunteers. Magnetic resonance imaging demonstrated 100 per cent sensitivity and 95 per cent specificity in the diagnosis of complete tears, and it consistently predicted the size of the tear of the rotator cuff. There was a definite correlation between atrophy of the supraspinatus muscle and the size of a complete, chronic tear of the rotator cuff. The sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance imaging in the differentiation of tendinitis from degeneration of the cuff were 82 and 85 per cent, and in the differentiation of a normal tendon from one affected by tendinitis with signs of impingement the sensitivity and specificity were 93 and 87 per cent. The formation of spurs around the acromion and acromiocalvicular joint correlated highly with increased age of the patient and with chronic disease of the rotator cuff. The sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of labral tears associated with glenohumeral instability were 88 and 93 per cent. The study showed that high-resolution magnetic-resonance imaging is an excellent non-invasive tool in the diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff and glenohumeral instability.Rotator cuff tears: correlation of sonographic and surgical findings.High-resolution, real-time sonography of the rotator cuff was performed in 51 shoulders, and the results were correlated with findings obtained during subsequent surgery. Prospective sensitivity of sonography in detection of a tear was 100%; specificity, 75%; and accuracy, 92%. Retrospective estimation of tear size on sonograms correlated well with the intraoperative measurements for small and moderate lesions. Large lesions were often underestimated sonographically. Retrospectively, partial tears were correctly diagnosed in seven patients, and bursal thickening was recognized in 17 patients. Sonography of the shoulder proved to be an accurate, noninvasive method for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tears. It is useful for estimating tear size and location and may be useful in recognizing partial tears.[On: Indirect MR arthrography in the diagnosis rotator cuff injuries. By J. Rudolph, Berlin et. al. In: Fortsch Rontgenstr 2000; 172: 686-691].3.0-T MRI of the supraspinatus tendon.MRI of the shoulder has been found to be highly sensitive and specific for detection of full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears at 1.5-T or lower field strength compared with arthroscopy. MRI of the shoulder at 3.0 T has not been specifically assessed. This study assesses the sensitivity and specificity of MRI at 3.0 T for supraspinatus tendon tears compared with arthroscopy.Two experienced musculoskeletal radiologists retrospectively reviewed MR images of the shoulder in 150 consecutive patients who had subsequent arthroscopy. All patients had oblique coronal and sagittal T1-weighted and fat-saturated T2-weighted axial, oblique coronal, and sagittal imaging performed. The radiologists interpreted the MR images by consensus without knowledge of the arthroscopy results. Scans were interpreted for full-thickness or partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears. If partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears were seen on MRI, the reviewers noted whether the partial-thickness tear was articular or bursal in location. The radiologists also separated the supraspinatus tendon tears into small (< 1 cm retraction from the humeral head) and large (> 1 cm retraction from the humeral head). All 150 patients went on to arthroscopy. After consensus review of the MR images, arthroscopy results were compared with consensus MR interpretations.Ninety-eight of the 150 patients had full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears at arthroscopy. Twenty-six of the 150 patients had partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears. Seventeen of these 26 partial-thickness tears were along the articular surface and nine were along the bursal surface. Ninety-six of 98 full-thickness tears seen at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MRI interpretation. All 26 partial-thickness tears seen at arthroscopy were seen at consensus MR interpretation; however, two of the partial-thickness articular surface tears seen at arthroscopy were interpreted as full-thickness tears on consensus MRI interpretation. Twenty-eight of the 98 full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears were small tears (< 1 cm retraction from the humeral head) on arthroscopy. Two of these 28 small tears seen on arthroscopy were not seen on consensus MRI interpretation. Twenty-six patients had intact supraspinatus tendons on both retrospective consensus MRI interpretation and at arthroscopy.MRI of the shoulder at 3.0 T is highly sensitive and specific compared with arthroscopy in the detection of full-thickness and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears.MR imaging of delamination tears of the rotator cuff tendons.The objective was to describe the imaging appearances and location of delamination tears of the rotator cuff tendons on non-contrast conventional MR imaging.This study was reviewed and approved by our Institutional Review Board. The reports of 548 consecutive MR examinations of the shoulder were reviewed, looking for mention or description of delamination tears of the rotator cuff. The images of the identified cases were then reviewed by two radiologists to confirm the findings. Correlation with surgical and arthroscopic information was then performed. Delamination tears were defined as horizontal retraction of either the bursal or articular surface of the tendon, manifest as thickening of the torn retracted edge, and/or interstitial splitting of the tendon, manifest as fluid-like high signal intensity on fat-suppressed T2-weighted oblique coronal images.Fourteen cases of delamination tears were identified in 13 patients. Ten of the cases involved the supraspinatus tendon, all with articular surface involvement. Nine of these supraspinatus cases were isolated tears and one occurred as part of a full thickness tear. All 10 of these supraspinatus cases showed medial retraction of the articular surface of the tendon, with thickening of the retracted edge, and 5 of the 10 had a demonstrable horizontal cleft in the interstitium. Four cases involved the subscapularis tendon, with articular surface disruption in three and pure interstitial delamination in one. Medial subluxation of the tendon of the long head of the biceps was present in all four cases. No delamination tears occurred on the bursal surface. Only three of the 14 shoulders underwent surgical repair with one confirmation of supraspinatus delamination, one confirmation of a subscapularis tear that had become a full thickness tear 10 months after initial imaging and another interstitial subscapularis delamination that was not identified arthroscopically.Delamination tears occur most often in the supraspinatus tendon, and in our series always involved the articular surface of the tendon. Only half of these tears have a visible cleavage plane in the interstitium, but this cleavage plane is not necessary for diagnosis if the torn edge is retracted.Magnetic resonance imaging assessment of the rotator cuff: is it really accurate?Association of shoulder sonographic findings with subsequent surgical treatment for rotator cuff injury.To identify any clinical and radiologic findings of rotator cuff injury that predict whether patients will undergo shoulder surgery.We retrospectively studied all shoulder sonograms obtained at a single institution over 12 months. Possible predictors of surgical treatment were documented, including patient age and sex, duration and types of symptoms, and the location and severity of tendon damage on sonography. One hundred twenty-eight patients underwent shoulder sonography; 34 patients eventually underwent shoulder surgery. Multivariate logistic regression was performed to identify clinical and sonographic factors associated with the use of surgical therapy.The only statistically significant predictor of surgical intervention was the finding of full-thickness tears (with or without tendon retraction) on sonography (P = .03). Patients with full-thickness tears were 4.3 times more likely to undergo surgery than those with no tears (odds ratio, 4.3).The sonographic diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears is the only finding statistically associated with the use of surgical treatment. No single clinical variable was consistently associated with subsequent surgery. Partial-thickness tears on sonography also do not show any statistical association with the eventual use of surgery for rotator cuff symptoms.[Sonography of the rotator cuff].Comparison of high-field-strength versus low-field-strength MRI of the shoulder.Previous studies have reported similar results of shoulder MRI versus arthroscopy for high-field-strength (1.5-T) and low-field-strength (0.2-T) units. We report our experience with the accuracy of high- versus low-field-strength units versus arthroscopy for detection of supraspinatus tendon tears and labral tears in the same patients. SUBJECTS AND METHODS. Three musculoskeletal radiologists prospectively interpreted shoulder MRIs from 40 patients who had a complete shoulder MRI examination on a 0.2-T system and limited imaging on a 1.5-T unit. Proton-density axial and fat-saturated T2-weighted coronal and sagittal sequences were performed. Each radiologist interpreted the open unit images first and the high-field-strength images second. Results from 28 patients who also underwent arthroscopy were also compared with the MRI interpretations. All scans were then retrospectively reinterpreted by consensus of the three reviewers, who were unaware of the patient's name, results of previous MRI, or arthroscopy report (if any).High-field-strength images altered reviewers' interpretations of low-field-strength scans for nine of 40 patients. In four patients, full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears could be diagnosed definitively on the high-field-strength unit but not on the open unit. Three labral tears and two superior labral anteroposterior lesions could be depicted definitively on the high-field-strength unit but not on the open unit. All tears were confirmed at arthroscopy.High-field-strength MRI units provide better spatial and contrast resolution and allow more accurate interpretations than low-field-strength units; these findings may affect clinical treatment.MR imaging of the rotator cuff tendon: interobserver agreement and analysis of interpretive errors.To evaluate accuracy in interpretation of shoulder magnetic resonance (MR) images and interobserver agreement and to characterize the types of errors.Five radiologists with varying experience independently and retrospectively twice interpreted the MR images of 222 symptomatic patients who underwent both MR imaging and shoulder arthroscopy. The first interpretation was a blind review; the second was with knowledge of the arthroscopic findings.For full-thickness tears, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 84%-96%, 94%-98%, and 92%-97%, respectively, and for partial tears, 35%-44%, 85%-97%, and 77%-87%, respectively. There was no statistically significant difference between readers in the detection of partial or full-thickness tears. There was a statistically significant difference between readers in the no-tear category. Cohen kappa values generally indicated improved interobserver agreement proportional to the readers' experience (full-thickness tears, 0.731-0.881; partial tears, 0.168-0.443).Diagnosis of a full-thickness tear can be learned to a high degree of accuracy. Despite the radiologist's level of experience and knowledge of the arthroscopic findings, the sensitivity for diagnosis of partial tears is poor.Sonography of the shoulder in patients with tears of the rotator cuff: accuracy and value for selecting surgical options.The management of patients with signs and symptoms referable to the rotator cuff depends on the presence of cuff injury and the size of the tear. Treatment options include conservative nonsurgical management for patients with an intact or partially torn cuff, arthroscopic decompression of the coracoacromial space for those not responding to nonsurgical management, and a range of surgical techniques to repair full-thickness tears. This study was designed to determine whether sonographic evaluation with classification of the extent of cuff injury is accurate for purposes of treatment planning.Preoperative sonography of the rotator cuff was performed on 225 patients, and findings were classified into intact, partial tear, small full-thickness tear, large full-thickness tear, and massive tear groups. Surgical correlation with the predicted sonographic classification was provided by arthroscopic inspection or open surgery.The sonographic findings were surgically confirmed for 206 (92%) of the 225 patients. More extensive cuff injury was encountered during surgery than had been predicted sonographically in 11 patients (5%); less extensive injury than predicted was found during surgery in eight patients (4%).Our results show a high correlation between the sonographic classification of rotator cuff injury and the surgical findings. The selection of appropriate treatment programs can be reliably based on the sonographic classification.Magnetic resonance imaging assessment of the rotator cuff: is it really accurate?Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is used increasingly for evaluating the rotator cuff. This study of 39 shoulders (38 patients) compared the accuracy of MRI interpretation of rotator cuff integrity by a group of community hospital radiologists (clinical community scenario, CCS) with that of a musculoskeletal radiologist (experienced specialist scenario, ESS), relative to arthroscopy. For the CCS subgroup, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PV), negative PV, and accuracy for partial tears were: 0%, 68%, 0%, 82%, and 59%, respectively; for complete tears: 56%, 73%, 36%, 86%, and 69%, respectively; and for all tears combined: 85%, 52%, 50%, 87%, and 64%, respectively. For the ESS subgroup, the respective values for partial tears were: 20%, 88%, 20%, 88%, and 79%, respectively; for complete tears: 78%, 83%, 58%, 92%, and 82%, respectively; and for all tears: 71%, 71%, 59%, 81%, and 71%, respectively. We concluded that MRI assessment of the rotator cuff was not accurate relative to arthroscopy. MRI was most helpful if the result was negative, and MRI diagnosis of partial tear was of little value. Considering the high cost of shoulder MRI, this study has significant implications for the evaluation of patients with possible rotator cuff pathology.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder.[Contribution of echogradient magnetic resonance imaging in the study of subacromial diseases. Surgical and arthrographic correlations].Fifteen asymptomatic volunteers and 300 patients with suspected lesions of the rotator cuff were examined with T2*- and proton density-weighted gradient echo (T2*-Rho-GEI) MRI sequences (500-700 ms/30 ms/30 degrees) with a 0.5 T (GE-CGR) system and an adapted surface coil. For the patients, the findings were compared with those of arthrography in 130 cases and of surgery in 42 cases. For the operated patients, T2*-Rho-GEI and arthrography allowed correctly diagnosing 31 complete ruptures (CR). However, surgical exploration of the ruptures showed that T2*-Rho-GEI showed the actual extent of the rupture and the degree of tendon retraction better than arthrography. T2*-Rho-GEI also provides information about the thickness and trophicity of the remaining cuff and on local muscle trophicity. T2*-Rho-GEI allows directly evaluating the tendon of the long head of the biceps both in its extra-articular and its intra-articular parts. In 3 cases of complete cuff rupture, MRI allowed detecting 3 associated lesions of the anterior labrum, which had not been suspected on the clinical examination and had not been demonstrated by conventional arthrography. Lastly, out of 12 cases of deep incomplete rupture (n = 12) correctly diagnosed with MRI, 5 had been undetected on arthrography. Similarly, 8 cases of inflammatory alterations suspected with T2*-Rho-GEI and confirmed by surgery had not been recognized with arthrography. For the non-operated patients, T2*-Rho-GEI and arthrography had corresponding results for the diagnosis of CR (8 cases), of DIR (6 cases) and of intact cuff (6 cases).(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Angled oblique sagittal MR imaging of rotator cuff tears: comparison with standard oblique sagittal images.To compare the accuracy for diagnosing rotator cuff tears of oblique coronal images supplemented with standard oblique sagittal images versus thinner-section angled oblique sagittal images.The study included 75 consecutive patients who had a shoulder MR scan followed by arthroscopy. MR images included oblique coronal, oblique sagittal (4 mm thick, 1 mm interslice gap), and angled oblique sagittal (3 mm/0.2 mm) images perpendicular to the lateral cuff. A musculoskeletal staff radiologist and fellow separately evaluated the cuff for tears on the oblique coronal images supplemented with either the oblique sagittal or the angled sagittal images.For distinguishing a cuff tear from no tear, the staff radiologist had an accuracy of 0.76 (95% confidence interval: 0.67, 0.85) with the standard sagittal set, and 0.88 (0.80, 0.95) with the angled set (P=0.04). There was a nonsignificant improvement in accuracy for the fellow, calculated as 0.73 (0.63, 0.83) on the standard sagittal set and 0.76 (0.67, 0.85) on the angled set. Both readers also improved their diagnostic accuracy for partial-thickness tears with the angled set, although the improvement was statistically significant only for the staff radiologist.There is a slight improvement in accuracy for diagnosing rotator cuff tears, particularly partial-thickness tears, for the more experienced radiologist using thinner-section angled oblique sagittal images. These images may be useful as a supplemental sequence in patients where it is important to identify partial-thickness tears accurately.MR arthrography of the shoulder: comparison with conventional MR imaging.Twenty-three patients underwent both conventional MR imaging of the shoulder and MR shoulder arthrography for clinically suspected labral or rotator cuff abnormalities. Images obtained before and after contrast administration were studied independently, and without knowledge of clinical findings, by two radiologists for the presence of abnormalities of the glenoid labrum or rotator cuff. Results were correlated with surgical findings in all patients. Nine patients had surgically proved labral tears. MR arthrography detected all nine labral abnormalities, while six of the nine were missed on conventional MR imaging. Fourteen patients had surgically proved rotator cuff tears. MR arthrography detected 11 of the 14 tears and missed three partial tears on the bursal surface. Conventional MR imaging detected nine cuff tears and missed five tears; two of these were complete rotator cuff tears and three were partial tears of the undersurface of the rotator cuff. Our results suggest that MR arthrography enhances the accuracy of MR in the evaluation of the glenoid labrum and rotator cuff tendon.MR arthrographic depiction of tears of the rotator cuff: benefit of abduction and external rotation of the arm.To show the effectiveness of positioning the arm in abduction and external rotation (ABER) during magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography for depiction of tears of the rotator cuff.Five throwing athletes with shoulder pain were prospectively imaged with standard MR imaging, MR arthrography, and ABER MR arthrography. The status of the rotator cuff was recorded; arthroscopic correlation was obtained.One partial tear of the distal infraspinatus tendon was detected with ABER MR arthrography only. One full-thickness tear was detected with both MR arthrography and ABER MR arthrography, but the component of the tear that extended into the infraspinatus tendon was depicted with ABER MR arthrography only. One partial tear was detected with both MR arthrography and ABER MR arthrography; no additional information was provided by either technique alone.The ABER position may be useful in detection and characterization of tears of the rotator cuff, especially partial tears of the undersurface. This information would be useful in selection of patients for conservative therapy, arthroscopy, or arthrotomy.Use of preoperative magnetic resonance imaging to predict rotator cuff tear pattern and method of repair.To determine the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) criteria for predicting rotator cuff tear pattern and method of repair.Retrospective MRI/arthroscopy correlation.Sixty-six preoperative MRI scans were evaluated. The maximum medial to lateral length (L) of the tear was measured on T2-weighted coronal cuts. The maximum anterior to posterior width (W) was measured on T2-weighted sagittal cuts. The cases were divided into 3 groups: group 1, short-wide tears, L < or = W, L < 2 cm; group 2, long-narrow tears, L > W, W < 2 cm; and group 3, long-wide tears, L > or = 2 cm, W > or = 2 cm.Of the 66 MRI scans, 55 were adequate for standardized measurement. Group 1, 16 cases: 15 were found at arthroscopy to be crescent-shaped tears repaired end-to-bone; 1 was repaired with interval slides. Group 2, 22 cases: all 22 were repaired side-to-side/margin convergence. Group 3, 17 cases: 12 required interval slides, 1 partial repair was performed, and 4 were repaired side-to-side/margin convergence.Tear pattern and method of repair can be predicted on high-quality MRI scan. Group 1, L < or = W and L < 2 cm, predicts a crescent-shaped tear and end-to-bone repair (positive predictive value, 93.8%). Group 2, L > W and W < 2 cm, predicts a longitudinal tear and side-to-side/margin convergence repair (positive predictive value 100%). Group 3, L > or = 2 cm and W > or = 2 cm, predicts a massive contracted tear and that primary end-to-bone or side-to-side repairs are usually not possible and that interval slides or partial repair may be necessary (positive predictive value, 76.5%). The overall diagnostic model based on usable MRI scans significantly predicted arthroscopic findings (P < .001 for chi-square test).Level III, development of diagnostic criteria with universally applied reference (nonconsecutive patients).MR arthrography of partial thickness tears of the undersurface of the rotator cuff: an arthroscopic correlation.Partial thickness tears of the undersurface (articular surface) of the rotator cuff (RTC) have been recognized increasingly in recent years as a source of treatable shoulder pain in the athletic population. This study evaluated the efficacy of MR arthrography (MR-ARTH) in diagnosing these tears.The study design was a retrospective review of medical records of patients who had presented with refractory shoulder complaints and subsequently undergone MR arthrography with multiple signal MRI sequences followed by shoulder arthroscopy. Of particular interest were patients who had oblique T1 fat suppression (COT1FS), coronal oblique T2 (COT2), and coronal oblique T2 fat suppression (COT2FS) images taken. Seventy-six subjects met the study criteria. Investigators examined the MR-ARTH images from these patients' charts while blinded as to arthroscopic results, clinical signs and symptoms.Based on COT1FS images, investigators identified nine subjects as having had full thickness tears, 28 as having had partial thickness tears of the undersurface of the rotator cuff (PRTC), and 39 as having had intact RTC. These results were compared to actual findings at arthroscopy: nine full thickness tears, 26 of 28 with PRTC and 34 of 39 intact. The sensitivity of MR-ARTH was 84%, with a positive predictive value of 93%. The overall accuracy was 91% (69/76). The specificity was 96%. That is, if a PRTC was not seen on the MR-ARTH images, it was very unlikely to exist. COT2 and COT2FS sequences failed to increase sensitivity and overall efficacy of MRI.PRTC can be diagnosed accurately by MR-ARTH with gadopentatate contrast. A COT1FS sequence is recommended for evaluation when tears are suspected.Rotator cuff disorders: interobserver and intraobserver variation in diagnosis with MR imaging.To determine interobserver and intraobserver variation in the interpretation of magnetic resonance (MR) images in rotator cuff disorders.MR images of the shoulder in 97 patients were retrospectively reviewed twice, with a 3-week interval. Surgical findings indicated a full-thickness tear in 29 patients, grade 1 impingement in 19 (tendinitis), and grade 2 impingement (partial tear) in 26. The control population comprised 23 asymptomatic volunteers or patients.All observers were accurate in the diagnosis of a full-thickness tear (89%-98%), with good intraobserver (kappa = 0.67-0.84) and interobserver agreement (kappa = 0.74-0.92). In diagnoses of tendinitis, partial tear, and normal cuff, there were wide ranges of sensitivity (13%-74%) and specificity (72%-93%), as well as poor interobserver (kappa = 0.12-0.60) and intraobserver agreement (kappa = 0.35-0.78).Full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff can be accurately identified at MR imaging with little observer variation. Consistent differentiation of normal rotator cuff, tendinitis, and partial thickness tears is more difficult.Rotator cuff tendon tears: evaluation with fat-suppressed MR imaging with arthroscopic correlation in 100 patients.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of fat-suppressed magnetic resonance (MR) imaging of rotator cuff tears in a large symptomatic population.One hundred patients underwent both MR imaging and arthroscopy of the shoulder. Ninety-two patients underwent fat-suppressed conventional spin-echo MR imaging (repetition time msec/echo time msec = 2,500/20, 60), and eight patients underwent fat-suppressed, fast spin-echo MR imaging (2,000/80).With data combined for complete and partial tears of the rotator cuff (n = 31), MR imaging had an accuracy of 93%; sensitivity, 84%; and specificity, 97%. Seventeen of 20 complete tears and nine of 11 partial tears were properly identified with MR imaging. Two partial tears were not detected and three complete tears were incorrectly called partial tears at MR imaging. Of two false-positive MR imaging findings, one was called a complete tear and the other, a partial tear.Fat-suppressed MR imaging has high diagnostic accuracy in evaluating tears of the rotator cuff tendon.Usefulness of the simultaneous acquisition of spatial harmonics technique during MRI of the shoulder.The simultaneous acquisition of spatial harmonics (SMASH) technique is a parallel imaging technique that uses fewer echoes than conventional techniques to obtain the desired resolution. Production of images occurs more quickly with parallel imaging than with conventional imaging. This study assesses the usefulness of the SMASH technique for MRI of the shoulder. SUBJECTS AND METHODS. Five experienced musculoskeletal radiologists prospectively interpreted MRIs of the shoulder in 50 consecutive patients. All patients underwent a complete MRI examination of the shoulder on a 1.5-T commercially available scanner. Axial fat-saturated proton density-weighted, coronal T1-weighted, and coronal and sagittal fat-saturated T2-weighted sequences were performed. Patients also underwent SMASH T2-weighted imaging in the coronal and sagittal planes. Coronal and sagittal SMASH T2-weighted imaging took approximately 50% as long to complete compared with conventional T2-weighted imaging. Each radiologist interpreted MRIs of the shoulder without knowing whether the images were obtained using the SMASH or the fat-saturated T2-weighted technique. Twenty-eight of the 50 patients also underwent subsequent arthroscopy, and the results were compared with MRI interpretations based on SMASH and fat-saturated T2-weighted images.We found no intraobserver variability between the interpretations of SMASH imaging and the interpretations of fat-saturated T2-weighted imaging. Of the 28 patients who also underwent subsequent arthroscopy, 19 were found to have full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears and nine had superior labral anterior-to-posterior lesions. All arthroscopic findings correlated with prospective MRI interpretations.SMASH imaging allows significant time savings compared with fat-saturated T2-weighted MRI. We found that the use of the SMASH technique did not affect the MRI interpretation or the clinical outcome of patients.[Rotator cuff rupture in the shoulder impingement syndrome. Echography and arthrography: 2 diagnostic methods compared].After briefly reviewing the shoulder impingement syndrome, the authors investigate the role of two diagnostic imaging methods, i.e., ultrasonography (US) and arthrography, in demonstrating the typical features of this condition. Over a 15 months' period, 190 patients suffering from shoulder pain were examined with arthrography; 50 of them subsequently underwent acromion plastic surgery and rotator cuff stitching. This study was aimed at comparing US and arthrographic results, applying classifiable criteria to make the most accurate diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. The lack of visibility of the rotator cuff at US was the major and clearest sign of tear (100% of cases). The association between cuff thinning and hypo/hyperechoic damaged focal areas was another major sign (in 76.19% of complete tears and in 14.28% of incomplete tears). Hyperechoic focal areas alone proved to be a false-positive finding in 5 cases, while in 11 of 19 cases normal US patterns were a false-negative finding; in 3 cases other conditions were diagnosed. To conclude, the value of US is emphasized in the screening of the painful shoulder and the use of arthrography is suggested when both clinical tests and US fail to yield enough information for a diagnosis to be made.[Lesions of the rotator cuff: the specific value of echography].Shoulder impingement syndrome: relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic findings.Although there has been much research about imaging methods for shoulder impingement syndrome, the clinical information and upper limb level of disability have been generally ignored. The purpose of this study was to detect the relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic variables in patients with shoulder impingement syndrome.A cross-sectional, clinical, and radiologic study was planned and 59 shoulders of 58 consecutive patients waiting for physical therapy because of a clinically suspected shoulder impingement syndrome were included into this study. Comprehensive clinical examination, radiography, shoulder ultrasonography, and magnetic resonance imaging were performed in the same month.Despite the high sensitivities of ultrasonography for diagnosing rotator cuff tears (98.1%) and biceps pathologies (100%), magnetic resonance imaging was superior to ultrasonography in many important shoulder structures such as a glenoid labral tear and subacromial bursal effusion/hypertrophy (P < 0.01). These structures were the determinants of the shoulder's disability measured by disabilities of the arm, shoulder, and hand questionnaire.Ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging had comparable high accuracy for identifying the biceps pathologies and rotator cuff tears. The basic clinical tests had modest accuracy in both disorders. The choice of which imaging test to perform should be based on the patient's clinical information (regarding lesion of glenoid labrum, joint capsule, muscle, and bone), cost, and imaging experience of the radiology department.Correlation of MR imaging, CT arthrography, and arthroscopy of the shoulder.Rotator cuff tears and instability of the glenohumeral joint are a common cause of chronic shoulder pain and disability. Currently CT arthrography is the method of choice to evaluate the extent of osseous and soft tissue abnormalities. This study was undertaken to determine if magnetic resonance imaging was able to depict post-dislocation abnormalities and rotator cuff pathology and if MRI can replace CT arthrography. Sixty four patients, who were operated on for the first time (arthroscopy or arthrotomy) between November 1986 and July 1991, were compared in a blinded fashion with the results of MR imaging in 40 cases and of CT arthrographies in 24 cases. For the evaluation of rotator cuff tears MRI proved to have a sensitivity of 83.3% and an accuracy of 90.3%. Labral pathology was depicted with a sensitivity of 69.2% and an accuracy of 87.1%. In cases involving a Hill-Sachs lesion the sensitivity of MRI was 90% and the accuracy 95%. MR imaging is an accurate method in the evaluation of rotator cuff pathology and to some extent labral abnormalities.[Sonography of the shoulder in rotator cuff defects. Technic and clinical value].MRI and ultrasound evaluation of the shoulder.Indirect MR arthrography of the unexercised glenohumeral joint in patients with rotator cuff tears.To evaluate the diagnostic utility of indirect MR arthrography of the unexercised glenohumeral joint in patients with rotator cuff tears confirmed by arthroscopy or arthrotomy as the gold standard.Twenty-six patients underwent conventional MR imaging and indirect MR arthrography of the stationary glenohumeral joint using a wrap-around surface coil. Unenhanced T1-weighted spin echo/T2-weighted fast spin echo sequences and T1-weighted gradient echo sequences, adding spectral fat suppression after intravenous administration of contrast medium, were performed in the oblique coronal and oblique sagittal planes. Images were analyzed by three experienced radiologists in consensus. Levels of diagnostic confidence were evaluated using a four-point scale of diagnostic certainty.Performing indirect MR arthrography of the unexercised shoulder leads to a diagnostically efficient enhancement of joint fluid (120% at 4 minutes and 145% at 8 minutes after intravenous injection of gadodiamide). In terms of soft tissue delineation, characterization of rotator cuff tears was significantly improved by using enhanced fat-suppressed T1-weighted gradient echo sequences compared with conventional MR imaging.Indirect MR arthrography without glenohumeral joint exercise in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears is feasible and represents a more convenient and less time-consuming alternative to indirect MR arthrography after joint exercise.Assessment of fat content in supraspinatus muscle with proton MR spectroscopy in asymptomatic volunteers and patients with supraspinatus tendon lesions.To evaluate proton magnetic resonance (MR) spectroscopy in the assessment of lipid content of the supraspinatus muscle in asymptomatic volunteers and patients with supraspinatus tendon lesions.Single-voxel proton MR spectroscopy was used to assess lipid content of the supraspinatus muscle in asymptomatic volunteers (n = 30) and patients with partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (n = 30), newly diagnosed full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (n = 30), and chronic full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (n = 30). The apparent lipid content of the supraspinatus muscle measured with proton MR spectroscopy was related to its appearance on sagittal-oblique T1-weighted spin-echo MR images (grades 0-4). One-way analysis of variance was performed to test for significant differences, and the Tukey honestly significant difference procedure was performed for post hoc comparisons.Mean apparent lipid content was 13.7% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 11.5%, 15.8%) for asymptomatic volunteers, 29.5% (95% CI: 25.1%, 34.0%) for patients with partial-thickness tears, 48.6% (95% CI: 41.3%, 55.9%) for patients with full-thickness tears, and 66.1% (95% CI: 57.7%, 74.5%) for patients with chronic tears. Values were significantly different (analysis of variance, P <.001; P <.001-.002 for all post hoc pairwise comparisons). Mean apparent lipid content for the supraspinatus muscle was as follows: grade 0, 19.6% (95% CI: 16.7%, 22.6%); grade 1, 36.8% (95% CI: 33.2%, 40.4%); grade 2, 53.6% (95% CI: 43.1%, 64.2%); grade 3, 67.5% (95% CI: 52.6%, 82.3%); and grade 4, 79.2% (95% CI: 73.2%, 85.3%). With analysis of variance (P <.001), all post hoc pairwise comparisons were significant (P </=.001) except between grades 2 and 3 (P =.112) and between grades 3 and 4 (P =.261). In 14 (25%) subjects who had grade 0 appearance on T1-weighted images, lipid content values were greater than the upper range of values in the volunteers.Proton MR spectroscopy is suitable in the assessment of apparent lipid content of rotator cuff muscles.Indirect MR arthrography of the shoulder: use of abduction and external rotation to detect full- and partial-thickness tears of the supraspinatus tendon.To evaluate prospectively the accuracy of indirect magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography for supraspinatus tendon tears during neutral positioning or abduction and external rotation (ABER) and neutral positioning.Informed consent was obtained in all patients, and the study was approved by the institutional review board. Indirect MR arthrography of the shoulder was performed in 51 symptomatic patients (14 female, 37 male; mean age, 47 years) in the neutral position (set 1) and in the neutral and ABER positions (set 2). Two readers independently interpreted both sets, and diagnoses were compared with arthroscopic findings. Diagnostic accuracy was calculated, and 95% confidence intervals were used to detect significant differences between sets. Diagnostic confidence was recorded by using a three-level confidence score. Differences between sets were evaluated by using the Wilcoxon signed rank test. Interobserver agreement was determined separately for each set and for all diagnoses, full-thickness tears, and partial-thickness tears.For full-thickness tears, there was no benefit to reading set 2. For reader 1, sensitivity and specificity were 95% and 100%, respectively, for set 1 and 100% and 100%, respectively, for set 2. For reader 2, sensitivity and specificity were 80% and 100%, respectively, for set 1 and 100% and 100%, respectively, for set 2. For partial-thickness tears, sensitivity was significantly higher after reading set 2. For reader 1, sensitivity and specificity were 71% and 88%, respectively, for set 1 and 93% and 100%, respectively, for set 2. For reader 2, sensitivity and specificity were 50% and 88%, respectively, for set 1 and 86% and 94%, respectively, for set 2. For both readers, diagnostic confidence for partial-thickness tears was significantly higher after reading set 2. After the interpretation of set 2, kappa values increased from 0.35 to 1.00 for full-thickness tears and from 0.12 to 0.63 for partial-thickness tears.Indirect MR arthrography with supplementary images obtained with patients in the ABER position significantly improved sensitivity and increased diagnostic confidence for partial-thickness tears of the supraspinatus tendon. Interobserver agreement was improved for both full- and partial-thickness tears.[Rotator cuff rupture. Diagnostic imaging].Conventional radiography, ultrasound, Magnetic Resonance (MR), Arthrography Computed Tomography (Arthro-CT) and Arthrography Magnetic Resonance (Arthro-MR) are available for diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Our purpose is to assess the specificity and sensitivity of these examinations and if they could give to the surgeon all the informations to select the more accurate treatment. We have evaluated retrospectively the images of 68 patients, 43 male and 25 female (average age 51 years), which then have been surgically treated for rotator cuff pathology. On the basis of our findings, we think that conventional radiography and ultrasound are excellent in a first evaluation. MR images, particularly in the coronal and sagittal oblique planes, are able to demonstrate partial or complete rotator cuff tears. The use of intra-articular contrast medium (arthro-CT, arthro-MR) should be reserved for partial lesions on specific cases.Anterior versus posterior, and rim-rent rotator cuff tears: prevalence and MR sensitivity.To determine the relative distribution of the locations of rotator cuff tears, and the sensitivity of anterior versus posterior tears on MR images.We identified 110 consecutive patients who had a shoulder MR and either a partial-thickness or a small full-thickness rotator cuff tear diagnosed at arthroscopy. From the arthroscopy videotapes, we classified the tears as centered in the anterior or posterior half of the cuff, and as either in the critical zone or adjacent to the bony insertion. The original MR interpretation was compared with the arthroscopic findings. MR sensitivity and patient age were compared between patients with tears in the anterior and posterior halves of the cuff. In addition, in patients with partial tears less than 2 cm in diameter, an age comparison between those with tears in the critical zone and those with articular surface tears adjacent to the bony insertion (rim-rent tear) was performed.The tear was centered in the anterior half of the rotator cuff in 79% of the patients younger than 36 years old, and in 89% of the patients 36 years old and over. The average age of the patients with tears in the anterior half (44 years) was not significantly different from the average age of those with posterior tears (40 years) (P = 0.23). The sensitivity of MR for anterior tears was 0.69, and for posterior tears it was 0.56 (P = 0.17). The average age of the 9 patients with rim-rent tears was 31 years, while that of the 28 patients with similarly-sized partial tears not involving the insertion was 40 years old (P = 0.048). Five of the nine rim-rent tears (0.56) were interpreted correctly on the original MR report; two of the other tears were misinterpreted as intratendinous fluid but were diagnosable in retrospect.Even in patients less than 36 years old, most partial and small full-thickness rotator cuff tears are centered in the anterior half of the supraspinatus. Although our figure for MR sensitivity for these tears is lower than in recent articles, we found no significant difference between the sensitivity of MR for diagnosing posterior tears versus tears in the anterior half of the supraspinatus tendon. Rim-rent tears can be mistaken for intratendinous signal, and should be carefully looked for in younger patients with shoulder pain.Full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff of the shoulder: diagnosis with MR imaging.The purpose of this study was to describe MR findings in full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff. Of 102 shoulders examined by MR imaging, 31 were found to have a full-thickness tendon tear at arthroscopy/bursoscopy (five shoulders) or open surgery (26 shoulders). All shoulders were imaged in oblique coronal and axial planes. MR images of the 102 shoulders were evaluated for (1) the presence of fluid in the subacromial and subdeltoid bursae; (2) abnormal signal of the supraspinatus, subscapularis, infraspinatus, and teres minor tendons; (3) interruption of tendon continuity and thinning of the tendon; and (4) proximal retraction of the junction of the muscle and tendon. The presence or absence of each finding was determined by consensus of two radiologists, who interpreted the images without knowledge of the surgical findings. Results in those 31 shoulders with proved full-thickness tears were: fluid in the subacromial bursae (29 shoulders), interruption of tendinous continuity (22 shoulders), focally increased signal of the tendon equivalent to that of water (27 shoulders), and musculotendinous retraction (24 shoulders). The finding of subacromial fluid was a sensitive indicator (93%) of a full-thickness tear, and interruption of tendinous continuity was a specific finding (96%) in diagnosing a full-thickness tear. Our experience shows interruption of tendon continuity is the most specific MR finding of full-thickness rotator cuff tears, while subacromial fluid is the most common finding.Sonography of the rotator cuff in painful shoulders performed without knowledge of clinical information: results from 58 sonographic examinations with surgical correlation.To assess the value of sonography as an isolated diagnostic test for the detection and quantification of rotator cuff tears.Preoperative sonographic examination was performed on 58 shoulders. Key biases on sonographic interpretation such as history-taking, physical examination, or concurrent imaging examinations were excluded by way of blinding. Tears of the rotator cuff were the positive findings of interest. Assessment of tear size and localization was done sonographically, and the results were compared with operative findings.All 24 full-thickness tears observed at surgery had been diagnosed correctly via sonography. In 19 of 20 cases with an intact rotator cuff, preoperative sonography was negative. Thirteen of 14 partial-thickness tears were not detected via sonography; 1 was misinterpreted as a full-thickness tear. Location of the tears relative to the rotator cuff tendons was described correctly in 21 of 25 cases. For tear size measurement, the 95% range of agreement was less than +/-1 cm.Blinded sonographic examination is effective in the detection and quantification of full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff but lacks sensitivity in the detection of partial-thickness tears.Imaging options for suspected rotator cuff disorder.The clinical role of shoulder ultrasound.Rotator cuff surgery is facilitated by accurate pre-operative information regarding the presence and size of cuff tears, and the extent of any cuff retraction or lamination.A total of 117 consecutive patients who underwent shoulder ultrasound followed by surgical management were assessed, and the pre-operative ultrasound diagnoses were correlated with the operative findings.Ultrasound was found to be reliable for the detection of full-thickness cuff tears (positive predictive value 96%). In the assessment of partial thickness tears, ultrasound produced few false positives, but failed to diagnose a significant proportion of these lesions. Lamination and other interstitial cuff pathology were not reliably detected by ultrasound. In the diagnosis of subacromial impingement, ultrasound produced few false positives (positive predictive value 95%), but did produce a significant number of false negative results (negative predictive value 66%).Ultrasound is cheaper than MRI and arthrography, and is both non-invasive and 'dynamic'. It is reliable in the diagnosis of full-thickness cuff tears and is a useful adjunct in the diagnosis of cuff impingement and partial thickness tears, but is very much operator-dependent.A 'one-stop clinic' for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff pathology: Getting the right diagnosis first time.We have introduced a one-stop clinic for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff tears (RCTs). The aim of the study was to determine the effect of the one-stop clinic on the interval and delay in management for patients with suspected rotator cuff pathology.Seventy-four patients were reviewed retrospectively; 39 had an ultrasound of the shoulder before (group 1), and 35 patients after (group 2) the new protocol was introduced. Patients in group 2 had a shoulder ultrasound scan (USS) on the day of their clinic appointment or beforehand based upon the General Practitioners (GP) letter. Indications included patients over the age of 30, or patients with a history of trauma or a painful shoulder.Twenty-four patients were diagnosed with RCTs on USS with an overall sensitivity of 93.75%, specificity 100% and accuracy of 91% for full thickness tears. Clinical detection alone had an overall sensitivity of 80%, a specificity of 91% and accuracy of 87%. Mean time from GP referral to definitive management plan was 6.49 months (SD 2.74) in group 1, compared with 4.63 months (SD 1.43) in group 2 with an overall reduction in half the number of clinic appointments. This was statistically significant (p < 0.001).Ultrasound scan of the shoulder is an accurate and reliable method of detecting full thickness RCTs. The one-stop clinic significantly shortened the interval between GP referral and definitive management.[MRI in subacromial pathology. Report of 20 cases].The authors report the results of MRI performed in 20 patients presenting clinical symptoms of subacromial pathology. The MRI results are correlated to the results of arthrography or arthro CT scan and also to surgical results. MRI is an excellent technique if a precise protocol with T2 weighted images is respected in order to visualize tears or minor perforations of the supraspinatus muscle.Comparison of indirect isotropic MR arthrography and conventional MR arthrography of labral lesions and rotator cuff tears: a prospective study.The purpose of our study was to prospectively compare the diagnostic accuracy of 3D isotropic indirect MR arthrography with conventional sequences of indirect MR arthrography for the diagnosis of labral and rotator cuff lesions on a 3-T MR unit.Thirty-six consecutive patients who were scheduled for shoulder arthroscopic surgery at our institution underwent indirect MR arthrography. Both conventional sequences and an additional 3D isotropic sequence were obtained 1 day before arthroscopic surgery. Two musculoskeletal radiologists prospectively evaluated the images in consensus for the presence of superior and anterior labral lesions and subscapularis and supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon tears using the conventional sequences and the 3D isotropic sequence. We analyzed the statistical difference between the sensitivities and specificities of both methods using arthroscopic findings as the reference standard.Surgical findings confirmed the presence of 23 superior labral lesions, eight anterior labral lesions, 21 subscapularis tears, and 24 supraspinatus-infraspinatus tears. The sensitivity and specificity of the conventional sequences were 74% and 54% for superior labral lesions, 88% and 96% for anterior labral lesions, 67% and 85% for subscapularis tendon tears, and 96% and 75% for supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon tears. The sensitivity and specificity of the 3D isotropic sequence were 70% and 85% for superior labral lesions, 100% and 100% for anterior labral lesions, 67% and 85% for subscapularis tendon tears, and 96% and 67% for supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon tears. No statistically significant difference was seen in sensitivities and specificities for both methods.Three-dimensional isotropic MR arthrography sequences with multiplanar reconstruction can provide a similar capability for the diagnosis of labral and rotator cuff lesions as conventional MR arthrography sequences but in a shorter imaging time.Effect of arm rotation on MR imaging of the rotator cuff.The effect of humeral rotation on the appearance of the rotator cuff tendon in oblique coronal magnetic resonance images was evaluated in 70 such images. Internal rotation produced overlap of the supraspinatus and infraspinatus tendons with soft-tissue interposition or apparent discontinuity of the tendon in 22 cases, including 14 of 15 shoulders positioned in the first 30 degrees between extreme internal and external rotation. Imaging in internal rotation makes assessment of the tendon difficult and should be avoided.Sonography for the office screening of suspected rotator cuff tears: early experience of the orthopedic surgeon.This study examined the feasibility of orthopedic surgeons performing sonography of the shoulder at the initial office evaluation of the rotator cuff and assessed the sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value of sonography for the detection of tears in the rotator cuff. Initial results in 24 patients suggest that sonography by the orthopedic surgeon is feasible and that it detects tears in the rotator cuff with sufficient accuracy for clinical decision making.One-shot CT and MR arthrography of the shoulder with a mixture of iodinated and paramagnetic contrast agents using arthroscopy as a gold standard.Our aim was to perform computed tomography arthrography (CTA) and magnetic resonance arthrography (MRA) of the shoulder as a one-shot examination and to evaluate its value on the basis of arthroscopy as a gold standard.Fifteen men and 16 women with planned arthroscopy for chronic (n=17) or traumatic tear of the rotator cuff (n=8), congenital atraumatic (n=1) or traumatic glenohumeral instability (n=2), traumatic tear of the rotator cuff with glenohumeral instability (n=1), or "frozen shoulder" (n=2) underwent plain helical CT in neutral position and intra-articular CT-guided injection of a mixture of iodinated and paramagnetic contrast agents (gadodiamide at 1:250 and iobitridol 350 at 1:5 in 20 ml of saline solution). CT helical scans in intra- and extrarotation and T1-weighted MRA scans in the neutral position were obtained. CTA and MRA were evaluated separately and jointly (CTA-MRA) in different blinded sessions, giving a 0-3 score to the agreement of CTA, MRA, and CTA-MRA with arthroscopy.The injected volume of the solution ranged from 10 to 24 ml. No side effects were observed. CTA obtained a score of 2.33+/-0.62, MRA 2.47+/-0.52, and CTA-MRA 2.67+/-0.49. Significant differences were found for CTA-MRA versus CTA (p=0.0281) and MRA (p=0.0277). There was no significant difference for CTA versus MRA.CTA and MRA can be performed as a one-shot exam. CTA-MRA seems to give more information than CTA or MRA separately.Horizontal component of partial-thickness tears of rotator cuff: imaging characteristics and comparison of ABER view with oblique coronal view at MR arthrography initial results.To determine the characteristics of horizontal components of partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff at magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography and to determine whether use of the abduction and external rotation (ABER) position improved detection of a horizontal component in partial-thickness tears.MR studies in 16 patients (mean age, 32 years) who had partial-thickness tear with a horizontal component were retrospectively evaluated. All 16 patients had undergone arthroscopic surgery. The depth and extent of the horizontal component were measured on MR images, and the presence or absence of articular surface tear was recorded. The characteristics of the horizontal component on ABER views were compared with those on oblique coronal views.A horizontal component (24 lesions; one tendon involved in eight patients and two tendons involved in eight patients) was observed in 100% of the lesions on ABER views and in 21% of the lesions (n = 5) on oblique coronal images. The mean length of the horizontal components, measured on ABER views, was 1.9 cm (range, 0.6-4.5 cm). Thirteen (54%) of the 24 lesions were classified as grade I (<3 mm) in depth, four (17%) were classified as grade II (3-6 mm), and seven (29%) were classified as grade III (>6 mm). Articular separation sites with a flap lesion were visualized in 15 (62%) of 24 lesions on ABER views.MR arthrography of the shoulder with patients in the ABER position may provide additional information in cases of partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff with a horizontal component.Diagnosis of partial and complete rotator cuff tears using combined gradient echo and spin echo imaging.Most magnetic resonance (MR) studies evaluating the rotator cuff for tears have used T2-weighted imaging in the coronal oblique and sagittal oblique planes. T2*-weighted gradient echo imaging, however, has advantages over spin echo imaging, including contiguous slices without cross-talk, high contrast around the cuff, and intrinsically shorter imaging times which can be used to increase the number of signals averaged and thus improve the signal-to-noise ratio. We reviewed the shoulder MR scans of 87 consecutive patients who underwent both a MR scan and a shoulder arthroscopy during which the size of tears, if present, was graded. The reviewers were blinded as to the history and arthroscopic results. The MR scans included oblique coronal T2*-weighted gradient echo and oblique sagittal T2-weighted spin echo images. MR cuff grades were correlated with arthroscopic findings. For complete tears, the sensitivity of MR was 0.91 and the specificity 0.95. For partial tears, the sensitivity was 0.74 and the specificity 0.87. This accuracy is similar to two-plane T2-weighted imaging as previously reported in the literature. There was a statistically significant correlation (p < 0.0005) between the cuff grade as determined by MR and the arthroscopic findings.Isolated subacromial bursal fluid on MRI of the shoulder in symptomatic patients: correlation with arthroscopic findings.Fluid in the subacromial bursa (SAB) is a common finding on magnetic resonance (MR) images of the shoulder, and the implications of this finding have not been clarified. We retrospectively reviewed and correlated the MR features with arthroscopic findings in 21 symptomatic patients who had fluid in the SAB on MR imaging without demonstrable rotator cuff tear. Rotator cuff impingement was the most frequent surgical finding (42.9%). Other frequent surgical observations were glenoid labrum abnormality (28.6%), bursitis (19%), and supraspinatus tendinitis (14.3%). Distribution of acromial types was similar to that reported by Bigliani et al., and impingement was evenly distributed among acromial types in our study population. We conclude that in our patient population group the MR finding of isolated SAB fluid in symptomatic patients is highly likely to be associated with the finding of other abnormalities in the shoulder joint at surgery.US evaluation of the rotator cuff.Ultrasonographic (US) evaluation of the moving shoulder is a new method for evaluating the integrity of the rotator cuff. In the past, contrast arthrography has provided the only nonoperative technique for demonstrating defects in the rotator cuff. We present the details of this new technique and describe 79 patients whose US results were correlated with the findings at arthrography and/or surgery. US allows evaluation of both shoulders at once, an advantage over arthrography, where usually only one side is evaluated at a single sitting. Improvements in US instrumentation, especially the introduction of high-resolution linear-array devices and the use of experienced ultrasonographers, have improved the accuracy of US. Because US is rapid, safe, noninvasive, and inexpensive, we advocate its use instead of arthrography as the routine test of rotator cuff integrity.The hyperextended internal rotation view in rotator cuff ultrasonography.The significance of subacromial arthrography to verify partial bursal-side rotator cuff ruptures.The purpose of this study was to verify a partial bursa-side rupture of the rotator cuff (RC) using different imaging techniques with special emphasis on the validity of a specific method of subacromial arthrography (SAA).Patients (n=92, mean age 53.8 years) with a subacromial impingement syndrome underwent sonography, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and SAA. All diagnostic results were checked by subsequent arthroscopic surgery.Of 31 surgically verified ruptures, 17 showed a partial rupture located towards the bursa. These had been detected by MRI and ultrasound with a sensitivity of 64% and 41%, respectively, while SAA as a diagnostic tool yielded a sensitivity of 82%. In 14 cases of complete RC ruptures, all imaging techniques had a similar sensitivity of 86-93%.It appears that SAA is an adequate and valid diagnostic tool for the detection of partial bursa-sided RC ruptures. Ultrasound and MRI showed a comparably lower sensitivity. It is therefore concluded that SAA has clear advantages in the diagnosis of this defect with the consequence that open surgical techniques can be avoided.Ultrasonography of rotator cuff tears: a review of 500 diagnostic studies.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff has been shown to be of value in diagnosing rotator cuff tears. This report summarizes our experience with our first 500 diagnostic examinations. All patients were examined in the hyperextended internal rotation view with commercially available high-resolution real-time ultrasound equipment. Patients were diagnosed as having a rotator cuff tear if a focal echogenic lesion or a defect within the rotator cuff was identified. This study confirmed the value of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity all exceeded 90%, and correlated with surgical findings. This was better than arthrography in the same patient population. Ultrasound is an accurate noninvasive method of examining the rotator cuff for the presence of tears. We suggest that rotator cuff ultrasonography is the procedure of choice for the diagnosis of tears if adequate instrumentation is available.Ultrasonography of symptomatic rotator cuff tears compared with MR imaging and surgery.To compare the accuracy of ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging in the detection of rotator cuff tears.Ninety-six patients with clinically suspected rotator cuff pathology underwent ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder. The findings in 88 patients were compared with arthroscopy or open surgery.Full-thickness tear was confirmed in 57 cases, partial-thickness tear in 30 cases and degenerative changes without tear in 1. In all 57 cases of full-thickness tear and in 28 out of 30 cases of partial-thickness tear the supraspinatus tendon was involved. The accuracy in the detection of full-thickness tears was 98 and 100% for ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging, respectively. The accuracy in the detection of bursal or articular partial-thickness tears was 87 and 90% for ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging, respectively.In experienced hands ultrasonography should be considered as an accurate modality for the initial investigation of rotator cuff, especially supraspinatus, tears.Distinction between supraspinatus, infraspinatus and subscapularis tendon tears with ultrasound in 332 surgically confirmed cases.The aim of this retrospective study was to determine the diagnostic value of preoperative ultrasonography for the characterisation of size and location of the involved tendons. in 332 consecutive patients who underwent surgery, all preoperative ultrasonographic reports were reviewed and ultrasound (US) and surgical findings were compared. Ultrasound criteria for cuff tears were complete nonvisualisation of the cuff tendons or localised absence and focal discontinuity. In all but 12 cases, US diagnoses corresponded with intraoperative findings (sensitivity 98%, confidence interval 95.1-99.3; specificity 93%, CI 85.7-97.1; accuracy 97%, CI 93.8-98.1). Size and location of the tear were correctly predicted in 69 of 96 cases (accuracy 87%, sensitivity 89%, specificity 87%). US demonstrated less extensive tears than observed at surgery in 18%. Ultrasonography was highly accurate and sensitive for detecting rotator cuff tears, but seems to be a method of limited value for evaluation of the size of cuff tears, in particular, for the detection of small tears.MR arthrography of the shoulder: comparison of low-field (0.2 T) vs high-field (1.5 T) imaging.The objective of this study was to compare the image quality, sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic accuracy of an open low-field MR system (0.2 T) with a standard high-field MR system (1.5 T) after arthrography of the shoulder. Thirty-eight patients either with suspected chronic instability (n = 12) or rotator cuff abnormalities (n = 26) were examined. Intra-articular injection of diluted Gd-DTPA was followed in randomized order either first by imaging on an open 0.2-T system or on a 1.5-T system. The image material was evaluated independently by two radiologists in a blinded fashion with respect to overall image quality and the detection of rotator cuff as well as capsular and labral abnormalities. Surgical correlation was available in 27 (71%) of 38 patients. For both systems, sensitivity and specificity for rotator cuff tears were 100% each, and for labrum pathologies, these values were 100 and 93%, respectively. The agreement for detection of labral pathologies between low-field and high-field examinations was good (kappa = 0.69, kappa = 0.61). For the detection of full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff, the agreement between the low-field and high-field MR examinations was very good and significant (kappa = 0.94, kappa = 1, p < 0.001). Overall image quality was rated good in 17 (45%) and fair in 21 (55%) of 38 cases on the 0.2-T MR system, and good in 32 (84%) and fair in 6 (16%) of 38 cases on the 1.5-T system. Motion artifacts were considered low in 24 (63%) and moderate in 14 (37%) of 38 cases for the 0.2-T system and low in 34 (89%) and moderate in 4 (11%) for 1.5-T system. Based on our results, low-field MR compares favorably to high-field MR in the detection of major abnormalities of the glenohumeral joint, at least when MR arthrography is used. Disadvantages are the duration of the examination and thus the risk of reduced image quality caused by motion artifacts.[The value of MRI in the evaluation of lesions of the supraspinous muscle. Multicentric retrospective study of 66 records].Fat-suppression MR arthrography of the shoulder.US depiction of partial-thickness tear of the rotator cuff.To test previously defined ultrasound (US) criteria for identification of partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff.Before shoulder arthroscopy, 52 patients with shoulder pain for more than 3 months were examined with a 7.5-MHz commercially available linear-array transducer and a standardized study protocol. The criteria used to detect partial-thickness tears were (a) a mixed hyper- and hypoechoic focus in the crucial zone of the supraspinatus tendon and (b) a hypoechoic lesion visualized in two orthogonal imaging planes with either articular or bursal extension.The US findings were reported as partial-thickness tears in 17 shoulders, of which three were false-positive findings. There was one false-negative finding. The sensitivity of US in depiction of partial-thickness tears was 93%, and specificity was 94%. The positive predictive value was 82%, and the negative predictive value was 98%.US can depict most partial-thickness tears with use of the criteria described.Rotator cuff tear: clinical experience with sonographic detection.Between June 1986 and April 1988, 86 sonographic examinations of the shoulder were performed on patients suspected of having rotator cuff tears. Major sonographic diagnostic criteria included (a) a well-defined discontinuity usually visible as a hypoechoic focus within the cuff, (b) nonvisualization of the cuff and (c) an echogenic focus within the cuff. Seventy-five patients underwent both sonography and arthrography. Compared with arthrography alone, ultrasound examinations enabled detection of 92% of rotator cuff tears (24 of 26 tears), with a specificity of 84% and a negative predictive value of 95%. Correlation was obtained in 30 of these patients who underwent surgery for rotator cuff tear or other soft-tissue abnormality. In this group, the sensitivity of sonography for detection of a tear was 93%, with a specificity of 73%, while for arthrography sensitivity was 87% and specificity was 100%. These data indicate that sonography is a useful, noninvasive screening procedure for patients suspected of having rotator cuff injury.Rotator cuff sonography: a reassessment.This study is both a retrospective and prospective evaluation of the clinical usefulness of shoulder sonography. Ninety-eight patients suspected of having rotator cuff tears underwent sonography of both shoulders. Sixty-two patients underwent double-contrast arthrography performed on the same day as sonography, and 38 patients underwent surgery after sonography. A comparison of the results from ultrasound and arthrography, using published diagnostic criteria, demonstrated a sensitivity of 75% and a specificity of 43% for detection of a rotator cuff tear. In this study, use of more restricted criteria, a subset of the published criteria, yielded a sensitivity of 68% and a specificity of 90%. A comparison of sonography with surgery, using this study's criteria, demonstrated a sensitivity of 57% and a specificity of 76%. This report shows that shoulder sonography is less reliable than previously reported and appears to have a very limited role in the evaluation of rotator cuff injuries.Comparative studies of MRI and operative findings in rotator cuff tear.A prospective study was performed to determine the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) compared with operative findings in the evaluation of patients associated with rotator cuff tears. Fifty-four of 60 shoulders (58 patients) examined by MRI were confirmed as full-thickness tears and 6 as partial-thickness tears at the time of surgery. The oblique coronal, oblique sagittal, and axial planes of T2-weighted images with the 0.5 tesla MRI system were obtained preoperatively and compared with operative findings. MRI correctly identified 46 of 54 full-thickness rotator cuff tears and 5 of 6 partial-thickness tears. A comparison of MRI and operative findings in full-thickness cuff tears showed a sensitivity of 85%, a specificity of 83%, and a positive prospective value (PPV) of 99%. A comparison of partial-thickness tears showed a sensitivity of 83%, a specificity of 85%, and PPV of 39%. Linear regression analysis showed an excellent correlation between the MRI assessment and measurement at the time of surgery (r = 0.90, P < 0.01). MRI was useful in evaluating large and medium-sized rotator cuff tears, but less useful in distinguishing small full-thickness tears from partial-thickness tears.Role of community diagnostic ultrasound examination in the diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears.Diagnostic ultrasound examination has become the most commonly used investigation in Australia for diagnosing rotator cuff tears. The authors felt that the results of such investigations were often inaccurate in their clinical practices.The diagnostic ultrasound findings in 336 cases were compared to arthrography, and in 225 cases findings at surgery.A very poor accuracy rate of 0.38 was found for diagnostic ultrasound examination. The sensitivity was 0.24 and specificity was 0.61.Extreme caution is recommended in the use of diagnostic ultrasound, as currently practised in a general community setting, in diagnosing full-thickness rotator cuff tears.Comparison study of indirect MR arthrography and direct MR arthrography of the shoulder.To compare the diagnostic value of indirect magnetic resonance arthrography (I-MRA) with that of direct MR arthrography (D-MRA) for labral tears, rotator cuff tears, and long head of biceps tendon (LHBT) tears using a 3-T MR unit.Institutional review board approval was given; written informed consent was obtained from all patients. From November 2005 to June 2006, 19 patients (eight men and 11 women; mean age, 51 years) who had undergone both I-MRA and D-MRA underwent arthroscopic surgery. Both methods were performed in fat-saturated axial, coronal oblique, and sagittal oblique T1-weighted sequences, as well as axial and coronal oblique T2-weighted sequences. Two radiologists independently and retrospectively evaluated two sets of MRA for the diagnosis of superior and anterior labral tears, subscapularis tendon (SSC), and supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon (SSP-ISP) tears, and LHBT tears. With the arthroscopic finding as a gold standard, we analyzed statistical differences of sensitivities and specificities between two sets of MRA and inter-observer agreement was evaluated using the kappa value.The sensitivity and specificity of I-MRA and D-MRA for reader 1 were 79/80% and 71/80%, respectively, for superior labral tears; 100/100% and 100/100%, respectively, for anterior labral tears; 64/75% and 64/100%, respectively, for SSC tears; 100/86% and 100/100%, respectively, for SSP-ISP tears; and 67/100% and 78/100%, respectively, for LHBT tears. Those of I-MRA and D-MRA for reader 2 were 86/80% and 71/100%, respectively, for superior labral tears; 100/83% and 100/100%, respectively, for anterior labral tears; 64/88% and 82/100%, respectively, for SSC tears; 92/86% and 100/100%, respectively, for SSP-ISP tears; and 78/90% and 89/100%, respectively, for LHBT tears. No significant differences were found between the methods. Inter-observer agreements were higher than moderate (kappa > 0.41) with both methods.Based on a relatively small number of patients, no significant difference was detected between I-MRI and D-MRI with regard rotator cuff, labral, and LHBT tears.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder.Accuracy of fat-suppressed MR imaging of the shoulder for detection of partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.MR imaging diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Thirty-one symptomatic patients were studied with MR imaging to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of shoulder MR in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Correlative studies included arthroscopy in 19 patients and arthrography in 12 patients. Images were obtained on either a 0.5- or 1.5-T Philips superconducting magnet using spin-echo pulse sequences (650-850/30 [TR, TE], 2000/30, 100) with 5-mm slices oriented in an oblique coronal plane perpendicular to the glenohumeral joint. The MR studies were initially interpreted without knowledge of the results of other diagnostic procedures. The MR diagnosis of cuff tear was made when irregularity, discontinuity, and increased signal were identified in the rotator cuff. MR images showed tears in 10 patients (32%) and were negative for tear in 21 patients (68%). MR correlated with arthroscopy and arthrography in 17 of 18 normal patients, in eight of 10 patients with complete tears, and in one of three patients with partial tears. For complete rotator cuff tears, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 80%, 94%, and 89%, respectively. For all tears (partial and complete), the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 69%, 94%, and 84%, respectively. These data suggest that MR imaging is an accurate procedure for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tears. The number of partial tears (three) in this series is too small to evaluate the value of MR imaging in the diagnosis of partial tears.Value of ultrasonography in preoperative diagnosis of rotator cuff tears and postoperative follow-up.Four hundred and six patients presenting with shoulder pain underwent bilateral shoulder ultrasonography. Rotator cuff lesions were diagnosed in 197 patients. In 155 of the 308 patients who had additional arthrographic examinations, the arthrogram documented rotator cuff tears. Sixty-eight patients underwent surgery. There was good correlation between the ultrasonographic and arthrographic findings as well as the surgical results, with a sensitivity of 91% for each examination technique. Thirty-six postoperative patients were studied ultrasonographically; a minor to marked increase in rotator cuff echogenicity was demonstrated in them all. Its high predictive value makes ultrasonography the method of choice in diagnosing rotator cuff tears. Based on the evaluation of particular criteria, rotator cuff tears (greater than 1 cm) are commonly documented by ultrasonography. Only in patients with indeterminate or negative ultrasonograms in whom there is a high index of clinical suspicion, should arthrography be performed as a complementary imaging test. In postoperative follow-up the degree of scar formation at the reinsertion of the tendon is adequately documented by ultrasonography.Ultrasonography for diagnosis of rotator cuff tear.In this study the clinical usefulness of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears was assessed. One hundred twenty-two patients undergoing preoperative ultrasonography were evaluated surgically. Three different ultrasonographic machines were applied with a 7.5-MHz linear-array transducer. Surgery confirmed a sensitivity of 79% for full-thickness tears and 50% for partial thickness tears. In 73 patients with negative ultrasonographic findings, the specificity was 100% for full-thickness tears and 90% for partial-thickness tears. The diagnostic sensitivity for full-thickness tears of the Hitachi EUB-340 system was significantly lower than those of Hitachi EUB-415 and EUB-515, and thus the former cannot be recommended for detection of rotator cuff tears. The sensitivity with regard to partial-thickness tears was also significantly lower with the Hitachi EUB-340 system as compared to the Hitachi EUB-515. There were no significant differences in false-positive rate among the three machines used. In conclusion, accurate ultrasonographic diagnosis of rotator cuff tear requires a high-resolution machine, as well as considerable experience in interpretation.Intraarticular findings in the chronically painful shoulder. A study of 32 posttraumatic cases.32 consecutive patients suffering from chronic shoulder pain for more than 6 months after a single, nondislocating shoulder trauma were examined clinically and by special radiographs, dynamic sonography, MRI and arthroscopy. Typical complaints were pain during loading, especially during over the head activities. Symptoms of a "dead arm" and instability were also present. Patients with previous dislocations, traumas or radiographic signs of degenerative shoulder lesions were excluded. The patients had a decreased active range of motion and positive signs of apprehension and impingement, but only 4 had clinical signs of shoulder instability. Diagnostic evaluation identified labral tears, partial and total rotator cuff lesions with subacromial impingement and tendinitis of the biceps tendon. Surgery was performed in 24 patients, using capsulolabral and rotator cuff reconstruction, arthroscopic labral resection and open subacromial decompression. In conclusion, patients with chronic posttraumatic shoulder pain have intraarticular injuries, especially tears of the glenoid labrum. History, clinical findings, radiography and sonography are seldom diagnostic. MRI is valuable, particularly for identification of labral pathology, but arthroscopy appears necessary for a preoperative assessment.[The sensitivity and specificity of sonographic examination in detection of rotator cuff tear].Sonographic examination was performed in 72 patients (74 shoulders) suffering from different shoulder diseases. The results were correlated with findings obtained during subsequent surgery in 57 patients (58 shoulders) and arthrography in 15 cases (16 shoulders). Rotator cuff tear was proved during surgical procedure in 37 patients (38 shoulders). The sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography in detection of cuff tear was 98.2% and 90% respectively. In case of partial cuff tear ultrasonography had lower sensitivity--50% while specificity was 96.3%. In detection of supraspinatus tendon tear the ultrasound sensitivity was 100% and specificity 95.6%, in case of infraspinatus tear sensitivity was 66.7% and specificity 94% while for subscapularis tear these values were equal 75% and 98.1%. The size of sonographically estimated cuff defect correlated properly with intrasurgical measurement in 76.3% of all cases.Sonography for diagnosis of rotator cuff tear. Comparison with observations at surgery in 58 shoulders.To investigate the correlation between ultrasonographic and anatomic changes of the rotator cuff of the shoulder, we studied the findings in 58 surgical cases. Fifteen cases had a full thickness tear, 10 of which had a positive and 5 a negative ultrasonogram. Nine cases had partial tears of the cuff on the bursal side. Ultrasonographically, 3 of these were normal. Among the 34 cases that proved to be normal at surgery, 9 had positive ultrasonograms. The predictive value of a negative examination was 0.8, whereas the predictive value of a positive examination was 0.6. A cautious attitude towards ultrasonography for evaluation of the rotator cuff seems appropriate.Shoulder Ultrasound vs MRI for rotator cuff pathology.[Rotator cuff tears: value of 3.0T MRI].To demonstrate the value of 3.0T MR imaging for the detection of rotator cuff tendon tears and surgical planning by correlating imaging findings to surgical findings. Materials and methods. Prospective follow-up of patients who underwent 3.0T MR imaging of the shoulder in our department between November 2005 and June 2007. Surgical findings were correlated to imaging findings for 48 patients who underwent surgery: detection, size, partial thickness or complete, and tendon edges.In this patient group, the positive predictive value of MRI for detecting surgical tears was 100% (100% of complete tears and 92% of partial thickness tears). No change in surgical management was recorded when arthroscopy was performed based on MRI findings (size of tear).3.0 T MRI is valuable for the detection of small tears, especially for partial thickness tears due to increased spatial resolution. The identification of surgical candidates and surgical planning are improved due to more accurate measurements of tear size and quality of the tendon edges.Ultrasound compared with magnetic resonance imaging for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears: a critically appraised topic.Comparison study of indirect MR arthrography and direct MR arthrography of the shoulder.To compare the diagnostic value of indirect magnetic resonance arthrography (I-MRA) with that of direct MR arthrography (D-MRA) for labral tears, rotator cuff tears, and long head of biceps tendon (LHBT) tears using a 3-T MR unit.Institutional review board approval was given; written informed consent was obtained from all patients. From November 2005 to June 2006, 19 patients (eight men and 11 women; mean age, 51 years) who had undergone both I-MRA and D-MRA underwent arthroscopic surgery. Both methods were performed in fat-saturated axial, coronal oblique, and sagittal oblique T1-weighted sequences, as well as axial and coronal oblique T2-weighted sequences. Two radiologists independently and retrospectively evaluated two sets of MRA for the diagnosis of superior and anterior labral tears, subscapularis tendon (SSC), and supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon (SSP-ISP) tears, and LHBT tears. With the arthroscopic finding as a gold standard, we analyzed statistical differences of sensitivities and specificities between two sets of MRA and inter-observer agreement was evaluated using the kappa value.The sensitivity and specificity of I-MRA and D-MRA for reader 1 were 79/80% and 71/80%, respectively, for superior labral tears; 100/100% and 100/100%, respectively, for anterior labral tears; 64/75% and 64/100%, respectively, for SSC tears; 100/86% and 100/100%, respectively, for SSP-ISP tears; and 67/100% and 78/100%, respectively, for LHBT tears. Those of I-MRA and D-MRA for reader 2 were 86/80% and 71/100%, respectively, for superior labral tears; 100/83% and 100/100%, respectively, for anterior labral tears; 64/88% and 82/100%, respectively, for SSC tears; 92/86% and 100/100%, respectively, for SSP-ISP tears; and 78/90% and 89/100%, respectively, for LHBT tears. No significant differences were found between the methods. Inter-observer agreements were higher than moderate (kappa > 0.41) with both methods.Based on a relatively small number of patients, no significant difference was detected between I-MRI and D-MRI with regard rotator cuff, labral, and LHBT tears.Comparison of indirect isotropic MR arthrography and conventional MR arthrography of labral lesions and rotator cuff tears: a prospective study.The purpose of our study was to prospectively compare the diagnostic accuracy of 3D isotropic indirect MR arthrography with conventional sequences of indirect MR arthrography for the diagnosis of labral and rotator cuff lesions on a 3-T MR unit.Thirty-six consecutive patients who were scheduled for shoulder arthroscopic surgery at our institution underwent indirect MR arthrography. Both conventional sequences and an additional 3D isotropic sequence were obtained 1 day before arthroscopic surgery. Two musculoskeletal radiologists prospectively evaluated the images in consensus for the presence of superior and anterior labral lesions and subscapularis and supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon tears using the conventional sequences and the 3D isotropic sequence. We analyzed the statistical difference between the sensitivities and specificities of both methods using arthroscopic findings as the reference standard.Surgical findings confirmed the presence of 23 superior labral lesions, eight anterior labral lesions, 21 subscapularis tears, and 24 supraspinatus-infraspinatus tears. The sensitivity and specificity of the conventional sequences were 74% and 54% for superior labral lesions, 88% and 96% for anterior labral lesions, 67% and 85% for subscapularis tendon tears, and 96% and 75% for supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon tears. The sensitivity and specificity of the 3D isotropic sequence were 70% and 85% for superior labral lesions, 100% and 100% for anterior labral lesions, 67% and 85% for subscapularis tendon tears, and 96% and 67% for supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon tears. No statistically significant difference was seen in sensitivities and specificities for both methods.Three-dimensional isotropic MR arthrography sequences with multiplanar reconstruction can provide a similar capability for the diagnosis of labral and rotator cuff lesions as conventional MR arthrography sequences but in a shorter imaging time.3-T MRI of the shoulder: is MR arthrography necessary?The purpose of this study is to report the diagnostic sensitivity of 3-T conventional MRI versus MR arthrography of the shoulder in the same patient population.One hundred fifty consecutive conventional shoulder MRI and MR arthrography examinations performed on patients 50 years or younger who subsequently underwent arthroscopy were reviewed retrospectively by consensus reading by two musculoskeletal radiologists. All patients selected for arthroscopy had abnormal findings on clinical examination and MRI or MR arthrography. All 150 patients were referred from one orthopedic group. All patients consented to undergo both MRI and MR arthrography. None had undergone prior shoulder surgery. Full- or partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, superior labral anterior-to-posterior (SLAP) tears, and anterior or posterior labral tears were assessed.Three full-thickness and nine partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, seven SLAP tears, six anterior labral tears, and two posterior labral tears were seen on MR arthrography but not on conventional MRI. All additional MR arthrography findings were confirmed at arthroscopy. On conventional MRI, sensitivities and specificities compared with arthroscopy were as follows: anterior labral tear, 83% sensitivity and 100% specificity; posterior labral tear, 84% and 100%; SLAP tear, 83% and 99%; supraspinatus tendon tear, 92% and 100%; partial-thickness articular surface tear, 68% and 100%; and partial-thickness bursal surface tear, 84% and 100%. On MR arthrography, sensitivities and specificities compared with arthroscopy were as follows: anterior labral tear, 98% sensitivity and 100% specificity; posterior labral tear, 95% and 100%; SLAP tear, 98% and 99%; supraspinatus tendon tear, 100% and 100%; partial-thickness articular surface tear, 97% and 100%; and partial-thickness bursal surface tear, 84% and 100%. MR arthrography showed a statistical improvement in sensitivity (p<0.05) for detection of partial-thickness articular surface supraspinatus tears, anterior labral tears, and SLAP tears at 3 T.In this series, MR arthrography showed statistically significant increased sensitivity for detection of partial-thickness articular surface supraspinatus tears, anterior labral tears, and SLAP tears compared with conventional MRI at 3 T. On the basis of the above findings, we perform 3-T MR arthrography on patients for whom anterior labral tears, SLAP tears, and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears are suspected clinically.Symptomatic partial rotator cuff tears: diagnostic performance of ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging with surgical correlation.The painful shoulder is a relatively common clinical entity that may be attributed to a variety of pathologies, including partial rotator cuff tears. Conservative treatment or surgical intervention may be offered, depending on the extent of the partial tear and the degree of patient discomfort.To apply ultrasound (US) imaging in order to evaluate the prevalence of partial rotator cuff tears in patients with painful shoulders.Fifty-six patients (17 men, 39 women; mean age 53.7 years) were included in the study, with symptomatic impingement syndrome of the shoulder after having failed to respond to conservative treatment. All patients underwent US and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scans prior to surgical intervention.Arthroscopy or mini-open surgery revealed 53 cases with partial tears of the rotator cuff and three with extensive tendinopathy. Both imaging modalities detected successfully 44 cases of partial tears of the supraspinatus tendon. US imaging yielded a sensitivity of 95.6%, a specificity of 70%, an accuracy of 91%, and a positive predictive accuracy of 93.6%. The corresponding values for MRI were 97.7%, 63.6%, 91%, and 91.7%, respectively.US imaging can be considered almost equally effective in detecting partial tears of the rotator cuff compared to MRI, particularly located in the area of the supraspinatus tendon. MRI may be reserved for doubtful or complex cases, in which delineation of adjacent structures is mandatory prior to surgical intervention.[Shoulder injuries in overhead athletes: utility of MR arthrography].The goal of this work was to assess the accuracy of the MR-Arthrografie in the evaluation of over head athletes injuries in comparison with athroscopy.In 29 patients (middle age: 30 years, 21 male, 8 female, age 16 - 53 years) with persistent pain after conservative therapy an Arthro-MRI with intraarticular application of gadolinum was performed prior to arthroscopic surgery. The MRI was retrospectivly analysed of three examiners independently from one another. The result were compared to the results of the Arthroscopy. Interrater Reliability was calculated by using of Cohens Kappa.The MR-Arthrography could demonstrate 8 of 9 (88.9 %) partial tears of he rotator cuff. All SLAP (Superiores Labrum from Anterior to Posterior) Lesions as well as all bankart type Lesions were recognized through the MR-Arthrography. However, dependent upon the experience of the examiner in a span between 33.3 % (fellow radiologist) and 93.3 % (consultant radiologist). We found a high agreement between consultant radiologist and shoulder surgeon with Kappa of 0.79 for rotator cuff tear-, 0.86 for Bankart- and 0.82 for SLAP-Lsionen.[Shoulder joint disorder: correlation of findings by arthroscopy and magnetic resonance imaging].To evaluate the efficacy of magnetic resonance (MR) examination in intra- and extra- articular shoulder disorders, in comparison with arthroscopic findings, in patients with both acute injuries and chronic problems of the shoulder.Conventional MR images and MR arthrograms of the shoulder were obtained in 35 patients treated between January 2004 and January 2006. Each MR image was evaluated by five radiologists experienced in assessing findings on the musculoskeletal system. Subsequently, the patients underwent shoulder arthroscopy performed by shoulder arthroscopy surgeons. Each detailed arthroscopic report was compared with the pre-operative MR findings, and the sensitivity and specificity of MR examination were calculated. The arthroscopic findings served as standards of reference for comparison.SLAP lesions were found intra-operatively in seven out of the 35 patients (20 %). MR sensitivity was 43 % (3 to 7 patients) and specificity was 96 % (27 to 28). The accuracy of MR for SLAP lesion diagnosis was 86 % (30 of 35 patients). Tears in the anterior labrum were diagnosed by arthroscopy in 16 of 35 patients (46 %); MR sensitivity was 44 % (7 of 16 patients) and specificity was 89 % (17 of 19). The accuracy of MR for diagnosing labral tears was 68 % (24 of 35 patients).When designing our study, we tried to avoid limitations of similar investigations. We employed a nuclear magnetic resonance system with high resolution and standardized both the arthroscopic technique and the evaluation of MR images. Our results of diagnosing rotator cuff disorders and SLAP lesions are in agreement with those of other relevant studies. The limitation of our study was a small size of the group.Although MR imaging is a sensitive method suitable for diagnosing some shoulder disorders, the MR imaging of SLAP lesions and labral tears does not give results accurate enough to be used for pre-operative planning.[Role of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of shoulder joint injury].To define the role of ultrasonography in the diagnostic algorithm for patients with shoulder joint injury and to show its potential for the detection of rotator cuff tears and Hill-Sachs lesions.A group of 52 patients with clinical signs of shoulder disorders following trauma who were treated in the 2005-2006 period. After ultrasonographic examination, all patients were surgically treated by arthroscopy. In 12 of them an additional magnetic resonance imaging was carried out before surgery. The results of ultrasonography were compared with arthroscopic findings in terms of detection of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and Hill-Sachs lesions. These were the two most frequent traumatic lesions detected by ultrasonography.A full-thickness tear of the rotator cuff was correctly diagnosed in 13 patients. In further four the ultrasound finding was incorrectly interpreted as a moderate rotator cuff injury. For the detection of full-thickness tears, the sensitivity of the method was 76 %, its specificity was 94 % and accuracy 88 %. The detection of Hill-Sachs lesions by ultrasonography correlated with arthroscopic findings, with a sensitivity of 86 %, specificity of 93 % and accuracy of 92 %.A number of studies report on options for the ultrasonographic detection of various types of traumatic injury to shoulder structures. Examination by ultrasound shows skeletal surfaces, thus permitting detection of a minor bone injury or a Hill- Sachs defect, and reveals soft tissue shoulder structures including tendons, ligaments and bursae. In some studies the possibility of detecting rotator cuff tears by ultrasonography has been described. Although sufficient accuracy of ultrasonographic examination in this region is reported, the results are not consistent.Our results show high reliability of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of shoulder trauma. The detection of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and Hill-Sachs lesions was possible with sufficient accuracy, which makes this quick, simple and available examination a valuable diagnostic tool. The finding of a rotator cuff tear is important information for the orthopaedist and, in the majority of patients, is also an indication for surgery. An ultrasonographic examination can therefore be regarded as a standard part of the diagnostic algorithm for shoulder trauma.A 'one-stop clinic' for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff pathology: Getting the right diagnosis first time.We have introduced a one-stop clinic for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff tears (RCTs). The aim of the study was to determine the effect of the one-stop clinic on the interval and delay in management for patients with suspected rotator cuff pathology.Seventy-four patients were reviewed retrospectively; 39 had an ultrasound of the shoulder before (group 1), and 35 patients after (group 2) the new protocol was introduced. Patients in group 2 had a shoulder ultrasound scan (USS) on the day of their clinic appointment or beforehand based upon the General Practitioners (GP) letter. Indications included patients over the age of 30, or patients with a history of trauma or a painful shoulder.Twenty-four patients were diagnosed with RCTs on USS with an overall sensitivity of 93.75%, specificity 100% and accuracy of 91% for full thickness tears. Clinical detection alone had an overall sensitivity of 80%, a specificity of 91% and accuracy of 87%. Mean time from GP referral to definitive management plan was 6.49 months (SD 2.74) in group 1, compared with 4.63 months (SD 1.43) in group 2 with an overall reduction in half the number of clinic appointments. This was statistically significant (p < 0.001).Ultrasound scan of the shoulder is an accurate and reliable method of detecting full thickness RCTs. The one-stop clinic significantly shortened the interval between GP referral and definitive management.[Ultrasound--a good alternative to MR in shoulder problems].The clinical utility of ultrasonography for rotator cuff disease, shoulder impingement syndrome and subacromial bursitis.Periarticular shoulder disorders are common in clinical practice, and diagnosis is often difficult. Medicare statistics indicate that between 2001 and 2006 the use of diagnostic shoulder ultrasonography increased significantly. Rotator cuff disease, shoulder impingement syndrome and subacromial bursitis are among the most common diagnoses reported on shoulder ultrasonography. Shoulder ultrasonography is useful in the diagnosis of full thickness tears, but its utility for other rotator cuff disorders, shoulder impingement syndrome and subacromial bursitis is less well established.Ultrasonography of symptomatic rotator cuff tears compared with MR imaging and surgery.To compare the accuracy of ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging in the detection of rotator cuff tears.Ninety-six patients with clinically suspected rotator cuff pathology underwent ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder. The findings in 88 patients were compared with arthroscopy or open surgery.Full-thickness tear was confirmed in 57 cases, partial-thickness tear in 30 cases and degenerative changes without tear in 1. In all 57 cases of full-thickness tear and in 28 out of 30 cases of partial-thickness tear the supraspinatus tendon was involved. The accuracy in the detection of full-thickness tears was 98 and 100% for ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging, respectively. The accuracy in the detection of bursal or articular partial-thickness tears was 87 and 90% for ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging, respectively.In experienced hands ultrasonography should be considered as an accurate modality for the initial investigation of rotator cuff, especially supraspinatus, tears.Can isotropic fast gradient echo imaging be substituted for conventional T1 weighted sequences in shoulder MR arthrography at 3 Tesla?To assess the practical utility of isotropic shoulder imaging in patients undergoing MR arthrography. Isotropic shoulder imaging can be performed in less than three minutes with use of fast gradients.Two experienced musculoskeletal radiologists retrospectively interpreted MR images of the shoulder in 100 consecutive patients undergoing MR arthrography of the shoulder. All patients underwent MRI of the shoulder in oblique coronal, oblique sagittal, and axial planes on a 3.0-Tesla MRI system. All patients had conventional fast spin-echo T1-weighted imaging. All patients also had thin section (0.4 mm) isotropic spoiled gradient echo images performed. A total of 67 of the 100 patients underwent subsequent arthroscopy and results were compared with MR interpretations.There were 41 full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, nine partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (seven articular surface and two bursal surface), 21 superior labral, 18 anterior labral, and seven posterior labral tears demonstrated by consensus retrospective reading of the 100 shoulder MR exams. There was no difference in interpretation of the isotropic images as compared to the conventionally acquired images in the oblique coronal, oblique sagittal, and axial planes. Some patients had more than one finding on each exam. A total of 67 patients went on to arthroscopy. There were 41 full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, nine partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, 21 superior labral, 18 anterior labral, and seven posterior labral tears demonstrated on arthroscopy. All full- and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears seen at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MR reading. A total of 19 out of the 21 patients with superior labral anterior posterior (SLAP) tears at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MR reading. A total of 16 of the 18 anterior labral tears and six of the seven posterior labral tears seen at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MR reading. Some of the 67 patients had more than one finding on arthroscopy.Isotropic imaging of the shoulder is practical in clinical imaging when performed with use of fast gradients on a 3-Tesla system. Isotropic imaging provides the same clinical information as conventional imaging and can be acquired in less than three minutes.Diagnostic accuracy of shoulder ultrasound performed by a single operator.Both diagnostic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) are used for investigation of the presence and severity of rotator cuff lesions. There is no consensus as to which is the more accurate and cost-effective study. We sought to examine the sensitivity of ultrasound, when used by one experienced radiologist with modern equipment. We compared the ultrasound and surgical results obtained from 68 patients. Ultrasound showed a sensitivity of 89% and specificity of 100% (Positive Predictive Value 100%) for full-thickness tears, and a sensitivity of 79% and specificity of 94% (Positive Predictive Value 87%) for partial-thickness tears. We found that shoulder ultrasound, in the hands of an experienced radiologist with the use of modern high-resolution equipment, is highly sensitive in differentiating complete tears and partial-thickness tears. Our results are similar to the best published results for MRI and given that ultrasound is significantly cheaper and more available, ultrasound by an experienced radiologist should be considered as a primary diagnostic tool for imaging the rotator cuff.MR imaging of delamination tears of the rotator cuff tendons.The objective was to describe the imaging appearances and location of delamination tears of the rotator cuff tendons on non-contrast conventional MR imaging.This study was reviewed and approved by our Institutional Review Board. The reports of 548 consecutive MR examinations of the shoulder were reviewed, looking for mention or description of delamination tears of the rotator cuff. The images of the identified cases were then reviewed by two radiologists to confirm the findings. Correlation with surgical and arthroscopic information was then performed. Delamination tears were defined as horizontal retraction of either the bursal or articular surface of the tendon, manifest as thickening of the torn retracted edge, and/or interstitial splitting of the tendon, manifest as fluid-like high signal intensity on fat-suppressed T2-weighted oblique coronal images.Fourteen cases of delamination tears were identified in 13 patients. Ten of the cases involved the supraspinatus tendon, all with articular surface involvement. Nine of these supraspinatus cases were isolated tears and one occurred as part of a full thickness tear. All 10 of these supraspinatus cases showed medial retraction of the articular surface of the tendon, with thickening of the retracted edge, and 5 of the 10 had a demonstrable horizontal cleft in the interstitium. Four cases involved the subscapularis tendon, with articular surface disruption in three and pure interstitial delamination in one. Medial subluxation of the tendon of the long head of the biceps was present in all four cases. No delamination tears occurred on the bursal surface. Only three of the 14 shoulders underwent surgical repair with one confirmation of supraspinatus delamination, one confirmation of a subscapularis tear that had become a full thickness tear 10 months after initial imaging and another interstitial subscapularis delamination that was not identified arthroscopically.Delamination tears occur most often in the supraspinatus tendon, and in our series always involved the articular surface of the tendon. Only half of these tears have a visible cleavage plane in the interstitium, but this cleavage plane is not necessary for diagnosis if the torn edge is retracted.Sonography of the rotator cuff in painful shoulders performed without knowledge of clinical information: results from 58 sonographic examinations with surgical correlation.To assess the value of sonography as an isolated diagnostic test for the detection and quantification of rotator cuff tears.Preoperative sonographic examination was performed on 58 shoulders. Key biases on sonographic interpretation such as history-taking, physical examination, or concurrent imaging examinations were excluded by way of blinding. Tears of the rotator cuff were the positive findings of interest. Assessment of tear size and localization was done sonographically, and the results were compared with operative findings.All 24 full-thickness tears observed at surgery had been diagnosed correctly via sonography. In 19 of 20 cases with an intact rotator cuff, preoperative sonography was negative. Thirteen of 14 partial-thickness tears were not detected via sonography; 1 was misinterpreted as a full-thickness tear. Location of the tears relative to the rotator cuff tendons was described correctly in 21 of 25 cases. For tear size measurement, the 95% range of agreement was less than +/-1 cm.Blinded sonographic examination is effective in the detection and quantification of full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff but lacks sensitivity in the detection of partial-thickness tears.3.0-T MRI of the supraspinatus tendon.MRI of the shoulder has been found to be highly sensitive and specific for detection of full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears at 1.5-T or lower field strength compared with arthroscopy. MRI of the shoulder at 3.0 T has not been specifically assessed. This study assesses the sensitivity and specificity of MRI at 3.0 T for supraspinatus tendon tears compared with arthroscopy.Two experienced musculoskeletal radiologists retrospectively reviewed MR images of the shoulder in 150 consecutive patients who had subsequent arthroscopy. All patients had oblique coronal and sagittal T1-weighted and fat-saturated T2-weighted axial, oblique coronal, and sagittal imaging performed. The radiologists interpreted the MR images by consensus without knowledge of the arthroscopy results. Scans were interpreted for full-thickness or partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears. If partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears were seen on MRI, the reviewers noted whether the partial-thickness tear was articular or bursal in location. The radiologists also separated the supraspinatus tendon tears into small (< 1 cm retraction from the humeral head) and large (> 1 cm retraction from the humeral head). All 150 patients went on to arthroscopy. After consensus review of the MR images, arthroscopy results were compared with consensus MR interpretations.Ninety-eight of the 150 patients had full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears at arthroscopy. Twenty-six of the 150 patients had partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears. Seventeen of these 26 partial-thickness tears were along the articular surface and nine were along the bursal surface. Ninety-six of 98 full-thickness tears seen at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MRI interpretation. All 26 partial-thickness tears seen at arthroscopy were seen at consensus MR interpretation; however, two of the partial-thickness articular surface tears seen at arthroscopy were interpreted as full-thickness tears on consensus MRI interpretation. Twenty-eight of the 98 full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears were small tears (< 1 cm retraction from the humeral head) on arthroscopy. Two of these 28 small tears seen on arthroscopy were not seen on consensus MRI interpretation. Twenty-six patients had intact supraspinatus tendons on both retrospective consensus MRI interpretation and at arthroscopy.MRI of the shoulder at 3.0 T is highly sensitive and specific compared with arthroscopy in the detection of full-thickness and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears.Rotator cuff tears: assessment with MR arthrography in 275 patients with arthroscopic correlation.We assessed the diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography in the diagnosis of articular-sided partial-thickness and full-thickness rotator cuff tears in a large symptomatic population. MR arthrograms obtained in 275 patients including a study group of 139 patients with rotator cuff tears proved by arthroscopy and a control group of 136 patients with arthroscopically intact rotator cuff tendons were reviewed in random order. MR imaging was performed on a 1.0 T system (Magnetom Expert, Siemens). MR arthrograms were analyzed by two radiologists in consensus for articular-sided partial-thickness and full-thickness tears of the supraspinatus, infraspinatus, and subscapularis tendons. At arthroscopy, 197 rotator cuff tears were diagnosed, including 105 partial-thickness (93 supraspinatus, nine infraspinatus, three subscapularis) and 92 full-thickness (43 supraspinatus, 20 infraspinatus, 29 subscapularis) tendon tears. For full-thickness tears, sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 96%, 99%, and 98%, respectively, and for partial tears 80%, 97%, and 95%, respectively. False negative and positive assessments in the diagnosis of articular-sided partial-thickness tears were predominantly [78% (35/45)] observed with small articular-sided (Ellman grade1) tendon tears. MR arthrography is highly accurate in the diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and is accurate in the diagnosis of articular-sided partial-thickness tears. Limitations in the diagnosis of partial-thickness tears are mainly restricted to small articular-sided tears (Ellman grade 1) due to difficulties in differentiation between fiber tearing, tendinitis, synovitic changes, and superficial fraying at tendon margins.Indirect MR arthrography of the shoulder: use of abduction and external rotation to detect full- and partial-thickness tears of the supraspinatus tendon.To evaluate prospectively the accuracy of indirect magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography for supraspinatus tendon tears during neutral positioning or abduction and external rotation (ABER) and neutral positioning.Informed consent was obtained in all patients, and the study was approved by the institutional review board. Indirect MR arthrography of the shoulder was performed in 51 symptomatic patients (14 female, 37 male; mean age, 47 years) in the neutral position (set 1) and in the neutral and ABER positions (set 2). Two readers independently interpreted both sets, and diagnoses were compared with arthroscopic findings. Diagnostic accuracy was calculated, and 95% confidence intervals were used to detect significant differences between sets. Diagnostic confidence was recorded by using a three-level confidence score. Differences between sets were evaluated by using the Wilcoxon signed rank test. Interobserver agreement was determined separately for each set and for all diagnoses, full-thickness tears, and partial-thickness tears.For full-thickness tears, there was no benefit to reading set 2. For reader 1, sensitivity and specificity were 95% and 100%, respectively, for set 1 and 100% and 100%, respectively, for set 2. For reader 2, sensitivity and specificity were 80% and 100%, respectively, for set 1 and 100% and 100%, respectively, for set 2. For partial-thickness tears, sensitivity was significantly higher after reading set 2. For reader 1, sensitivity and specificity were 71% and 88%, respectively, for set 1 and 93% and 100%, respectively, for set 2. For reader 2, sensitivity and specificity were 50% and 88%, respectively, for set 1 and 86% and 94%, respectively, for set 2. For both readers, diagnostic confidence for partial-thickness tears was significantly higher after reading set 2. After the interpretation of set 2, kappa values increased from 0.35 to 1.00 for full-thickness tears and from 0.12 to 0.63 for partial-thickness tears.Indirect MR arthrography with supplementary images obtained with patients in the ABER position significantly improved sensitivity and increased diagnostic confidence for partial-thickness tears of the supraspinatus tendon. Interobserver agreement was improved for both full- and partial-thickness tears.Images in clinical medicine. Rotator-cuff tear.One-shot CT and MR arthrography of the shoulder with a mixture of iodinated and paramagnetic contrast agents using arthroscopy as a gold standard.Our aim was to perform computed tomography arthrography (CTA) and magnetic resonance arthrography (MRA) of the shoulder as a one-shot examination and to evaluate its value on the basis of arthroscopy as a gold standard.Fifteen men and 16 women with planned arthroscopy for chronic (n=17) or traumatic tear of the rotator cuff (n=8), congenital atraumatic (n=1) or traumatic glenohumeral instability (n=2), traumatic tear of the rotator cuff with glenohumeral instability (n=1), or "frozen shoulder" (n=2) underwent plain helical CT in neutral position and intra-articular CT-guided injection of a mixture of iodinated and paramagnetic contrast agents (gadodiamide at 1:250 and iobitridol 350 at 1:5 in 20 ml of saline solution). CT helical scans in intra- and extrarotation and T1-weighted MRA scans in the neutral position were obtained. CTA and MRA were evaluated separately and jointly (CTA-MRA) in different blinded sessions, giving a 0-3 score to the agreement of CTA, MRA, and CTA-MRA with arthroscopy.The injected volume of the solution ranged from 10 to 24 ml. No side effects were observed. CTA obtained a score of 2.33+/-0.62, MRA 2.47+/-0.52, and CTA-MRA 2.67+/-0.49. Significant differences were found for CTA-MRA versus CTA (p=0.0281) and MRA (p=0.0277). There was no significant difference for CTA versus MRA.CTA and MRA can be performed as a one-shot exam. CTA-MRA seems to give more information than CTA or MRA separately.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff: a comparison with arthroscopy in one-hundred-and-ninety consecutive cases.To evaluate the accuracy of high-resolution ultrasonography compared to arthroscopy in the detection of rotator cuff tears.Preoperative ultrasonography (US) with a 10-MHz commercially available linear-array transducer and a standardized study protocol was performed in 190 consecutive shoulders in 185 patients with a history of shoulder pain for more than 3 months. The findings at US were classified into intact cuff, partial-thickness, and full-thickness rotator cuff tears, and correlated with findings at shoulder arthroscopy.US correctly depicted 118 of 124 rotator cuff tears with sensitivity 95%, specificity 94%, PPV 97%, NPV 91% and accuracy 95%, all 94 full-thickness tears (sensitivity 100%, specificity 91%, PPV 91%, NPV 100%, and accuracy 95%), 24 of 30 partial-thickness tears (sensitivity 80%, specificity 98%, PPV 86%, NPV 96%, and accuracy 95%).US is a highly accurate diagnostic method for detecting full-thickness rotator cuff tears, but is less sensitive in detecting partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.Use of preoperative magnetic resonance imaging to predict rotator cuff tear pattern and method of repair.To determine the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) criteria for predicting rotator cuff tear pattern and method of repair.Retrospective MRI/arthroscopy correlation.Sixty-six preoperative MRI scans were evaluated. The maximum medial to lateral length (L) of the tear was measured on T2-weighted coronal cuts. The maximum anterior to posterior width (W) was measured on T2-weighted sagittal cuts. The cases were divided into 3 groups: group 1, short-wide tears, L < or = W, L < 2 cm; group 2, long-narrow tears, L > W, W < 2 cm; and group 3, long-wide tears, L > or = 2 cm, W > or = 2 cm.Of the 66 MRI scans, 55 were adequate for standardized measurement. Group 1, 16 cases: 15 were found at arthroscopy to be crescent-shaped tears repaired end-to-bone; 1 was repaired with interval slides. Group 2, 22 cases: all 22 were repaired side-to-side/margin convergence. Group 3, 17 cases: 12 required interval slides, 1 partial repair was performed, and 4 were repaired side-to-side/margin convergence.Tear pattern and method of repair can be predicted on high-quality MRI scan. Group 1, L < or = W and L < 2 cm, predicts a crescent-shaped tear and end-to-bone repair (positive predictive value, 93.8%). Group 2, L > W and W < 2 cm, predicts a longitudinal tear and side-to-side/margin convergence repair (positive predictive value 100%). Group 3, L > or = 2 cm and W > or = 2 cm, predicts a massive contracted tear and that primary end-to-bone or side-to-side repairs are usually not possible and that interval slides or partial repair may be necessary (positive predictive value, 76.5%). The overall diagnostic model based on usable MRI scans significantly predicted arthroscopic findings (P < .001 for chi-square test).Level III, development of diagnostic criteria with universally applied reference (nonconsecutive patients).Shoulder impingement syndrome: relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic findings.Although there has been much research about imaging methods for shoulder impingement syndrome, the clinical information and upper limb level of disability have been generally ignored. The purpose of this study was to detect the relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic variables in patients with shoulder impingement syndrome.A cross-sectional, clinical, and radiologic study was planned and 59 shoulders of 58 consecutive patients waiting for physical therapy because of a clinically suspected shoulder impingement syndrome were included into this study. Comprehensive clinical examination, radiography, shoulder ultrasonography, and magnetic resonance imaging were performed in the same month.Despite the high sensitivities of ultrasonography for diagnosing rotator cuff tears (98.1%) and biceps pathologies (100%), magnetic resonance imaging was superior to ultrasonography in many important shoulder structures such as a glenoid labral tear and subacromial bursal effusion/hypertrophy (P < 0.01). These structures were the determinants of the shoulder's disability measured by disabilities of the arm, shoulder, and hand questionnaire.Ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging had comparable high accuracy for identifying the biceps pathologies and rotator cuff tears. The basic clinical tests had modest accuracy in both disorders. The choice of which imaging test to perform should be based on the patient's clinical information (regarding lesion of glenoid labrum, joint capsule, muscle, and bone), cost, and imaging experience of the radiology department.Diagnostic ultrasound of the shoulder--a method for experts only? Results from an orthopedic surgeon with relative inexpensive compared to operative findings.Diagnostic ultrasound examination of the shoulder is generally considered to require long experience. We examined the results of an orthopedic surgeon with little experience of ultrasound.A relatively inexperienced examiner performed preoperative ultrasound scanning of 79 patients with symptoms from the rotator cuff and/or the long head of the biceps muscle. Tears of the rotator cuff and rupture or dislocation of the long head of the biceps muscle were the positive findings of interest. Results were compared to operative findings.In 66 of 79 shoulders, ultrasonographic rotator cuff findings were confirmed at surgery (accuracy 84%). 20 of 26 full-thickness tears were diagnosed correctly. 6 of 7 partial-thickness tears were overlooked. Ultrasound was false positive in 1 case. For the long head of the biceps muscle, all 8 cases of dislocation or rupture of the tendon were diagnosed but differentiation between the two conditions was not possible in 2 cases.Our results may encourage orthopedic surgeons to start using ultrasound as a diagnostic technique for full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff and for pathology in the long head of the biceps muscle.Sonography and visualizing rotator cuff injuries in older people.Accuracy of office-based ultrasonography of the shoulder for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.This prospective multi-institutional study was designed to define the accuracy of ultrasonography, when performed in an orthopaedic surgeon's office, for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.An anatomic diagnosis and a treatment plan were made on the basis of office-based shoulder ultrasonography, physical examination, and radiographs for ninety-eight patients (ninety-nine shoulders) with a clinical diagnosis of a rotator-cuff-related problem. The results of the ultrasonographic studies were then compared with the results of magnetic resonance imaging and the operative findings.Office-based ultrasonography led to the correct diagnosis for thirty-seven (88%) of forty-two shoulders with a full-thickness rotator cuff tear or both full and partial-thickness tears, twenty-six (70%) of thirty-seven shoulders with a partial-thickness rotator cuff tear only, and sixteen (80%) of twenty shoulders with normal tendons. In no case was the surgical approach (open or arthroscopic) that had been planned on the basis of the ultrasonography altered by the operative findings, but the operative finding of a full-thickness tear resulted in an arthroscopic cuff repair in four shoulders. Magnetic resonance imaging led to the correct diagnosis for forty (95%) of forty-two shoulders with a full-thickness rotator cuff tear or both full and partial-thickness rotator cuff tears, twenty-seven (73%) of thirty-seven shoulders with only a partial-thickness tear, and fifteen (75%) of twenty shoulders with normal tendons. There were no significant differences between magnetic resonance imaging and ultrasonography with regard to the correct identification of a full-thickness tear or its size. The sensitivity of ultrasonography for detecting tear size in the anterior-posterior dimension was 86% (95% confidence interval, 71% to 95%), and that of magnetic resonance imaging was 93% (95% confidence interval, 81% to 99%) (p = 0.26). The sensitivity of ultrasonography for detecting tear size in the medial-lateral dimension was 83% (95% confidence interval, 69% to 93%), and that of magnetic resonance imaging was 88% (95% confidence interval, 74% to 96%) (p = 0.41).A well-trained office staff and an experienced orthopaedic surgeon can effectively utilize ultrasonography, in conjunction with clinical examination and a review of shoulder radiographs, to accurately diagnose the extent of rotator cuff tears in patients suspected of having such tears. Errors in diagnosis made on the basis of ultrasonography most often consist of an inability to distinguish between partial and full-thickness tears that are approximately 1 cm in size. In this study, such errors did not significantly affect the planned surgical approach.Detection and measurement of rotator cuff tears with sonography: analysis of diagnostic errors.The purpose of this study was to analyze the causes of errors in the detection and measurement of rotator cuff tears in our patient population.Seventy-one consecutive patients with shoulder pain who were prospectively studied with sonography had subsequent arthroscopy that showed a full-thickness or partial-thickness tear or intact cuff. For sonography and arthroscopy, the length or degree of retraction and width of a tear, when present, was recorded. When there were discrepant findings, representative images were jointly evaluated by the radiologist and orthopedic surgeon to determine the cause of the error.Fifteen detection errors were found, including five misses (three < 5-mm subscapularis and two small partial-thickness tears), four errors inherent with the test (distinguishing large bursal side or extensive partial-thickness from full-thickness tears and tendinopathy from partial-thickness tears), three errors of an unknown cause, two due to misinterpretation, and one error inherent with the patient. Seventeen measurement errors occurred with full-thickness tears, 15 of those in patients with large or massive tears. Bursal thickening (n = 4), non-visualization of the torn tendon end (n = 2), nonretracted tear (n = 2), and complex tear (n = 1) contributed to the errors. Eight measurement errors occurred with partial-thickness tears. Difficulty distinguishing tendinopathy from partial-thickness tears (n = 3) and complex tears (n = 3) accounted for six errors.Although infrequent, detection errors were due to limitations inherent with the test or misses. Limitations inherent with the patient and misinterpretation of the findings were rare. Most measurement errors occurred in patients with large or massive cuff tears.Sonography of full-thickness supraspinatus tears: comparison of patient positioning technique with surgical correlation.Sonography has become a popular technique for the assessment of musculoskeletal disorders. Patient positioning is crucial to a thorough and accurate assessment of rotator cuff tendons. Two positions, the Crass and modified Crass, have been routinely used in the research and clinical settings to examine the supraspinatus tendon. Our study was a prospective trial to determine whether the Crass or the modified Crass position affords the most accurate measure of supraspinatus tears when compared with surgical findings.Twenty-one patients with full-thickness supraspinatus tears underwent shoulder sonography in both the Crass and the modified Crass positions. Measurements of supraspinatus tears were performed in the sagittal and transverse dimensions. Patients subsequently underwent either arthroscopic or open supraspinatus repair. Intraoperative measurements were made in two dimensions and were compared with sonographic findings.Sonography had 100% specificity in detecting full-thickness supraspinatus tears. No statistically significant difference was seen between the size of supraspinatus tears in the Crass and modified Crass positions and surgical findings in the transverse plane (p = 0.55 and 0.61, respectively). In the sagittal dimension, no statistically significant difference was seen between surgical findings and the Crass position (p = 0.14); however, a difference existed when the modified Crass position was used (p = 0.03).Sonography reliably detects and quantifies supraspinatus tears. Both the Crass and the modified Crass positions reflected the true size of supraspinatus tears in the transverse plane. In the sagittal plane, the Crass position is the more useful to quantify supraspinatus tears because the modified Crass position overestimates the size of such tears.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder.Assessment of fat content in supraspinatus muscle with proton MR spectroscopy in asymptomatic volunteers and patients with supraspinatus tendon lesions.To evaluate proton magnetic resonance (MR) spectroscopy in the assessment of lipid content of the supraspinatus muscle in asymptomatic volunteers and patients with supraspinatus tendon lesions.Single-voxel proton MR spectroscopy was used to assess lipid content of the supraspinatus muscle in asymptomatic volunteers (n = 30) and patients with partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (n = 30), newly diagnosed full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (n = 30), and chronic full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (n = 30). The apparent lipid content of the supraspinatus muscle measured with proton MR spectroscopy was related to its appearance on sagittal-oblique T1-weighted spin-echo MR images (grades 0-4). One-way analysis of variance was performed to test for significant differences, and the Tukey honestly significant difference procedure was performed for post hoc comparisons.Mean apparent lipid content was 13.7% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 11.5%, 15.8%) for asymptomatic volunteers, 29.5% (95% CI: 25.1%, 34.0%) for patients with partial-thickness tears, 48.6% (95% CI: 41.3%, 55.9%) for patients with full-thickness tears, and 66.1% (95% CI: 57.7%, 74.5%) for patients with chronic tears. Values were significantly different (analysis of variance, P <.001; P <.001-.002 for all post hoc pairwise comparisons). Mean apparent lipid content for the supraspinatus muscle was as follows: grade 0, 19.6% (95% CI: 16.7%, 22.6%); grade 1, 36.8% (95% CI: 33.2%, 40.4%); grade 2, 53.6% (95% CI: 43.1%, 64.2%); grade 3, 67.5% (95% CI: 52.6%, 82.3%); and grade 4, 79.2% (95% CI: 73.2%, 85.3%). With analysis of variance (P <.001), all post hoc pairwise comparisons were significant (P </=.001) except between grades 2 and 3 (P =.112) and between grades 3 and 4 (P =.261). In 14 (25%) subjects who had grade 0 appearance on T1-weighted images, lipid content values were greater than the upper range of values in the volunteers.Proton MR spectroscopy is suitable in the assessment of apparent lipid content of rotator cuff muscles.Assessment of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum using an extremity MR system: MR results compared to surgical findings from a multi-center study.To conduct a multi-center assessment of the use of a 0.2-T, extremity MR system (E-scan; General Electric Lunar Corp. and Esaote, Genoa, Italy) for identifying tears of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum.A retrospective study was performed involving 160 patients (age range, 15-84 years old) from five facilities in the United States, comparing shoulder MR imaging to surgical findings. MR imaging of the shoulder was conducted as follows: shoulder coil; T1-weighted spin echo, coronal-oblique and axial images; short Tau inversion recovery (STIR), coronal-oblique images and axial images; and T2-weighted spin echo, coronal-oblique and sagittal-oblique images. The MR examinations were interpreted in an independent, prospective manner by two radiologists with extensive musculoskeletal MRI experience. Arthroscopic (N = 103) or open surgical (N = 57) procedures were performed within a mean of 53 days after MR imaging.Surgical findings demonstrated rotator cuff tears in 131 patients and labral tears in 60 patients. For the rotator cuff, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 90%, 93%, 98%, and 68%, respectively. For the labrum, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 55%, 100%, 100%, and 82%, respectively.There was good agreement when MR results obtained using the extremity MR system were compared to surgical findings for identifying rotator cuff tears, while the sensitivity of MR imaging for determining labral tears was relatively poor. Nevertheless, these findings were comparable to those reported in the peer-reviewed literature for MR systems operating at mid-, and high-field-strengths.Full-thickness and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears: value of US signs in diagnosis.To determine which US signs are important in the diagnosis of a surgically identifiable supraspinatus tendon tear.Fifty consecutive ultrasonographic (US) studies of the shoulder in patients who underwent arthroscopic follow-up were retrospectively reviewed by a musculoskeletal radiologist. US images of the supraspinatus tendon were evaluated for tendon nonvisualization, abnormal tendon echogenicity, tendon thinning, greater tuberosity cortical irregularity, cartilage interface sign, joint fluid, and subacromial-subdeltoid bursal fluid. US findings were compared with arthroscopic results. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were calculated for each US sign in the diagnosis of full-thickness tendon tear and again for any type of supraspinatus tendon tear.Arthroscopy revealed 21 full-thickness tears, five bursal surface partial-thickness tears, 10 articular surface partial-thickness tears, and 14 patients without tear of the supraspinatus tendon. The presence of greater tuberosity cortical irregularity and joint fluid was most important in the diagnosis of full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tear (sensitivity, 60%; specificity, 100%; positive predictive value, 100%; negative predictive value, 78%; accuracy, 84%). For diagnosis of any type of supraspinatus tendon tear (partial or full thickness), tendon nonvisualization, greater tuberosity cortical irregularity, and cartilage interface sign are most important, although a combination of signs did not improve accuracy.Secondary US signs, such as greater tuberosity cortical irregularity and joint fluid, are most valuable in the diagnosis of supraspinatus tendon tear.Comparison of high-field-strength versus low-field-strength MRI of the shoulder.Previous studies have reported similar results of shoulder MRI versus arthroscopy for high-field-strength (1.5-T) and low-field-strength (0.2-T) units. We report our experience with the accuracy of high- versus low-field-strength units versus arthroscopy for detection of supraspinatus tendon tears and labral tears in the same patients. SUBJECTS AND METHODS. Three musculoskeletal radiologists prospectively interpreted shoulder MRIs from 40 patients who had a complete shoulder MRI examination on a 0.2-T system and limited imaging on a 1.5-T unit. Proton-density axial and fat-saturated T2-weighted coronal and sagittal sequences were performed. Each radiologist interpreted the open unit images first and the high-field-strength images second. Results from 28 patients who also underwent arthroscopy were also compared with the MRI interpretations. All scans were then retrospectively reinterpreted by consensus of the three reviewers, who were unaware of the patient's name, results of previous MRI, or arthroscopy report (if any).High-field-strength images altered reviewers' interpretations of low-field-strength scans for nine of 40 patients. In four patients, full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears could be diagnosed definitively on the high-field-strength unit but not on the open unit. Three labral tears and two superior labral anteroposterior lesions could be depicted definitively on the high-field-strength unit but not on the open unit. All tears were confirmed at arthroscopy.High-field-strength MRI units provide better spatial and contrast resolution and allow more accurate interpretations than low-field-strength units; these findings may affect clinical treatment.Role of community diagnostic ultrasound examination in the diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears.Diagnostic ultrasound examination has become the most commonly used investigation in Australia for diagnosing rotator cuff tears. The authors felt that the results of such investigations were often inaccurate in their clinical practices.The diagnostic ultrasound findings in 336 cases were compared to arthrography, and in 225 cases findings at surgery.A very poor accuracy rate of 0.38 was found for diagnostic ultrasound examination. The sensitivity was 0.24 and specificity was 0.61.Extreme caution is recommended in the use of diagnostic ultrasound, as currently practised in a general community setting, in diagnosing full-thickness rotator cuff tears.MR arthrography of partial thickness tears of the undersurface of the rotator cuff: an arthroscopic correlation.Partial thickness tears of the undersurface (articular surface) of the rotator cuff (RTC) have been recognized increasingly in recent years as a source of treatable shoulder pain in the athletic population. This study evaluated the efficacy of MR arthrography (MR-ARTH) in diagnosing these tears.The study design was a retrospective review of medical records of patients who had presented with refractory shoulder complaints and subsequently undergone MR arthrography with multiple signal MRI sequences followed by shoulder arthroscopy. Of particular interest were patients who had oblique T1 fat suppression (COT1FS), coronal oblique T2 (COT2), and coronal oblique T2 fat suppression (COT2FS) images taken. Seventy-six subjects met the study criteria. Investigators examined the MR-ARTH images from these patients' charts while blinded as to arthroscopic results, clinical signs and symptoms.Based on COT1FS images, investigators identified nine subjects as having had full thickness tears, 28 as having had partial thickness tears of the undersurface of the rotator cuff (PRTC), and 39 as having had intact RTC. These results were compared to actual findings at arthroscopy: nine full thickness tears, 26 of 28 with PRTC and 34 of 39 intact. The sensitivity of MR-ARTH was 84%, with a positive predictive value of 93%. The overall accuracy was 91% (69/76). The specificity was 96%. That is, if a PRTC was not seen on the MR-ARTH images, it was very unlikely to exist. COT2 and COT2FS sequences failed to increase sensitivity and overall efficacy of MRI.PRTC can be diagnosed accurately by MR-ARTH with gadopentatate contrast. A COT1FS sequence is recommended for evaluation when tears are suspected.Usefulness of the simultaneous acquisition of spatial harmonics technique during MRI of the shoulder.The simultaneous acquisition of spatial harmonics (SMASH) technique is a parallel imaging technique that uses fewer echoes than conventional techniques to obtain the desired resolution. Production of images occurs more quickly with parallel imaging than with conventional imaging. This study assesses the usefulness of the SMASH technique for MRI of the shoulder. SUBJECTS AND METHODS. Five experienced musculoskeletal radiologists prospectively interpreted MRIs of the shoulder in 50 consecutive patients. All patients underwent a complete MRI examination of the shoulder on a 1.5-T commercially available scanner. Axial fat-saturated proton density-weighted, coronal T1-weighted, and coronal and sagittal fat-saturated T2-weighted sequences were performed. Patients also underwent SMASH T2-weighted imaging in the coronal and sagittal planes. Coronal and sagittal SMASH T2-weighted imaging took approximately 50% as long to complete compared with conventional T2-weighted imaging. Each radiologist interpreted MRIs of the shoulder without knowing whether the images were obtained using the SMASH or the fat-saturated T2-weighted technique. Twenty-eight of the 50 patients also underwent subsequent arthroscopy, and the results were compared with MRI interpretations based on SMASH and fat-saturated T2-weighted images.We found no intraobserver variability between the interpretations of SMASH imaging and the interpretations of fat-saturated T2-weighted imaging. Of the 28 patients who also underwent subsequent arthroscopy, 19 were found to have full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears and nine had superior labral anterior-to-posterior lesions. All arthroscopic findings correlated with prospective MRI interpretations.SMASH imaging allows significant time savings compared with fat-saturated T2-weighted MRI. We found that the use of the SMASH technique did not affect the MRI interpretation or the clinical outcome of patients.The significance of subacromial arthrography to verify partial bursal-side rotator cuff ruptures.The purpose of this study was to verify a partial bursa-side rupture of the rotator cuff (RC) using different imaging techniques with special emphasis on the validity of a specific method of subacromial arthrography (SAA).Patients (n=92, mean age 53.8 years) with a subacromial impingement syndrome underwent sonography, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and SAA. All diagnostic results were checked by subsequent arthroscopic surgery.Of 31 surgically verified ruptures, 17 showed a partial rupture located towards the bursa. These had been detected by MRI and ultrasound with a sensitivity of 64% and 41%, respectively, while SAA as a diagnostic tool yielded a sensitivity of 82%. In 14 cases of complete RC ruptures, all imaging techniques had a similar sensitivity of 86-93%.It appears that SAA is an adequate and valid diagnostic tool for the detection of partial bursa-sided RC ruptures. Ultrasound and MRI showed a comparably lower sensitivity. It is therefore concluded that SAA has clear advantages in the diagnosis of this defect with the consequence that open surgical techniques can be avoided.Association of shoulder sonographic findings with subsequent surgical treatment for rotator cuff injury.To identify any clinical and radiologic findings of rotator cuff injury that predict whether patients will undergo shoulder surgery.We retrospectively studied all shoulder sonograms obtained at a single institution over 12 months. Possible predictors of surgical treatment were documented, including patient age and sex, duration and types of symptoms, and the location and severity of tendon damage on sonography. One hundred twenty-eight patients underwent shoulder sonography; 34 patients eventually underwent shoulder surgery. Multivariate logistic regression was performed to identify clinical and sonographic factors associated with the use of surgical therapy.The only statistically significant predictor of surgical intervention was the finding of full-thickness tears (with or without tendon retraction) on sonography (P = .03). Patients with full-thickness tears were 4.3 times more likely to undergo surgery than those with no tears (odds ratio, 4.3).The sonographic diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears is the only finding statistically associated with the use of surgical treatment. No single clinical variable was consistently associated with subsequent surgery. Partial-thickness tears on sonography also do not show any statistical association with the eventual use of surgery for rotator cuff symptoms.Horizontal component of partial-thickness tears of rotator cuff: imaging characteristics and comparison of ABER view with oblique coronal view at MR arthrography initial results.To determine the characteristics of horizontal components of partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff at magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography and to determine whether use of the abduction and external rotation (ABER) position improved detection of a horizontal component in partial-thickness tears.MR studies in 16 patients (mean age, 32 years) who had partial-thickness tear with a horizontal component were retrospectively evaluated. All 16 patients had undergone arthroscopic surgery. The depth and extent of the horizontal component were measured on MR images, and the presence or absence of articular surface tear was recorded. The characteristics of the horizontal component on ABER views were compared with those on oblique coronal views.A horizontal component (24 lesions; one tendon involved in eight patients and two tendons involved in eight patients) was observed in 100% of the lesions on ABER views and in 21% of the lesions (n = 5) on oblique coronal images. The mean length of the horizontal components, measured on ABER views, was 1.9 cm (range, 0.6-4.5 cm). Thirteen (54%) of the 24 lesions were classified as grade I (<3 mm) in depth, four (17%) were classified as grade II (3-6 mm), and seven (29%) were classified as grade III (>6 mm). Articular separation sites with a flap lesion were visualized in 15 (62%) of 24 lesions on ABER views.MR arthrography of the shoulder with patients in the ABER position may provide additional information in cases of partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff with a horizontal component.Distinction between supraspinatus, infraspinatus and subscapularis tendon tears with ultrasound in 332 surgically confirmed cases.The aim of this retrospective study was to determine the diagnostic value of preoperative ultrasonography for the characterisation of size and location of the involved tendons. in 332 consecutive patients who underwent surgery, all preoperative ultrasonographic reports were reviewed and ultrasound (US) and surgical findings were compared. Ultrasound criteria for cuff tears were complete nonvisualisation of the cuff tendons or localised absence and focal discontinuity. In all but 12 cases, US diagnoses corresponded with intraoperative findings (sensitivity 98%, confidence interval 95.1-99.3; specificity 93%, CI 85.7-97.1; accuracy 97%, CI 93.8-98.1). Size and location of the tear were correctly predicted in 69 of 96 cases (accuracy 87%, sensitivity 89%, specificity 87%). US demonstrated less extensive tears than observed at surgery in 18%. Ultrasonography was highly accurate and sensitive for detecting rotator cuff tears, but seems to be a method of limited value for evaluation of the size of cuff tears, in particular, for the detection of small tears.Diagnosing patients with longstanding shoulder joint pain.To examine the interobserver agreement of commonly used clinical tests and diagnoses in patients with shoulder pain, and the accuracy of these tests and ultrasonographic findings in comparison with arthroscopic findings.Eighty six patients with longstanding shoulder joint pain were "blindly" examined by two trained doctors using several clinical tests. In all patients an ultrasonographic examination was performed, and in 42 (49%) an arthroscopy.Tests for impingement showed poor to moderate agreement. Tenderness of muscles, muscle weakness, and tests for labral lesion also showed poor agreement. Pain during muscle contraction showed moderate agreement. The agreement of clinical diagnoses was poor and the accuracy was low in comparison with arthroscopy. Ultrasonography was accurate in full thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, but inaccurate for partial tears and labral lesions.Most clinical tests showed poor agreement. Clinical and ultrasonographic diagnoses had low accuracy in comparison with arthroscopy.[Ultrasound diagnosis of the rotator cuff].Shoulder sonography is a well-established and standardized method to evaluate the status of the rotator cuff, the long head of the biceps, and the subacromial and subdeltoid bursae. Using high-frequency linear probes, the sensitivity in detecting total tears sized 0.5 cm and greater is > 90% and in detecting partial thickness tears of at least one-third of the cuff substance > 75% when using the dual-criteria standard. Ultrasound achieves comparable or better results than native magnetic resonance tomography at far less cost. False results can be excluded in the majority of cases by strict adherence to a dual-criteria model. The ability to display the joint's soft tissue structures in real time is unique up to now. The limits of sonography are (1) in the estimation of tear size in global tears as retraction of tendon stumps under the acromion cannot be visualized and (2) in the evaluation of status of rotator cuff muscles since volumetric information about atrophy can be gained by ultrasonography, but a differentiation between simple atrophy and fatty degeneration is not possible.Supraspinatus tendon tears: comparison of US and MR arthrography with surgical correlation.The aim of this study was to compare the diagnostic reliability of US with MR arthrography in diagnosing supraspinatus tendon tears. Surgical findings were used as the gold standard in detecting tears. A total of 44 patients were assessed with transverse and longitudinal US scans with respect to the long axis of the rotator cuff tendons and then examined with MR arthrography. This technique involved free-hand injection of contrast medium into the shoulder joint. At surgery 20 incomplete and 24 complete tears were observed. Ultrasound offered good results for the large tears, but its sensitivity decreased proportionally with the size of the tears. Magnetic resonance arthrography correctly diagnosed 43 tears, whereas only one false-negative diagnosis of tendinosis was made for a partial tear on the bursal side. Since it improves the diagnosis of small tears, MR arthrography must be performed on all patients for whom surgical repair is necessary in order to restore normal functions.Evaluation of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum using a 0.2-Tesla extremity magnetic resonance (MR) system: MR results compared to surgical findings.The purpose of this investigation was to evaluate the diagnostic capabilities of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) performed using a dedicated-extremity MR system in detecting lesions of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum. This retrospective study compared the MR results obtained in 47 patients that underwent MRI using a 0.2-Tesla extremity MR system (E-scan) to the surgical findings. MR images of the shoulder were obtained as follows: shoulder coil, T1-weighted, coronal-oblique and axial images; short Tau inversion recovery (STIR), coronal-oblique images; and T2-weighted, coronal-oblique, sagittal-oblique, and axial images. The MR examinations were interpreted by three highly experienced, musculoskeletal radiologists. Open surgical (N = 26) or arthroscopic (N = 21) procedures were performed within a mean time of 33 days after MRI. The surgical findings revealed rotator cuff tears in 28 patients and labral lesions in 9 patients. For the rotator cuff tears, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 89%, 100%, 100%, and 90%, respectively. For the labral lesions, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 89%, 95%, 80%, and 97%, respectively. The findings indicated that there was good agreement comparing the MR results obtained using the low-field extremity MR system to the surgical findings for determination of lesions of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum. Notably, the statistical values determined for the use of this MR system were comparable to those reported in the peer-reviewed literature for the use of whole-body, mid- and high-field-strength MR systems.Comparative studies of MRI and operative findings in rotator cuff tear.A prospective study was performed to determine the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) compared with operative findings in the evaluation of patients associated with rotator cuff tears. Fifty-four of 60 shoulders (58 patients) examined by MRI were confirmed as full-thickness tears and 6 as partial-thickness tears at the time of surgery. The oblique coronal, oblique sagittal, and axial planes of T2-weighted images with the 0.5 tesla MRI system were obtained preoperatively and compared with operative findings. MRI correctly identified 46 of 54 full-thickness rotator cuff tears and 5 of 6 partial-thickness tears. A comparison of MRI and operative findings in full-thickness cuff tears showed a sensitivity of 85%, a specificity of 83%, and a positive prospective value (PPV) of 99%. A comparison of partial-thickness tears showed a sensitivity of 83%, a specificity of 85%, and PPV of 39%. Linear regression analysis showed an excellent correlation between the MRI assessment and measurement at the time of surgery (r = 0.90, P < 0.01). MRI was useful in evaluating large and medium-sized rotator cuff tears, but less useful in distinguishing small full-thickness tears from partial-thickness tears.[Diagnosis of rotator cuff injury].Three-dimensional ultrasonography in the diagnosis of rotator cuff lesions.Two-dimensional (2-D) ultrasound (US) of rotator cuff lesions is a well-established tool. The aim of this study was to elucidate if the use of 3-D sonography can increase the diagnostic yield of US. A total of 40 patients were preoperatively evaluated using 2-D and 3-D sonography, and these results were compared to intraoperative findings. Ultrasound was performed on a 530D US machine (Kretztechnik, Zipf, Austria) with a 10-MHz transducer. We found an increased validity of 3-D imaging, mainly based on the higher reliability in the diagnosis of partial-thickness cuff lesions. Sensitivity and specificity were found to be 91% and 82% for 3-D sonography and 74% and 82% for 2-D sonography, respectively. With 3-D US partial-tear rotator cuff lesions can be predicted more accurately.[Rotator cuff rupture. Diagnostic imaging].Conventional radiography, ultrasound, Magnetic Resonance (MR), Arthrography Computed Tomography (Arthro-CT) and Arthrography Magnetic Resonance (Arthro-MR) are available for diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Our purpose is to assess the specificity and sensitivity of these examinations and if they could give to the surgeon all the informations to select the more accurate treatment. We have evaluated retrospectively the images of 68 patients, 43 male and 25 female (average age 51 years), which then have been surgically treated for rotator cuff pathology. On the basis of our findings, we think that conventional radiography and ultrasound are excellent in a first evaluation. MR images, particularly in the coronal and sagittal oblique planes, are able to demonstrate partial or complete rotator cuff tears. The use of intra-articular contrast medium (arthro-CT, arthro-MR) should be reserved for partial lesions on specific cases.Angled oblique sagittal MR imaging of rotator cuff tears: comparison with standard oblique sagittal images.To compare the accuracy for diagnosing rotator cuff tears of oblique coronal images supplemented with standard oblique sagittal images versus thinner-section angled oblique sagittal images.The study included 75 consecutive patients who had a shoulder MR scan followed by arthroscopy. MR images included oblique coronal, oblique sagittal (4 mm thick, 1 mm interslice gap), and angled oblique sagittal (3 mm/0.2 mm) images perpendicular to the lateral cuff. A musculoskeletal staff radiologist and fellow separately evaluated the cuff for tears on the oblique coronal images supplemented with either the oblique sagittal or the angled sagittal images.For distinguishing a cuff tear from no tear, the staff radiologist had an accuracy of 0.76 (95% confidence interval: 0.67, 0.85) with the standard sagittal set, and 0.88 (0.80, 0.95) with the angled set (P=0.04). There was a nonsignificant improvement in accuracy for the fellow, calculated as 0.73 (0.63, 0.83) on the standard sagittal set and 0.76 (0.67, 0.85) on the angled set. Both readers also improved their diagnostic accuracy for partial-thickness tears with the angled set, although the improvement was statistically significant only for the staff radiologist.There is a slight improvement in accuracy for diagnosing rotator cuff tears, particularly partial-thickness tears, for the more experienced radiologist using thinner-section angled oblique sagittal images. These images may be useful as a supplemental sequence in patients where it is important to identify partial-thickness tears accurately.[Normal anatomy and pathological conditions of subscapular muscle: US findings compared with surgery].To compare US results with those of surgery in the assessment of the subscapularis tendon.From January 1995 to December 1998 1500 patients underwent US of the shoulder. 12 of these patients had an injured subscapularis tendon. US results of these patients were evaluated retrospectively and compared with those of surgery. US examinations of the subscapularis tendon were performed with two US units (AU4 Idea and HDI 3000), using linear arrays 10-13 MHz transducers. The following features of the tendon were evaluated: morphology, thickness and echotexture.A) US findings. US showed: - chronic degenerative tendon changes with diffusely inhomogeneous echotexture (5 cases); - focal tears with small hypoechoic ill-defined areas or gross hypo-anechoic areas involving the full thickness of the tendon (4 cases); - complete tendon tear with disappearance on US of the subscapularis tendon or with severe thickening of the tendon (2 cases); - in 1 case of recent anterior dislocation of the shoulder a bulky hematoma was seen with coexisting thickening and subtotal tear of the tendon. B) Surgical findings. US findings were confirmerd at surgery in 10 of the 12 patients. In the patient with anterior dislocation of shoulder the diagnosis hematoma was confirmed, but the subscapularis tendon was undamaged. Moreover, in 1 out of the 5 patients with US diagnosis of chronic degenerative tendon changes, a small focal tear of the tendon was found at surgery.US is a first level investigation which is able to demonstrate early changes of the subscapularis tendon and nearby structures. Awareness of pitfalls might decrease the use of second level investigations such as CT arthrography and MR imaging, which on the other hand allow a better definition and assessment of the extent of the injury.[On: Indirect MR arthrography in the diagnosis rotator cuff injuries. By J. Rudolph, Berlin et. al. In: Fortsch Rontgenstr 2000; 172: 686-691].Diagnostic capabilities of shoulder ultrasonography in the detection of complete and partial rotator cuff tears.Our study assessed the accuracy of shoulder ultrasonography in detecting complete and partial rotator cuff tears. We performed a prospective study in 24 patients scheduled for shoulder arthroscopy for impingement, partial-thickness or full-thickness (complete) rotator cuff tears, adhesive capsulitis, or arthritis. Before surgery, all patients underwent diagnostic shoulder ultrasonography followed by a shoulder arthroscopy with examination of the rotator cuff. The arthroscopic findings of rotator cuff integrity were compared with the diagnoses made from ultrasonography. The ultrasonographer was not blinded to the history and examination findings, and the surgeon was not blinded to the results of the ultrasonography. Ultrasound had sensitivity and specificity rates of 80% and 100%, respectively (positive and negative predictive rates of 100% and 88%), in the diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and sensitivity and specificity rates of 71% and 100%, respectively (positive and negative predictive values of 100% and 88%), for partial-thickness tears. Although the potential for bias exists in this study, the results suggest that diagnostic ultrasound is effective in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Indirect MR arthrography of the shoulder in detection of rotator cuff ruptures.The aim of this study was to compare the efficacy of indirect MR arthrography images obtained following intravenous contrast injection and conventional MR imaging in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Twenty-four patients with clinically suspected rotator cuff disease were examined. Conventional MR images and post-contrast indirect MR arthrography images were obtained. All images were evaluated in a blinded fashion by two musculoskeletal radiologist. Results were than analyzed depending on surgical output. The correlation coefficient (Spearman rank correlation test) and the kappa values for agreement between surgery and imaging techniques were calculated. The correlation coefficients between indirect MR arthrography and surgery for reader 1 and reader 2 were 0.9137 and 0.9773, respectively. Whereas the agreement between conventional MR imaging and surgery was moderate (n = 0.383-0.571), the agreement between indirect MR arthrography and surgery was excellent (n = 0.873-0.936). We suggest the use of indirect MR arthrography technique when conventional MR images are equivocal in diagnosis of rotator cuff disease.MR arthrography of the shoulder: comparison of low-field (0.2 T) vs high-field (1.5 T) imaging.The objective of this study was to compare the image quality, sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic accuracy of an open low-field MR system (0.2 T) with a standard high-field MR system (1.5 T) after arthrography of the shoulder. Thirty-eight patients either with suspected chronic instability (n = 12) or rotator cuff abnormalities (n = 26) were examined. Intra-articular injection of diluted Gd-DTPA was followed in randomized order either first by imaging on an open 0.2-T system or on a 1.5-T system. The image material was evaluated independently by two radiologists in a blinded fashion with respect to overall image quality and the detection of rotator cuff as well as capsular and labral abnormalities. Surgical correlation was available in 27 (71%) of 38 patients. For both systems, sensitivity and specificity for rotator cuff tears were 100% each, and for labrum pathologies, these values were 100 and 93%, respectively. The agreement for detection of labral pathologies between low-field and high-field examinations was good (kappa = 0.69, kappa = 0.61). For the detection of full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff, the agreement between the low-field and high-field MR examinations was very good and significant (kappa = 0.94, kappa = 1, p < 0.001). Overall image quality was rated good in 17 (45%) and fair in 21 (55%) of 38 cases on the 0.2-T MR system, and good in 32 (84%) and fair in 6 (16%) of 38 cases on the 1.5-T system. Motion artifacts were considered low in 24 (63%) and moderate in 14 (37%) of 38 cases for the 0.2-T system and low in 34 (89%) and moderate in 4 (11%) for 1.5-T system. Based on our results, low-field MR compares favorably to high-field MR in the detection of major abnormalities of the glenohumeral joint, at least when MR arthrography is used. Disadvantages are the duration of the examination and thus the risk of reduced image quality caused by motion artifacts.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff. A comparison of ultrasonographic and arthroscopic findings in one hundred consecutive cases.There has been limited acceptance of shoulder ultrasonography by orthopaedic surgeons in the United States. The purpose of this retrospective study was to determine the diagnostic performance of high-resolution ultrasonography compared with arthroscopic examination for the detection and characterization of rotator cuff tears.One hundred consecutive shoulders in ninety-eight patients with shoulder pain who had undergone preoperative ultrasonography and subsequent arthroscopy were identified. The arthroscopic diagnosis was a full-thickness rotator cuff tear in sixty-five shoulders, a partial-thickness tear in fifteen, rotator cuff tendinitis in twelve, frozen shoulder in four, arthrosis of the acromioclavicular joint in two, and a superior labral tear and calcific bursitis in one shoulder each. All ultrasonographic reports were reviewed for the presence or absence of a rotator cuff tear and a biceps tendon rupture or dislocation. All arthroscopic examinations were performed according to a standardized operative procedure. The size and extent of the tear and the status of the biceps tendon were recorded for all shoulders. The findings on ultrasonography and arthroscopy then were compared for each parameter.Ultrasonography correctly identified all sixty-five full-thickness rotator cuff tears (a sensitivity of 100 percent). There were seventeen true-negative and three false-positive ultrasonograms (a specificity of 85 percent). The overall accuracy was 96 percent. The size of the tear on transverse measurement was correctly predicted in 86 percent of the shoulders with a full-thickness tear. Ultrasonography detected a tear in ten of fifteen shoulders with a partial-thickness tear that was diagnosed on arthroscopy. Five of six dislocations and seven of eleven ruptures of the biceps tendon were identified correctly.Ultrasonography was highly accurate for detecting full-thickness rotator cuff tears, characterizing their extent, and visualizing dislocations of the biceps tendon. It was less sensitive for detecting partial-thickness rotator cuff tears and ruptures of the biceps tendon.Subscapularis tendon tears: detection and grading at MR arthrography.To assess diagnostic accuracy in the detection and grading of subscapularis tendon lesions at magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography.MR arthrograms in 50 consecutive patients (29 with normal subscapularis tendons, 11 with a lesion in the cranial quarter, seven with a major tear but not complete detachment, three with complete detachment) with arthroscopic or surgical confirmation were evaluated independently by two radiologists. Diagnosis was established on findings from transverse and/or parasagittal images.With transverse images alone, sensitivity was 95%/100% (reader 1/reader 2); specificity was 55%/62%. With parasagittal images alone, sensitivity was 91%/91%; specificity was 76%/90%. With combined images, sensitivity was 91%/91%; specificity was 86%/79%. Interobserver agreement was substantial (kappa = 0.67). Forty-one of 50 (82%) grades for subscapularis abnormalities matched at MR imaging and surgery; nine mismatches differed by only one degree. Several signs were specific (90%-100%) but insensitive (29%-62%); these included leakage of contrast material onto the lesser tuberosity, fatty degeneration of the subscapularis muscle, and abnormality in the course of the long biceps tendon (luxation, subluxation).MR arthrography is accurate in the detection and grading of subscapularis tendon lesions. Specificity of findings on transverse images for this diagnosis can be improved by including indirect signs and findings on parasagittal images.Sonography and magnetic resonance imaging equivalent for the assessment of full-thickness rotator cuff tears.To investigate the diagnostic value of sonography (SG) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the assessment of full-thickness rotator cuff tears (RCTs).Twenty-one consecutive, otherwise healthy patients with noninflammatory unilateral chronic (>3 months) shoulder complaints due to a possible full-thickness RCT were studied (9 women and 12 men, mean +/- SD age 56 +/- 12). According to standardized procedures, SG was performed by both a radiologist and a rheumatologist, and MRI was evaluated by 2 radiologists. All assessors were blinded to the patient's diagnosis. Within 3 weeks after SG and MRI, arthroscopy was performed. SG, MRI, and arthroscopy results were scored as negative or positive for the presence of a full-thickness RCT. The result of surgical inspection was used as the "gold standard."For full-thickness RCTs, the sensitivity was 0.81 for SG and 0.81 for MRI. The specificity was 0.94 for SG and 0.88 for MRI. The positive predictive value was 0.96 for SG and 0.91 for MRI. The negative predictive value was 0.77 for SG and 0.74 for MRI. Accuracy was 0.86 for SG and 0.83 for MRI.Full-thickness RCTs can be identified accurately by both SG and MRI. Because of its low cost and because it can be performed in the rheumatology unit, SG seems to be a promising diagnostic tool for use by the rheumatologist.Evaluation of chronic tears of the rotator cuff by ultrasound. A new index.The diagnosis of chronic lesions of the rotator cuff is challenging. We have developed a new index to improve the sonographic diagnosis of chronic tears of the cuff. In a pilot study, we examined 50 asymptomatic healthy volunteers by ultrasound to establish the diameter of the rotator cuff in relation to the tendon of the long head of biceps. Subsequently, the index was calculated in 64 patients who had had shoulder pain for more than three months caused by clinically diagnosed lesions of the rotator cuff. The compensatory hypertrophy of the biceps tendon was quantified sonographically in relation to the diameter of the cuff. Comparison with the contralateral shoulder revealed a significantly higher biceps rotator-cuff ratio (p < 0.05) for patients with torn rotator cuffs. A ratio greater than 0.8 was considered pathological (index positive); the mean ratio in the control group was 0.43. The sensitivity of a positive index was 97.8%, the specificity 63.2%, the positive predictive value 86.3%, and the negative predictive value 92.4% in comparison with surgical findings. Use of the index improves sensitivity in the diagnosis of chronic tears of the cuff by ultrasound.[The sensitivity and specificity of sonographic examination in detection of rotator cuff tear].Sonographic examination was performed in 72 patients (74 shoulders) suffering from different shoulder diseases. The results were correlated with findings obtained during subsequent surgery in 57 patients (58 shoulders) and arthrography in 15 cases (16 shoulders). Rotator cuff tear was proved during surgical procedure in 37 patients (38 shoulders). The sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography in detection of cuff tear was 98.2% and 90% respectively. In case of partial cuff tear ultrasonography had lower sensitivity--50% while specificity was 96.3%. In detection of supraspinatus tendon tear the ultrasound sensitivity was 100% and specificity 95.6%, in case of infraspinatus tear sensitivity was 66.7% and specificity 94% while for subscapularis tear these values were equal 75% and 98.1%. The size of sonographically estimated cuff defect correlated properly with intrasurgical measurement in 76.3% of all cases.Ultrasonographic analysis of shoulder rotator cuff tears.Seventy-nine shoulders suspected of rotator cuff tears were examined by ultrasonography (US) and forty-three received surgery. Long and short axis scans were performed and findings of each were separately classified according to a five-grade system, and the results were correlated with the actual extent of tear observed during surgery. Internal echogenicity and subacromial impingement were analyzed before and after surgery. A accuracy of US in detecting rotator cuff tears was analyzed. In addition, the correlation between cuff shape observed by US before surgery and actual shape observed during surgery was assessed. It was noted that cuff thinning and abnormalities in shape did not recover to normal after surgery. However, in the cases of discontinuities observed by US before surgery, US findings indicated that the torn cuff was anchored to the greater tuberosity and functional during active motion. Although post-operative US findings were not normal, clinical results were good in most cases. Sensitivity of US for detecting rotator cuff tear was 100% and specificity 94%. US is non-invasive, cost effective and allows the physician to examine the joint while it is in motion. Therefore, at this time, we use US as a screening method for detecting rotator cuff tears. Furthermore, US allows us to check for re-tears while the joint is in motion, which is essential for accurate diagnosis.Diagnostic and therapeutic impact of MRI and arthrography in the investigation of full-thickness rotator cuff tears.Investigation of shoulder pain is important before surgical treatment. The presence or absence of a full-thickness rotator cuff tear (FTRCT) may determine the type of surgical treatment. Both MRI and conventional arthrography can be used, but little is known about their relative diagnostic and therapeutic impact. We performed a prospective trial assessing: (a) the influence of MRI and arthrography results on the clinician's diagnostic thinking (diagnostic impact); (b) the influence of the results on the clinician's therapeutic thinking (therapeutic impact); and (c) the diagnostic performance of the two techniques in patients with surgical confirmation. A total of 104 consecutive patients with shoulder problems referred to a specialist orthopaedic shoulder clinic underwent pre-operative investigation with MRI and arthrography. The surgeon's diagnosis, diagnostic confidence and planned treatment were measured before the investigation, and then again after the results of each investigation. Before the presentation of the investigation, results, the patients were randomised into two groups. In one group MRI was presented first; in the other group, arthrography. The MRI results led to fewer changes in diagnostic category (14 of 46, 30%) than arthrography (20 of 54, 37%), but the difference was not significant (P > 0.5). Magnetic resonance imaging led to slightly more changes in planned management (17 of 47, 36%) than arthrography (14 of 55, 25%), but again the difference was not statistically significant (P > 0.3). The results of the second investigation always had less diagnostic and therapeutic impact than the first. The accuracy of MRI for FTRCT in 38 patients with surgical confirmation was 79%, sensitivity 81% and specificity 78%; the accuracy of arthrography was 82%, sensitivity 50% and specificity 96%. The clinical diagnosis and management plan can be adequately defined by a single radiological investigation. Magnetic resonance imaging and arthrography had fairly similar diagnostic and therapeutic impact and comparable accuracy, although MRI was more sensitive and less specific. Magnetic resonance imaging may be the preferred investigation because of its better demonstration of soft tissue anatomy.Indirect MR arthrography of the unexercised glenohumeral joint in patients with rotator cuff tears.To evaluate the diagnostic utility of indirect MR arthrography of the unexercised glenohumeral joint in patients with rotator cuff tears confirmed by arthroscopy or arthrotomy as the gold standard.Twenty-six patients underwent conventional MR imaging and indirect MR arthrography of the stationary glenohumeral joint using a wrap-around surface coil. Unenhanced T1-weighted spin echo/T2-weighted fast spin echo sequences and T1-weighted gradient echo sequences, adding spectral fat suppression after intravenous administration of contrast medium, were performed in the oblique coronal and oblique sagittal planes. Images were analyzed by three experienced radiologists in consensus. Levels of diagnostic confidence were evaluated using a four-point scale of diagnostic certainty.Performing indirect MR arthrography of the unexercised shoulder leads to a diagnostically efficient enhancement of joint fluid (120% at 4 minutes and 145% at 8 minutes after intravenous injection of gadodiamide). In terms of soft tissue delineation, characterization of rotator cuff tears was significantly improved by using enhanced fat-suppressed T1-weighted gradient echo sequences compared with conventional MR imaging.Indirect MR arthrography without glenohumeral joint exercise in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears is feasible and represents a more convenient and less time-consuming alternative to indirect MR arthrography after joint exercise.Magnetic resonance imaging assessment of the rotator cuff: is it really accurate?Is sonography performed by the rheumatologist as useful as arthrography executed by the radiologist for the assessment of full thickness rotator cuff tears?Sonography and arthrography are techniques used to detect rotator cuff tears (RCT). The diagnostic value of sonography executed by a rheumatologist versus that of arthrography performed by a radiologist for assessment of RCT was investigated among patients with unilateral chronic shoulder complaints without an underlying inflammatory rheumatic disease.Forty-eight patients underwent sonography, arthrography, and surgical inspection, the results of surgical inspection being the gold standard.Sensitivity for assessment of a full thickness RCT was 0.86 for sonography and 0.77 for arthrography, specificity was 0.88 for sonography and 0.92 for arthrography.Compared to arthrography performed by the radiologist, sonography executed by the rheumatologist is as useful for assessment of full thickness rotator cuff tears. Sonography performed by the rheumatologist in combination with history taking and the physical examination during a single visit might change the routine daily practice of rheumatologists.Sonography for the office screening of suspected rotator cuff tears: early experience of the orthopedic surgeon.This study examined the feasibility of orthopedic surgeons performing sonography of the shoulder at the initial office evaluation of the rotator cuff and assessed the sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value of sonography for the detection of tears in the rotator cuff. Initial results in 24 patients suggest that sonography by the orthopedic surgeon is feasible and that it detects tears in the rotator cuff with sufficient accuracy for clinical decision making.Anterior versus posterior, and rim-rent rotator cuff tears: prevalence and MR sensitivity.To determine the relative distribution of the locations of rotator cuff tears, and the sensitivity of anterior versus posterior tears on MR images.We identified 110 consecutive patients who had a shoulder MR and either a partial-thickness or a small full-thickness rotator cuff tear diagnosed at arthroscopy. From the arthroscopy videotapes, we classified the tears as centered in the anterior or posterior half of the cuff, and as either in the critical zone or adjacent to the bony insertion. The original MR interpretation was compared with the arthroscopic findings. MR sensitivity and patient age were compared between patients with tears in the anterior and posterior halves of the cuff. In addition, in patients with partial tears less than 2 cm in diameter, an age comparison between those with tears in the critical zone and those with articular surface tears adjacent to the bony insertion (rim-rent tear) was performed.The tear was centered in the anterior half of the rotator cuff in 79% of the patients younger than 36 years old, and in 89% of the patients 36 years old and over. The average age of the patients with tears in the anterior half (44 years) was not significantly different from the average age of those with posterior tears (40 years) (P = 0.23). The sensitivity of MR for anterior tears was 0.69, and for posterior tears it was 0.56 (P = 0.17). The average age of the 9 patients with rim-rent tears was 31 years, while that of the 28 patients with similarly-sized partial tears not involving the insertion was 40 years old (P = 0.048). Five of the nine rim-rent tears (0.56) were interpreted correctly on the original MR report; two of the other tears were misinterpreted as intratendinous fluid but were diagnosable in retrospect.Even in patients less than 36 years old, most partial and small full-thickness rotator cuff tears are centered in the anterior half of the supraspinatus. Although our figure for MR sensitivity for these tears is lower than in recent articles, we found no significant difference between the sensitivity of MR for diagnosing posterior tears versus tears in the anterior half of the supraspinatus tendon. Rim-rent tears can be mistaken for intratendinous signal, and should be carefully looked for in younger patients with shoulder pain.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder.[Echography of the shoulder with the patient supine in the diagnosis of rotator cuff rupture].We report a new method for shoulder sonography (US): the patient lies supine and his/her arm is positioned so as to optimize tendon depiction. The supraspinatus tendon, which is the most frequently involved structure in rotator cuff tears, is studied with the patient's arm dropped, elbow extended and forearm prone. Our series consisted of 49 surgical patients (arthroscopy in 16 and open surgery in 33 patients): US sensitivity in tear depiction was 84.8%, specificity 100% and accuracy 89.8%. Medium-small tears appeared as transonic areas within tendon substance and/or tendon focal thinning. Large tears appeared as: (a) missed or markedly thinned rotator cuff, with deltoid muscle approximation to the humeral head surface, (b) plenty of fluid collected around bulky tear margins. The US images of 36 patients were then reviewed and the details discussed. A new sign was observed in medium-small tears, that is a sharp hyperechoic band encircling the humeral cartilage (the compass sign). In conclusion, we believe that US performed with the patient in supine recumbency is easier to perform and provides a bigger field of view of the supraspinatus tendon; it also permits to keep stretched rotator cuff, with consequent image quality improvement.Magnetic resonance imaging assessment of the rotator cuff: is it really accurate?Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is used increasingly for evaluating the rotator cuff. This study of 39 shoulders (38 patients) compared the accuracy of MRI interpretation of rotator cuff integrity by a group of community hospital radiologists (clinical community scenario, CCS) with that of a musculoskeletal radiologist (experienced specialist scenario, ESS), relative to arthroscopy. For the CCS subgroup, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PV), negative PV, and accuracy for partial tears were: 0%, 68%, 0%, 82%, and 59%, respectively; for complete tears: 56%, 73%, 36%, 86%, and 69%, respectively; and for all tears combined: 85%, 52%, 50%, 87%, and 64%, respectively. For the ESS subgroup, the respective values for partial tears were: 20%, 88%, 20%, 88%, and 79%, respectively; for complete tears: 78%, 83%, 58%, 92%, and 82%, respectively; and for all tears: 71%, 71%, 59%, 81%, and 71%, respectively. We concluded that MRI assessment of the rotator cuff was not accurate relative to arthroscopy. MRI was most helpful if the result was negative, and MRI diagnosis of partial tear was of little value. Considering the high cost of shoulder MRI, this study has significant implications for the evaluation of patients with possible rotator cuff pathology.The clinical role of shoulder ultrasound.Rotator cuff surgery is facilitated by accurate pre-operative information regarding the presence and size of cuff tears, and the extent of any cuff retraction or lamination.A total of 117 consecutive patients who underwent shoulder ultrasound followed by surgical management were assessed, and the pre-operative ultrasound diagnoses were correlated with the operative findings.Ultrasound was found to be reliable for the detection of full-thickness cuff tears (positive predictive value 96%). In the assessment of partial thickness tears, ultrasound produced few false positives, but failed to diagnose a significant proportion of these lesions. Lamination and other interstitial cuff pathology were not reliably detected by ultrasound. In the diagnosis of subacromial impingement, ultrasound produced few false positives (positive predictive value 95%), but did produce a significant number of false negative results (negative predictive value 66%).Ultrasound is cheaper than MRI and arthrography, and is both non-invasive and 'dynamic'. It is reliable in the diagnosis of full-thickness cuff tears and is a useful adjunct in the diagnosis of cuff impingement and partial thickness tears, but is very much operator-dependent.MR imaging of the rotator cuff tendon: interobserver agreement and analysis of interpretive errors.To evaluate accuracy in interpretation of shoulder magnetic resonance (MR) images and interobserver agreement and to characterize the types of errors.Five radiologists with varying experience independently and retrospectively twice interpreted the MR images of 222 symptomatic patients who underwent both MR imaging and shoulder arthroscopy. The first interpretation was a blind review; the second was with knowledge of the arthroscopic findings.For full-thickness tears, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 84%-96%, 94%-98%, and 92%-97%, respectively, and for partial tears, 35%-44%, 85%-97%, and 77%-87%, respectively. There was no statistically significant difference between readers in the detection of partial or full-thickness tears. There was a statistically significant difference between readers in the no-tear category. Cohen kappa values generally indicated improved interobserver agreement proportional to the readers' experience (full-thickness tears, 0.731-0.881; partial tears, 0.168-0.443).Diagnosis of a full-thickness tear can be learned to a high degree of accuracy. Despite the radiologist's level of experience and knowledge of the arthroscopic findings, the sensitivity for diagnosis of partial tears is poor.MR imaging of rotator cuff tendon tears: comparison of T2*-weighted gradient-echo and conventional dual-echo sequences.Although MR imaging evaluation of the rotator cuff is usually done with proton density- and T2-weighted spin-echo techniques, interest also exists in T2*-weighted gradient-recalled echo techniques. The shorter scan times of T2*-weighted sequences can be used to increase the number of signal averages and thus improve the signal-to-noise ratio. Our purpose in this study was to compare the sensitivity and specificity of oblique coronal T2*-weighted MR image interpretations with conventional dual-echo T2-weighted MR image interpretations when diagnosing rotator cuff tears.Forty-seven consecutive patients who underwent both MR imaging and shoulder arthroscopy were included in this study. The MR examination included both a 7 min 20 sec acquisition time proton density- and T2-weighted oblique coronal sequence and a 7 min 5 sec T2*-weighted oblique coronal sequence. The oblique coronal dual-echo T2-weighted images were evaluated by two of the authors independently, who were unaware of the arthroscopic findings. Each of the two observers graded each cuff as being intact, having a partial-thickness tear, or having a full-thickness tear. After a 3-week interval, each of the two observers then interpreted the T2*-weighted oblique coronal MR images in the same manner. Sensitivity and specificity for the two sets of interpretations were calculated in terms of the ability of the observers to use the two sequences to distinguish an intact cuff from a rotator cuff tear and to distinguish a partial-thickness cuff tear from an intact cuff or full-thickness tear. The results were then compared using Student's t test calculations.For distinguishing an intact cuff from a torn cuff, the sensitivity of the observers' interpretations was lower for the T2*-weighted images than for the conventional dual-echo T2-weighted images. The specificity also decreased with interpretation of the T2*-weighted images for one observer and was unchanged for the second observer. For distinguishing a partial-thickness cuff tear from a non-partial-thickness cuff tear (intact or full-thickness tear), the sensitivity and specificity of both observers decreased with interpretations of the T2*-weighted images when compared with the conventional dual-echo T2-weighted images. The results did not reach statistical significance.In this small study evaluating the ability of observers to diagnose rotator cuff tears on oblique coronal MR images only, interpretations of T2*-weighted images tended to be less sensitive and specific than interpretations of standard dual-echo T2-weighted images.[Normal anatomy and pathologic features of the supraspinatus muscle: comparison between ultrasonography and surgery. Analysis of the potential sources of diagnostic errors].The supraspinatus muscle performs about 60% of the elevation-abduction motion of the arm; therefore, it has a prominent functional role among the extrarotational muscles of the shoulder and is the most injured in subacromial space conditions. Seventy-four patients, aged 21-64 years, were examined to compare ultrasonography (US) results with surgical findings in supraspinatus conditions and to analyze the possible pitfalls in US diagnosis. All the patients underwent conventional X-ray, US and then surgery or arthroscopy. The following criteria were considered: morphology, thickness, echotexture, the convexity of the superior border of supraspinatus tendon, the relationships with the subacromial bursa and the tendon of the biceps long head, the regularity of the bone cortex of the humeral head. US showed: chronic degenerative tendinopathy in 10 patients; perforating focal injuries in 21 patients; deep focal injuries in 10 patients; intramural focal injuries in 6 patients; superficial focal injuries in 8 patients; complete tendon tear with detachment in 19 cases. 62/74 US diagnoses were surgically confirmed, with a specificity of 83.7%. In our experience, US provided very useful information about the pattern, size and site of the injuries and was very helpful in the surgical planning.Not-so-fast MR imaging of the rotator cuff.MR imaging of rotator cuff impingement: correlation with full-thickness rotator cuff tear.Rotator cuff tears usually derive from shoulder impingement, and need surgical treatment. This study is to verify the Magnetic Resonance Image (MRI) findings of rotator cuff impingement which are related to full-thickness rotate cuff tear (FTRCT).Totally 68 patients with shoulder impingement syndrome were studied, including 39 shoulders with surgically-proven FTRCT, and 29 shoulders without FTRCT. MRI findings of shoulder impingement were evaluated for peribursal fat plane, subacromial distance, acromion shape, subacromioclavicular space, irregularity of coracoacromial ligament and presence of subacromial spurs. The correlation with FTRCT was also determined.Peribursal fat plane obliteration (p = 0.0001), hook-shaped acromion (p = 0.0148), subacromioclavicular indentation (p = 0.0004), and decreased subacromial distance (p = 0.0005) showed significant correlation with FTRCT; however, subacromial spurs (p = 0.6238) and thickened irregular coracoacromial ligament (p = 0.1611) showed poor correlation.Specific MRI findings of rotator cuff impingement are fairly reliable and helpful for discrimination of FTRCT from non-FTRCT cases, and can be used preoperatively and noninvasively to determine the necessity of surgical repair of rotator cuff.MR imaging of the rotator cuff mechanism: comparison of spin-echo and turbo spin-echo sequences.Although well documented in other MR imaging applications, the value of turbo spin-echo sequences in evaluating the shoulder has not been addressed. This study was designed to directly compare matched spin-echo and turbo spin-echo sequences in the MR imaging evaluation of the rotator cuff.Using otherwise matched double-echo sequences of equal time duration, we performed 123 paired spin-echo (TR/TE, 200/25,75; one excitation) and turbo spin-echo (3500-5000/22,90; two excitations) sequences in the paracoronal and/or parasagittal plane of the shoulders of 76 patients referred to our institution for possible rotator cuff tear. The sequences were retrospectively analyzed for cuff signal and morphology, fluid conspicuity, coracoacromial arch morphology, and bone marrow signal abnormalities. Surgical and nonsurgical clinical results were correlated when available.We found 100% diagnostic correlation between spin-echo and turbo spin-echo sequences for rotator cuff integrity. Surgical data were available for 26 patients, and clinical follow-up for another 37. For complete rotator cuff tear in the surgical subpopulation, sensitivity was 89%, specificity was 94%, and diagnostic accuracy was 24 of 26 (92%). We found no diagnostically significant difference between the two imaging sequences for fluid conspicuity, coracoacromial morphology, or marrow signal. Signal-to-noise ratios were superior in the turbo spin-echo sequences.Turbo spin-echo sequences are an accurate and efficient tool in the MR imaging evaluation of the rotator cuff. Potential benefits include time saving, increased spatial resolution, and improved signal-to-noise ratio.Site and size of rotator-cuff tear. Findings at ultrasound, double-contrast arthrography, and computed tomography arthrography with surgical correlation.The authors discuss findings of ultrasound (US), double-contrast arthrography (AG), and contrast computed tomography arthrography (CTA) in assessing precise site and size of rotator-cuff tears.Eighty-six patients were compared prospectively in a masked fashion; the results of surgery were studied in 25 patients and the results of arthroscopy were studied in 61 patients.Ultrasound detected 80% (8 of 10) of the partial-thickness tears and 90% (18 of 20) of the full-thickness tears. Arthrography and CTA had identical results with 70% sensitivity (7 of 10) in partial-thickness tears; AG showed 90% (18 of 20) and CTA 95% (19 of 20) of the full-thickness tears. Arthrography had two false-positive findings, and US and CTA had one each. The size of a tear could be evaluated correctly with AG in 30% (9 of 30), with US in 70% (21 of 30) and with CTA in 76% (23 of 30). More extensive tears were encountered at US than had been found at surgery in 2% (2 of 86) and less extensive tears in 9% (8 of 86); CTA depicted more extensive tears in 2% (2 of 86) and less extensive tears in 6% (6 of 86), respectively. The site of a tear could be evaluated with AG in 30% (9 of 30); US and CTA showed the site correctly in every patient in which the tear could be diagnosed.Ultrasound and CTA were equally accurate in diagnosing and evaluating the size and site of rotator-cuff tears. Double-contrast AG was less accurate in the diagnosis of tears and the size and site of tears clearly could be assessed worse.MR evaluation of rotator cuff pathology using T2-weighted fast spin-echo technique with and without fat suppression.This study was designed to compare MR imaging findings from T2-weighted fast spin-echo images with and without fat suppression and then to compare surgical results with those MR imaging interpretations in the evaluation of rotator cuff disease.T2-weighted fast spin-echo images--with and without fat suppression--of 177 shoulder MR imaging studies were reviewed separately in a retrospective, randomized, and blinded fashion. Both sets of images were read in conjunction with the corresponding proton density-weighted images. The diagnosis of normal tendon, tendinosis, degeneration, and partial- and full-thickness tears was made using established criteria.T2-weighted fast spin-echo techniques with and without fat suppression showed excellent agreement in the diagnosis of normal tendon (kappa=.90) amd full-thickness tears (kappa=.98), good agreement for partial tears (kappa=.70) and moderate agreement for the combined group of tendinosis and degeneration (kappa=.53). MR imaging and surgical correlation in 43 patients showed 86% specificity (95% confidence interval, 65-96%) for intact tendons, and 100% sensitivity (95% confidence interval, 82-100%) for full-thickness tears on T2-weighted fast spin-echo imaging--both without and with fat suppression. For partial tears, MR imaging showed a sensitivity of 92% (95% confidence interval, 65-99%) with fat suppression and 67% (95% confidence interval, 39-86%) without fat suppression.T2-weighted fast spin-echo imaging--with or without fat suppression--is a highly sensitive technique in the diagnosis of normal tendons and complete tears of the rotator cuff. Because of increased lesion conspicuity, fat suppression tends to perform better in the diagnosis of partial tears.Ultrasonography for diagnosis of rotator cuff tear.In this study the clinical usefulness of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears was assessed. One hundred twenty-two patients undergoing preoperative ultrasonography were evaluated surgically. Three different ultrasonographic machines were applied with a 7.5-MHz linear-array transducer. Surgery confirmed a sensitivity of 79% for full-thickness tears and 50% for partial thickness tears. In 73 patients with negative ultrasonographic findings, the specificity was 100% for full-thickness tears and 90% for partial-thickness tears. The diagnostic sensitivity for full-thickness tears of the Hitachi EUB-340 system was significantly lower than those of Hitachi EUB-415 and EUB-515, and thus the former cannot be recommended for detection of rotator cuff tears. The sensitivity with regard to partial-thickness tears was also significantly lower with the Hitachi EUB-340 system as compared to the Hitachi EUB-515. There were no significant differences in false-positive rate among the three machines used. In conclusion, accurate ultrasonographic diagnosis of rotator cuff tear requires a high-resolution machine, as well as considerable experience in interpretation.[Magnetic resonance in the study of the painful shoulder. The surgical comparison in 30 consecutive cases].Eighty patients complaining of shoulder pain were examined with MRI from January, 1993, through December, 1994. Thirty of them were submitted to surgery, with an exhaustive inspection of shoulder structures and the treatment of abnormal findings. In this subgroup of surgical patients, MRI had depicted 16 complete tears of the rotator cuff, 4 partial tears, 8 cases of subacromial impingement, I humeral head osteochondritis and, finally, I humeral head osteochondritis with complete rotator cuff tear. Surgical findings confirmed MR diagnosis in 97% of cases. MR findings were then compared with literature data and some atypical features were observed in our series. MRI was totally reliable in complete cuff tears (16/30 patients), always showing the involvement of supraspinatus tendons and, in some cases, of other cuff tendons. In partial cuff tears (4/30 patients), besides the classic pattern of a fissure in the deep/superficial supraspinatus tendon, we observed intra- and peritendinous changes, with no tendon interruption, due to diffuse microlesions. When impingement due to subacromial space narrowing, with no cuff tear, was present (8/30 patients), MRI depicted different causes--e.g., acromioclavear arthrosis, coracoacromial ligament hypertrophy and posttraumatic changes. MRI showed tendinosis in all patients but overestimated it in one case where partial cuff tear was not confirmed surgically--the only false positive in our series. At surgery, all these cases were classified as stage I-II impingement (according to Neer's classification). Finally, MRI was very reliable in the study of bone conditions (osteochondritis), both isolated and associated with cuff tears. The diagnostic accuracy of MRI in the study of the painful shoulder was very high (97%), in agreement with literature data. This is very important because many different causes of shoulder conditions (abnormal tendons, bones and mechanics) may present with similar clinical symptoms. MRI appears as the only imaging method yielding complete and accurate pieces of information in the patients with a painful shoulder.Sonographic detection of tears of the anterior portion of the rotator cuff (subscapularis tendon tears).We studied the value of ultrasonography in identifying tears of the most anterior portion of the rotator cuff (subscapularis tendon tears). Shoulder sonography was performed on 1640 patients with shoulder symptoms, 435 of whom underwent surgery. Among the patients who were operated on, 17 had predominantly or exclusively subscapularis tendon tears; 14 of these were full-thickness and three were partial-thickness tears. Ultrasonography demonstrated 82% (14 of 17) of the subscapularis tendon tears; 86% (12 of 14) of the full-thickness tears and 67% (2 of 3) of the partial-thickness tears were correctly diagnosed with ultrasonography. Sonography can diagnose and show the size of subscapularis tendon tears reliably, but it necessitates that the arm can be externally rotated to the maximum extent when performing the study.Correlation of MR imaging, CT arthrography, and arthroscopy of the shoulder.Rotator cuff tears and instability of the glenohumeral joint are a common cause of chronic shoulder pain and disability. Currently CT arthrography is the method of choice to evaluate the extent of osseous and soft tissue abnormalities. This study was undertaken to determine if magnetic resonance imaging was able to depict post-dislocation abnormalities and rotator cuff pathology and if MRI can replace CT arthrography. Sixty four patients, who were operated on for the first time (arthroscopy or arthrotomy) between November 1986 and July 1991, were compared in a blinded fashion with the results of MR imaging in 40 cases and of CT arthrographies in 24 cases. For the evaluation of rotator cuff tears MRI proved to have a sensitivity of 83.3% and an accuracy of 90.3%. Labral pathology was depicted with a sensitivity of 69.2% and an accuracy of 87.1%. In cases involving a Hill-Sachs lesion the sensitivity of MRI was 90% and the accuracy 95%. MR imaging is an accurate method in the evaluation of rotator cuff pathology and to some extent labral abnormalities.[Diagnostic imaging of the shoulder joint in impingement].Accuracy of fat-suppressed MR imaging of the shoulder for detection of partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.US depiction of partial-thickness tear of the rotator cuff.To test previously defined ultrasound (US) criteria for identification of partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff.Before shoulder arthroscopy, 52 patients with shoulder pain for more than 3 months were examined with a 7.5-MHz commercially available linear-array transducer and a standardized study protocol. The criteria used to detect partial-thickness tears were (a) a mixed hyper- and hypoechoic focus in the crucial zone of the supraspinatus tendon and (b) a hypoechoic lesion visualized in two orthogonal imaging planes with either articular or bursal extension.The US findings were reported as partial-thickness tears in 17 shoulders, of which three were false-positive findings. There was one false-negative finding. The sensitivity of US in depiction of partial-thickness tears was 93%, and specificity was 94%. The positive predictive value was 82%, and the negative predictive value was 98%.US can depict most partial-thickness tears with use of the criteria described.Effect of field of view on MR diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.To determine the effect of decreasing the field of view (FOV) on the accuracy of MR for diagnosing rotator cuff tears.One hundred shoulder MR scans with surgical correlation were evaluated for the presence or absence of a cuff tear. The sensitivity and specificity of MR relative to the surgical results were determined for the 59 patients scanned with a 24-cm FOV, and the 41 patients scanned with an 18-cm FOV. All other imaging parameters including acquisition time were identical. The sensitivity and specificity of the two groups were compared using a t-test.The specificity of MR for diagnosing a rotator cuff tear improved from 0.65 for the 24-cm FOV group to 0.89 for the 18-cm FOV group (P = 0.04). The sensitivity changed from 0.91 to 0.96 (P = 0.25).Reducing the FOV from 24 cm to 18 cm results in a statistically significant improvement in specificity of MR for diagnosing rotator cuff tears.Acute traumatic tears of the rotator cuff: value of sonography.To determine the value of sonography in the evaluation of acute traumatic tears of the rotator cuff.Preoperative sonography was performed within 3 weeks of trauma in 184 patients, 98 of whom underwent surgery. The rotator cuff tears were preoperatively classified as partial-thickness tears or as small, large, or massive full-thickness tears. Sonographic findings were correlated with surgical findings (n = 70) and arthroscopic inspection (n = 28).Adequate examination was possible in 163 (88%) of 184 patients. Sonography demonstrated 42 (91%) of 46 full-thickness tears and seven (78%) of nine partial-thickness tears. Sonography showed more extensive tears than were found at surgery in four (4%) of 98 patients and less extensive tears in seven (7%) of 98 patients. Sonographic patterns were a defect (31 [63%] of 49 tears), focal thinning (10 [21%] of 49 tears), and nonvisualization (eight [16%] of 49 tears).Sonography is useful in the evaluation of acute shoulder trauma when a rotator cuff tear is suspected and findings at plain radiography are negative.Association of sonographically detected subacromial/subdeltoid bursal effusion and intraarticular fluid with rotator cuff tear.Although an association between sonographically detected joint fluid and rotator cuff disease has been reported, the significance of sonographically detected subacromial/subdeltoid bursal effusion has not been studied. We examined a group of patients who had shoulder sonography and surgery to determine the association between bursal and joint effusion and surgically proved tears of the rotator cuff.We retrospectively reviewed the preoperative shoulder sonography reports of 163 patients for the presence of fluid within the subacromial/subdeltoid bursa or glenohumeral joint. Surgical reports were obtained to determine the status of the rotator cuff. The sonographic reports of 232 asymptomatic shoulders were also reviewed to determine the prevalence of fluid within the subacromial/subdeltoid bursa or the glenohumeral joint.Sixty-seven (41%) of the 163 patients had a joint effusion, bursal fluid, or both. Joint effusion alone was seen in 35 patients. Fourteen of these had a normal rotator cuff at surgery, and 21 had a rotator cuff tear (sensitivity, 22%; specificity, 79%; positive predictive value, 60%). Bursal fluid alone was seen in 10 patients, seven of whom had a rotator cuff tear (sensitivity, 7%; specificity, 96%; positive predictive value, 70%). In 22 patients, fluid was seen in both the bursa and the joint; 21 had surgically proved rotator cuff tears (sensitivity, 22%; specificity, 99%; positive predictive value, 95%). Of the 232 asymptomatic shoulders, 16 (6.9%) had isolated joint effusions, eight (3.4%) had isolated bursal effusions, and four (1.7%) had both joint and bursal effusions.The sonographic finding of intraarticular fluid alone (without bursal fluid) has both a low sensitivity and a low specificity for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. However, the finding of fluid in the subacromial/subdeltoid bursa, especially when combined with a joint effusion, is highly specific and has a high positive predictive value for associated rotator cuff tears. Sonographically detected fluid in both the joint and the bursa is an uncommon finding in asymptomatic shoulders. The sonographic observation of fluid in the subacromial bursa, either isolated or combined with a joint effusion, should prompt a careful evaluation of the supraspinatus tendon for tear.MR diagnosis of rotator cuff tears of the shoulder: value of using T2-weighted fat-saturated images.The purpose of this study was to compare the use of fat-saturated T2-weighted spin-echo MR imaging with that of conventional T2-weighted spin-echo MR imaging to detect full- and partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff of the shoulder, using arthroscopy as the standard for the diagnosis.Forty-nine consecutive patients with shoulder pain who had both MR imaging and arthroscopy of their affected shoulders were studied. The study group consisted of 10 patients with full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff, 20 with partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff, and 19 with intact rotator cuff tendons proved arthroscopically. All patients had T1-weighted, conventional T2-weighted, and fat-saturated T2-weighted MR images obtained in a plane slightly oblique to the coronal plane along the long axis of the supraspinous tendon. The images were divided into two sets, one including both T1-weighted and conventional T2-weighted images, the other including T1-weighted and fat-saturated T2-weighted images. Two musculoskeletal radiologists reviewed each set of MR images in a blinded fashion. The reviewers were asked to decide whether the rotator cuff showed a full-thickness tear, a partial-thickness tear, or no tear on each set of images. In the case of partial-thickness tears, the reviewers were asked to indicate which surface (bursal or joint) of the rotator cuff was affected. These data were correlated with the arthroscopic findings and with each other using McNemar and kappa analysis.Detection of full-thickness tears was excellent for both reviewers using either imaging technique. However, when the fat-saturated technique was used, the sensitivity increased significantly, from 80% to 100%. Detection of partial-thickness tears was poor with conventional spin-echo MR imaging (15%). Although significantly improved when fat saturation was used (35%), detection rates were still lower than rates reported in the literature. Identification of the torn surface of the rotator cuff was correct in 50% of cases in which partial-thickness tears were successfully identified. Fat saturation decreased the specificity of identification of both partial and full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff but significantly increased the specificity with which intact rotator cuffs were identified.Use of the fat-saturation technique improved detection of both full-thickness and partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff on MR images compared with standard spin-echo imaging techniques. Despite this improvement, detection of partial-thickness tears was poor with both techniques. Furthermore, correct identification of which surface of the rotator cuff was torn in patients with partial tears was nearly random.Rotator cuff tendon tears: evaluation with fat-suppressed MR imaging with arthroscopic correlation in 100 patients.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of fat-suppressed magnetic resonance (MR) imaging of rotator cuff tears in a large symptomatic population.One hundred patients underwent both MR imaging and arthroscopy of the shoulder. Ninety-two patients underwent fat-suppressed conventional spin-echo MR imaging (repetition time msec/echo time msec = 2,500/20, 60), and eight patients underwent fat-suppressed, fast spin-echo MR imaging (2,000/80).With data combined for complete and partial tears of the rotator cuff (n = 31), MR imaging had an accuracy of 93%; sensitivity, 84%; and specificity, 97%. Seventeen of 20 complete tears and nine of 11 partial tears were properly identified with MR imaging. Two partial tears were not detected and three complete tears were incorrectly called partial tears at MR imaging. Of two false-positive MR imaging findings, one was called a complete tear and the other, a partial tear.Fat-suppressed MR imaging has high diagnostic accuracy in evaluating tears of the rotator cuff tendon.[Chronic shoulder pain. Ultrasonography versus surgery].This work was aimed at investigating US reliability in the diagnosis of rotator cuff lesions. A series of 554 patients with a chronically painful shoulder submitted to US was retrospectively reviewed to search for any possible rotator cuff lesion. US demonstrated total or partial cuff tears in 82 potentially surgical patients (14.8%) Then, in this group, the occurrence of every US sign was investigated. Cuff disappearance was observed in 42 patients (51.2%), convexity loss in 20 (24.4%), cuff thinning in 17 (20.75%) and focal discontinuity in 3 patients only (3.7%). In the second part of the study, we considered only 33 surgical patients. Surgery confirmed cuff tears in 30 patients (90.9%), whereas in 3 false-positive patients US had overestimated focal hyperechoic areas and tendon thinning. Thus, our study confirms the almost absolute sensitivity of some US signs of cuff lesions, e.g., cuff disappearance and convexity loss, in the screening of the patients with a chronically painful shoulder. On the contrary, when focal hyperechoic lesions or tendon thinning are present and US poorly demonstrates them, potentially surgical patients must be submitted to MRI.Rotator cuff disorders: interobserver and intraobserver variation in diagnosis with MR imaging.To determine interobserver and intraobserver variation in the interpretation of magnetic resonance (MR) images in rotator cuff disorders.MR images of the shoulder in 97 patients were retrospectively reviewed twice, with a 3-week interval. Surgical findings indicated a full-thickness tear in 29 patients, grade 1 impingement in 19 (tendinitis), and grade 2 impingement (partial tear) in 26. The control population comprised 23 asymptomatic volunteers or patients.All observers were accurate in the diagnosis of a full-thickness tear (89%-98%), with good intraobserver (kappa = 0.67-0.84) and interobserver agreement (kappa = 0.74-0.92). In diagnoses of tendinitis, partial tear, and normal cuff, there were wide ranges of sensitivity (13%-74%) and specificity (72%-93%), as well as poor interobserver (kappa = 0.12-0.60) and intraobserver agreement (kappa = 0.35-0.78).Full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff can be accurately identified at MR imaging with little observer variation. Consistent differentiation of normal rotator cuff, tendinitis, and partial thickness tears is more difficult.[Ultrasonography of the tendons of the rotator cuffs of the shoulder].After a short review of the use of ultrasonography to study shoulder rotator tendons, the technique of the investigation is described, as well as the main landmarks, findings indicative of complete rotator cuff tear, and limitations of ultrasonography in this indication. A number of issues concerning the preoperative workup are discussed. Results in a prospective study of 100 patients are reported. Findings upon ultrasonography, arthrography, and surgical exploration in these patients are analyzed comparatively. Sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tear (RCT) were 95% and 100%, respectively. These data show that ultrasonography is a reliable investigation for confirming, detecting, and evaluating RCT, although extensive experience with the technique is required.[The value of MRI in the evaluation of lesions of the supraspinous muscle. Multicentric retrospective study of 66 records].[Lesions of the rotatory cuff: diagnostic validity of echography. Surgical findings].Ultrasonography is the method of choice in the study of rotator cuff tears, a very frequent event especially as the final outcome of the impingement syndrome. The authors investigated US sensitivity with the retrospective review of 20 surgical patients with a chronically painful shoulder. US sensitivity was 85%, with 15% false-negative results. Seventeen true-positive cases were restudied for the three main US signs of cuff tear: marked tendon thinning was observed in 64.7% of cases, cuff disappearance in 23.5% and focal discontinuity in 11.8%. This retrospective study confirms that, whenever US shows a cuff tear, the diagnosis can be made, while when US findings are negative or questionable, but clinics are positive, MRI must be performed.[Rotator cuff rupture in the shoulder impingement syndrome. Echography and arthrography: 2 diagnostic methods compared].After briefly reviewing the shoulder impingement syndrome, the authors investigate the role of two diagnostic imaging methods, i.e., ultrasonography (US) and arthrography, in demonstrating the typical features of this condition. Over a 15 months' period, 190 patients suffering from shoulder pain were examined with arthrography; 50 of them subsequently underwent acromion plastic surgery and rotator cuff stitching. This study was aimed at comparing US and arthrographic results, applying classifiable criteria to make the most accurate diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. The lack of visibility of the rotator cuff at US was the major and clearest sign of tear (100% of cases). The association between cuff thinning and hypo/hyperechoic damaged focal areas was another major sign (in 76.19% of complete tears and in 14.28% of incomplete tears). Hyperechoic focal areas alone proved to be a false-positive finding in 5 cases, while in 11 of 19 cases normal US patterns were a false-negative finding; in 3 cases other conditions were diagnosed. To conclude, the value of US is emphasized in the screening of the painful shoulder and the use of arthrography is suggested when both clinical tests and US fail to yield enough information for a diagnosis to be made.Imaging options for suspected rotator cuff disorder.Diagnosis of partial and complete rotator cuff tears using combined gradient echo and spin echo imaging.Most magnetic resonance (MR) studies evaluating the rotator cuff for tears have used T2-weighted imaging in the coronal oblique and sagittal oblique planes. T2*-weighted gradient echo imaging, however, has advantages over spin echo imaging, including contiguous slices without cross-talk, high contrast around the cuff, and intrinsically shorter imaging times which can be used to increase the number of signals averaged and thus improve the signal-to-noise ratio. We reviewed the shoulder MR scans of 87 consecutive patients who underwent both a MR scan and a shoulder arthroscopy during which the size of tears, if present, was graded. The reviewers were blinded as to the history and arthroscopic results. The MR scans included oblique coronal T2*-weighted gradient echo and oblique sagittal T2-weighted spin echo images. MR cuff grades were correlated with arthroscopic findings. For complete tears, the sensitivity of MR was 0.91 and the specificity 0.95. For partial tears, the sensitivity was 0.74 and the specificity 0.87. This accuracy is similar to two-plane T2-weighted imaging as previously reported in the literature. There was a statistically significant correlation (p < 0.0005) between the cuff grade as determined by MR and the arthroscopic findings.Isolated subacromial bursal fluid on MRI of the shoulder in symptomatic patients: correlation with arthroscopic findings.Fluid in the subacromial bursa (SAB) is a common finding on magnetic resonance (MR) images of the shoulder, and the implications of this finding have not been clarified. We retrospectively reviewed and correlated the MR features with arthroscopic findings in 21 symptomatic patients who had fluid in the SAB on MR imaging without demonstrable rotator cuff tear. Rotator cuff impingement was the most frequent surgical finding (42.9%). Other frequent surgical observations were glenoid labrum abnormality (28.6%), bursitis (19%), and supraspinatus tendinitis (14.3%). Distribution of acromial types was similar to that reported by Bigliani et al., and impingement was evenly distributed among acromial types in our study population. We conclude that in our patient population group the MR finding of isolated SAB fluid in symptomatic patients is highly likely to be associated with the finding of other abnormalities in the shoulder joint at surgery.MR arthrographic depiction of tears of the rotator cuff: benefit of abduction and external rotation of the arm.To show the effectiveness of positioning the arm in abduction and external rotation (ABER) during magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography for depiction of tears of the rotator cuff.Five throwing athletes with shoulder pain were prospectively imaged with standard MR imaging, MR arthrography, and ABER MR arthrography. The status of the rotator cuff was recorded; arthroscopic correlation was obtained.One partial tear of the distal infraspinatus tendon was detected with ABER MR arthrography only. One full-thickness tear was detected with both MR arthrography and ABER MR arthrography, but the component of the tear that extended into the infraspinatus tendon was depicted with ABER MR arthrography only. One partial tear was detected with both MR arthrography and ABER MR arthrography; no additional information was provided by either technique alone.The ABER position may be useful in detection and characterization of tears of the rotator cuff, especially partial tears of the undersurface. This information would be useful in selection of patients for conservative therapy, arthroscopy, or arthrotomy.What is the significance on increased signal within the rotator cuff on T2-weighted images in the coronal oblique plane?Is shoulder arthrography considered an acceptable alternative to MR imaging in the evaluation of rotator cuff tears?Intraarticular findings in the chronically painful shoulder. A study of 32 posttraumatic cases.32 consecutive patients suffering from chronic shoulder pain for more than 6 months after a single, nondislocating shoulder trauma were examined clinically and by special radiographs, dynamic sonography, MRI and arthroscopy. Typical complaints were pain during loading, especially during over the head activities. Symptoms of a "dead arm" and instability were also present. Patients with previous dislocations, traumas or radiographic signs of degenerative shoulder lesions were excluded. The patients had a decreased active range of motion and positive signs of apprehension and impingement, but only 4 had clinical signs of shoulder instability. Diagnostic evaluation identified labral tears, partial and total rotator cuff lesions with subacromial impingement and tendinitis of the biceps tendon. Surgery was performed in 24 patients, using capsulolabral and rotator cuff reconstruction, arthroscopic labral resection and open subacromial decompression. In conclusion, patients with chronic posttraumatic shoulder pain have intraarticular injuries, especially tears of the glenoid labrum. History, clinical findings, radiography and sonography are seldom diagnostic. MRI is valuable, particularly for identification of labral pathology, but arthroscopy appears necessary for a preoperative assessment.Ultrasonography and arthrography in the diagnosis of tears of the rotator cuff.The accuracy of ultrasonography and arthrography in the prediction of lesions of the rotator cuff was evaluated and compared with the operative findings in a retrospective study of forty-nine patients (forty-nine shoulders). In the detection of full-thickness (stage-III) tears of the rotator cuff, ultrasonography had an over-all sensitivity of 74 per cent, a specificity of 95 per cent, an accuracy of 84 per cent, a predictive value of a positive test of 95 per cent, and a predictive value of a negative test of 75 per cent. In contrast, arthrography demonstrated a sensitivity of 93 per cent, a specificity of 95 per cent, an accuracy of 94 per cent, a predictive value of a positive test of 96 per cent, and a predictive value of a negative test of 91 per cent. Ultrasonography could not reliably differentiate between partial (stage-II) and full-thickness (stage-III) tears. Lesions of the long head of the biceps brachii tendon were recorded by ultrasonography for twenty-two patients (45 per cent) and by arthrography for eleven patients (22 per cent). The ultrasonographic finding of fluid in the sheath of this tendon is not a reliable sign of a lesion in the tendon.Magnetic resonance imaging of rotator cuff lesions.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in rotator cuff diseases. Forty consecutive patients studied by MRI from September 1990 to September 1992 were included in the study. MRI was performed on a 1.5 tesla MR scanner. Each MRI study was reviewed by two radiologists experienced in rotator cuff tendons. The MRI finding was compared with the surgical result. MRI sensitivity for all tears (partial and complete) was 1.0 (22/22), specificity 0.89 (16/18), accuracy rate 0.95 (38/40), and the predictive value 0.92 (22/24). Signal changes of the rotator cuff tendon (primary signs) were the most reliable criteria in diagnosis of the tear. Changes of subacromial and subdeltoid fat planes and bursa (secondary signs) were complimentary when primary signs were indeterminant. The direction of the long axis of abnormal signal intensity in the rotator cuff tendon may be a good indicator when differentiating tears from tendinitis. We conclude that MRI shows excellent performance in the determination of the presence or absence of a rotator cuff tear.Correlation between MRI and operative findings of the rotator cuff tear.Rotator cuff disease is one of the most common causes of shoulder pain. Various methods have been used to evaluate this problem. In this study, we determine the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the shoulder in diagnosing the rotator cuff tear based on operative findings. Ten patients with a painful shoulder requiring operation received an MRI of the shoulder before surgery. A GE 1.5 Tesla MR scanner with a five-inch planar surface coil was applied and the diagnosis was confirmed by an experienced radiologist in the field of musculoskeletal MRI. All patients underwent surgery within two weeks of MRI examination. Nine of the 10 patients were shown to have rotator cuff tear by MRI. Among the nine MRI positive patients, eight were proven to have such lesions on operation (two massive tears, four moderate complete tears, and two bursal side tears). One false-positive result was found to be an adhesive capsulitis and supraspinatus tendinitis at operation. The remaining case, diagnosed as tendinitis by MRI, turned out to be a small incomplete tear on operation. Therefore, the sensitivity of MRI for rotator cuff tear in this study was 0.89. The overall accuracy was 80%. We concluded that MRI has a high accuracy in detecting the rotator cuff tear. False-positive and false-negative diagnoses were attributed to a severe tendinitis and an incomplete tear, respectively.Magnetic resonance imaging studies of the shoulder: diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff.Diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance imaging for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears using supplemental images in the oblique sagittal plane.The authors evaluated the diagnostic utility of supplemental imaging in the oblique sagittal (OS) plane for the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Two radiologists with varying levels of MRI experience blindly reviewed shoulder MR examinations of 50 patients for rotator cuff tears. Shoulder examinations were interpreted twice, initially using only double-echo spin-echo images obtained in the oblique coronal (OC) plane and later using double-echo spin-echo images obtained in the both the OC and OS planes. Tears were characterized according to size, location, and extent, and levels of diagnostic confidence were evaluated.Sensitivity and specificity of MR for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tear was 85% and 80%, respectively, with the OC series increasing to 95% and 93%, respectively with OCOS scans. However, these increases were not statistically significant. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves suggest a trend toward increased diagnostic confidence when supplemental OS scans are available, especially for the less experienced reader. Characterization of rotator cuff tears was not improved with additional OS images.Supplemental OS scans did not demonstrate a definite improvement in diagnostic accuracy for rotator cuff tears compared to OC scans alone. Estimations based on sample size calculations indicate that a much larger population of patients would be needed to show a statistically significant difference.Rotator cuff: evaluation with fat-suppressed MR arthrography.Thirty-seven shoulders with rotator cuff diagnoses proved at arthrography, arthroscopy, or open surgery were examined prospectively with magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography. T1-weighted MR images were obtained with and without fat suppression after intraarticular injection of gadopentetate dimeglumine. Without fat suppression, overall accuracy was 84%. False-positive full-thickness tears were diagnosed in three patients who were proved to have partial tears. False-negative normal tendons were diagnosed in two patients who had partial tears. The corresponding sensitivity and specificity were 90% and 75%, respectively. With the aid of fat-suppressed imaging, full-thickness and partial cuff tears were identified with 100% sensitivity and specificity. Fat-suppressed images also showed intratendinous contrast material imbibition in three torn cuffs with frayed, friable tendon margins. Fat suppression in MR arthrography is valuable in the differentiation of partial from full-thickness cuff tears and in the detection of small partial tears of the inferior tendon surface.Magnetic resonance-imaging studies of the shoulder. Diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff.[MRI in the pre-operative evaluation of lesions of the rotator cuff].The authors report a series of 38 patients who had been examined by MRI and then operated for a rotator cuff syndrome. The correlation between the description of the cuff lesions after MRI and the surgical observations were excellent for 37 patients. In one case MRI showed a false image of tear of the supra spinatus m. on its anterior edge. This was due to a bad knowledge of the anatomy of the muscle and tendon and to a poor orientation of the frontal cut plane. This study was complete with MRI and anatomic study of 12 non embalmed cadaveric shoulders. The results showed that MRI was very sensitive (0.93) and specific (0.94) for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. MRI allowed also to show partial tears of the tendons of the rotator cuff. The authors propose a MRI classification of cuff lesions which permits to establish a good surgical planning.Sonography of the shoulder in patients with tears of the rotator cuff: accuracy and value for selecting surgical options.The management of patients with signs and symptoms referable to the rotator cuff depends on the presence of cuff injury and the size of the tear. Treatment options include conservative nonsurgical management for patients with an intact or partially torn cuff, arthroscopic decompression of the coracoacromial space for those not responding to nonsurgical management, and a range of surgical techniques to repair full-thickness tears. This study was designed to determine whether sonographic evaluation with classification of the extent of cuff injury is accurate for purposes of treatment planning.Preoperative sonography of the rotator cuff was performed on 225 patients, and findings were classified into intact, partial tear, small full-thickness tear, large full-thickness tear, and massive tear groups. Surgical correlation with the predicted sonographic classification was provided by arthroscopic inspection or open surgery.The sonographic findings were surgically confirmed for 206 (92%) of the 225 patients. More extensive cuff injury was encountered during surgery than had been predicted sonographically in 11 patients (5%); less extensive injury than predicted was found during surgery in eight patients (4%).Our results show a high correlation between the sonographic classification of rotator cuff injury and the surgical findings. The selection of appropriate treatment programs can be reliably based on the sonographic classification.[Possibilities of shoulder arthroscopy in comparison with magnetic resonance tomography and arthro-computerized tomography].In the last 15 years the methods of examination of the shoulder have intensively expounded. According to a well documented retrospective study we describe the value of the shoulder arthroscopy and its correlation to MRI and arthro-CT findings. MRI represents nowadays the best way of exploring rotator cuff lesions and of investigating an impingement syndrome. Associated with a contrast medium its ability to clear up an anterior or posterior shoulder instability is now superior to the arthro-CT's. The arthroscopy allows the dynamic exploration of the joint and can be used not only as a diagnostic but also as a therapeutic procedure.Fat-suppression MR arthrography of the shoulder.[Arthroscopy and MRT of the shoulder--a comparative retrospective analysis].MR Imaging is proving to an effective means for evaluating the shoulder. The use of a surface coil and high resolution scanning techniques have allowed detailed analysis of normal anatomy and suspected pathology of the shoulder. On the other way arthroscopic inspection provides a more extensive visualization of the joint in different positions. 31 patients, well documented, were studied with MR Imaging and correlated with findings in arthroscopy and open revision in some cases. The MR studies were retrospective interpreted without the knowledge of the results of other diagnostic procedures. For the evaluation of rotator cuff tears MRI proved to have a sensitivity of 83.3% and an accuracy of 90.3%. When Arthroscopy was correlated with open revision the sensitivity was 61.8% and the accuracy 78%. Labral pathology and Hill-Sachs lesions will be better evaluated in arthroscopy as in MRI (sensitivity of arthroscopy 100% and of MRI 69%, accuracy of arthroscopy 100% and of MRI 87.1%). With the high resolution scanning technique and a surface coil MRI has been shown to be useful in the evaluation of rotator cuff tears and impingement syndrome but not in diagnosis of labral pathology and Hill-Sachs lesions.Full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff of the shoulder: diagnosis with MR imaging.The purpose of this study was to describe MR findings in full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff. Of 102 shoulders examined by MR imaging, 31 were found to have a full-thickness tendon tear at arthroscopy/bursoscopy (five shoulders) or open surgery (26 shoulders). All shoulders were imaged in oblique coronal and axial planes. MR images of the 102 shoulders were evaluated for (1) the presence of fluid in the subacromial and subdeltoid bursae; (2) abnormal signal of the supraspinatus, subscapularis, infraspinatus, and teres minor tendons; (3) interruption of tendon continuity and thinning of the tendon; and (4) proximal retraction of the junction of the muscle and tendon. The presence or absence of each finding was determined by consensus of two radiologists, who interpreted the images without knowledge of the surgical findings. Results in those 31 shoulders with proved full-thickness tears were: fluid in the subacromial bursae (29 shoulders), interruption of tendinous continuity (22 shoulders), focally increased signal of the tendon equivalent to that of water (27 shoulders), and musculotendinous retraction (24 shoulders). The finding of subacromial fluid was a sensitive indicator (93%) of a full-thickness tear, and interruption of tendinous continuity was a specific finding (96%) in diagnosing a full-thickness tear. Our experience shows interruption of tendon continuity is the most specific MR finding of full-thickness rotator cuff tears, while subacromial fluid is the most common finding.Rotator cuff disease: assessment with MR arthrography versus standard MR imaging in 36 patients with arthroscopic confirmation.Standard proton-density- and T2-weighted magnetic resonance (MR) imaging and MR arthrography were used to depict rotator cuff disease in 36 shoulders in 36 patients; the findings were compared with arthroscopic findings in every patient. In 19 rotator cuffs normal at arthroscopy, MR arthrography revealed no tear in 16 patients, a partial tear in one patient, and a full-thickness tear in two patients. Standard proton-density- and T2-weighted images were normal in 15 of these patients and revealed a partial tear in two patients and a full-thickness tear in two patients. In 13 partial tears found at arthroscopy, MR arthrography showed a partial tear in six patients, no tear in five patients, and a full-thickness tear in two patients; standard MR imaging revealed a partial tear in one patient, no tear in 10 patients, and a full-thickness tear in two patients. All four full-thickness tears proved with arthroscopy were correctly diagnosed with both MR imaging methods. The main advantage of MR arthrography was better depiction of partial tears in the articular surface.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder joint.Because the shoulder is the most mobile joint in the body, it is naturally predisposed to several disorders. The most commonly encountered disorders requiring diagnostic imaging are rotator cuff disease and glenohumeral instability. Plain film radiography and arthrography have for many years been the mainstays of shoulder imaging. CT added a third dimension to shoulder imaging, improving its sensitivity with respect to glenoid labral pathology. Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff showed early promise in noninvasive evaluation of cuff tears, but it did not gain universal acceptance because of various negative factors, including inadequate visualization of the cuff, poor results regarding partial tears, and most importantly, operator dependency. The development of MR imaging afforded the radiologist improved comprehensive visualization of the shoulder joint in a noninvasive manner.[Contribution of gradient-echo MRI in the study of subacromial pathology: correlation between surgery and arthrography].30 asymptomatic volunteer subjects and more than 400 patients with suspected rotator cuff lesions were examined by MRI at 0.5 T using T2*-PD weighted gradient echo (T2-GEI) sequences. Its superiority over T2 spin echo imaging was established in previous studies. The results were compared to those of surgery in 87 cases and arthrography in 233 cases (associated with CT arthrography in 70 cases). In the operated patients, T2-GEI and arthrography correctly diagnosed 49 complete ruptures (CR). T2-GEI was found to be superior to arthrography for defining the real extent of the rupture, the degree of tendon retraction and the local muscular trophicity, essential information to define the therapeutic indications. In contrast, among 22 lesions of the long biceps tendon, correctly demonstrated by arthrography or CT arthrography, 5 intracapsular lesions were not detected by MRI. MRI was able to detect 8 lesions of the anterior labrum associated with a CR not demonstrated by arthrography. Lastly, among the 18 cases of partial inferior rupture (PIR), 6 partial superficial ruptures and 14 cases of inflammatory changes, correctly diagnosed by MRI, only 8 PIR were also demonstrated by arthrography. For the non-operated patients investigated by the two modalities (146 cases), T2-GEI and arthrography were concordant in 43 cases. In contrast, 103 intact cuffs on arthrography showed features on T2-GEI compatible with tendinopathy without rupture, bursitis and degenerative changes. In the absence of very fine surgical or histological correlations for these small lesions, it is impossible, at the present time, to determine the real sensitivity and specificity of MRI.[Ultrasonography of the shoulder: diagnosis of rupture of tendons of the rotator muscles].After a short historical review of the use of ultrasonography to study shoulder rotator tendons, the technique of the investigation is described, as well as the main landmarks, findings indicative of complete rotator cuff tear, and limitations of ultrasonography in this indication. A number of issues concerning the preoperative workup are discussed. Results in a prospective study of 24 patients are reported. Findings upon ultrasonography, arthrography, and surgical exploration in these patients are analyzed comparatively. Sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tear (RCT) were 95% and 100%, respectively. These data show that ultrasonography is a reliable investigation for confirming, detecting, and evaluating RCT, although extensive experience with the technique is required.Sonography for diagnosis of rotator cuff tear. Comparison with observations at surgery in 58 shoulders.To investigate the correlation between ultrasonographic and anatomic changes of the rotator cuff of the shoulder, we studied the findings in 58 surgical cases. Fifteen cases had a full thickness tear, 10 of which had a positive and 5 a negative ultrasonogram. Nine cases had partial tears of the cuff on the bursal side. Ultrasonographically, 3 of these were normal. Among the 34 cases that proved to be normal at surgery, 9 had positive ultrasonograms. The predictive value of a negative examination was 0.8, whereas the predictive value of a positive examination was 0.6. A cautious attitude towards ultrasonography for evaluation of the rotator cuff seems appropriate.Effect of arm rotation on MR imaging of the rotator cuff.The effect of humeral rotation on the appearance of the rotator cuff tendon in oblique coronal magnetic resonance images was evaluated in 70 such images. Internal rotation produced overlap of the supraspinatus and infraspinatus tendons with soft-tissue interposition or apparent discontinuity of the tendon in 22 cases, including 14 of 15 shoulders positioned in the first 30 degrees between extreme internal and external rotation. Imaging in internal rotation makes assessment of the tendon difficult and should be avoided.Imaging evaluation of rotator cuff tears.Evaluation of the painful shoulder. A prospective comparison of magnetic resonance imaging, computerized tomographic arthrography, ultrasonography, and operative findings.Twenty-one patients who had had pain in the shoulder for more than three months were evaluated with ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging followed by computerized tomographic arthrography. The results of the imaging studies were then compared with the operative findings. Magnetic resonance imaging was found to be the most useful modality for establishment of the etiology of pain in the shoulder due to disease of the rotator cuff, instability associated with abnormality of the glenoid labrum, subacromial impingement, stenosis of the coracoacromial arch, and osteoarthrosis of either the glenohumeral or the acromioclavicular joint. The accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging was found to depend on both the operator and the technique and was decreased in extremely obese patients, due to difficulties in positioning, and in patients who had had a previous operation. Magnetic resonance imaging was more accurate than either computerized tomographic arthrography or ultrasonography in identifying partial-thickness tears (intrasubstance changes in the rotator cuff). Magnetic resonance imaging provided the same level of accuracy as computerized tomographic arthrography in the detection of abnormalities of the glenoid labrum.Evaluation of degenerative lesions of the rotator cuff. A comparison of arthrography and ultrasonography.A prospective study was performed to determine the accuracy of arthrography compared with ultrasonography in the evaluation of thirty-two patients who had a degenerative lesion of the rotator cuff. Both tests were done preoperatively, and the condition of the rotator cuff was determined intraoperatively. Arthrography was accurate in the diagnosis of twenty-eight (87 per cent) of the thirty-two patients (twenty who had a full-thickness tear, seven who had a partial-thickness tear, and five who had an untorn rotator cuff and tendinitis), while ultrasonography was diagnostic in only twelve (37 per cent). In this specific population of patients, arthrography was found to be superior to ultrasonography.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder. Sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value.The sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value of magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff, glenohumeral capsule, and glenoid labrum were evaluated in ninety-one patients and fifteen asymptomatic volunteers. Magnetic resonance imaging demonstrated 100 per cent sensitivity and 95 per cent specificity in the diagnosis of complete tears, and it consistently predicted the size of the tear of the rotator cuff. There was a definite correlation between atrophy of the supraspinatus muscle and the size of a complete, chronic tear of the rotator cuff. The sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance imaging in the differentiation of tendinitis from degeneration of the cuff were 82 and 85 per cent, and in the differentiation of a normal tendon from one affected by tendinitis with signs of impingement the sensitivity and specificity were 93 and 87 per cent. The formation of spurs around the acromion and acromiocalvicular joint correlated highly with increased age of the patient and with chronic disease of the rotator cuff. The sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of labral tears associated with glenohumeral instability were 88 and 93 per cent. The study showed that high-resolution magnetic-resonance imaging is an excellent non-invasive tool in the diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff and glenohumeral instability.MRI and ultrasound evaluation of the shoulder.[Contribution of echogradient magnetic resonance imaging in the study of subacromial diseases. Surgical and arthrographic correlations].Fifteen asymptomatic volunteers and 300 patients with suspected lesions of the rotator cuff were examined with T2*- and proton density-weighted gradient echo (T2*-Rho-GEI) MRI sequences (500-700 ms/30 ms/30 degrees) with a 0.5 T (GE-CGR) system and an adapted surface coil. For the patients, the findings were compared with those of arthrography in 130 cases and of surgery in 42 cases. For the operated patients, T2*-Rho-GEI and arthrography allowed correctly diagnosing 31 complete ruptures (CR). However, surgical exploration of the ruptures showed that T2*-Rho-GEI showed the actual extent of the rupture and the degree of tendon retraction better than arthrography. T2*-Rho-GEI also provides information about the thickness and trophicity of the remaining cuff and on local muscle trophicity. T2*-Rho-GEI allows directly evaluating the tendon of the long head of the biceps both in its extra-articular and its intra-articular parts. In 3 cases of complete cuff rupture, MRI allowed detecting 3 associated lesions of the anterior labrum, which had not been suspected on the clinical examination and had not been demonstrated by conventional arthrography. Lastly, out of 12 cases of deep incomplete rupture (n = 12) correctly diagnosed with MRI, 5 had been undetected on arthrography. Similarly, 8 cases of inflammatory alterations suspected with T2*-Rho-GEI and confirmed by surgery had not been recognized with arthrography. For the non-operated patients, T2*-Rho-GEI and arthrography had corresponding results for the diagnosis of CR (8 cases), of DIR (6 cases) and of intact cuff (6 cases).(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)[Contribution of MRI to the preoperative evaluation of rotator cuff tears].The authors report a series of 38 patients who had been examined by MRI and then operated for a rotator cuff syndrome. The correlation between the description of the cuff lesions after MRI and the surgical observations were excellent for 37 patients. In one case MRI showed a false image of tear of the supra spinatus m. on its anterior edge. This was due to a bad knowledge of the anatomy of the muscle and tendon and to a poor orientation of the frontal cut plane. This study was completed with MRI and anatomic study of 12 non embalmed cadaveric shoulders. The results showed that MRI was very sensitive (0.93) and specific (0.94) for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. MRI allowed also to show partial tears of the tendons of the rotator cuff. The authors propose a MRI classification of cuff lesions which permits to establish a good surgical planning.Rotator cuff lesions: signal patterns at MR imaging.The signal intensity patterns of rotator cuff lesions at magnetic resonance (MR) imaging were evaluated in 80 patients who had surgical correlation and in 13 asymptomatic individuals (14 shoulders). Six cadaver shoulders were examined with MR, and histologic correlation was obtained in four. All studies were performed at 1.5 T with a flexible circular surface coil. The accuracy of MR imaging in detection of full-thickness cuff tears (31 patients) was 0.95 and of partial thickness tears (16 patients), 0.84. The most common and accurate pattern for full-thickness cuff tears (22 of 31 tears) was a region of intense signal seen on T2-weighted images. Less often the torn region consisted of an extremely degenerated and attenuated tendon with moderate signal intensity or was obscured by low-signal-intensity scar. The intense signal pattern on T2-weighted images was also accurate, although a less common finding (seven of 16 cases), in the diagnosis of partial tears. Tendinitis was recognized as focal or diffuse regions of increased signal intensity or a nonhomogeneous pattern of increased signal often associated with tendinous enlargement. In some patients, manifestations of subacromial-subdeltoid bursitis was present. Tendon degeneration was also manifested as regions of increased signal intensity. Some similarity and overlap of signal patterns of partial interstitial tears, tendinitis, and tendon degeneration are observed.MR arthrography of the shoulder: comparison with conventional MR imaging.Twenty-three patients underwent both conventional MR imaging of the shoulder and MR shoulder arthrography for clinically suspected labral or rotator cuff abnormalities. Images obtained before and after contrast administration were studied independently, and without knowledge of clinical findings, by two radiologists for the presence of abnormalities of the glenoid labrum or rotator cuff. Results were correlated with surgical findings in all patients. Nine patients had surgically proved labral tears. MR arthrography detected all nine labral abnormalities, while six of the nine were missed on conventional MR imaging. Fourteen patients had surgically proved rotator cuff tears. MR arthrography detected 11 of the 14 tears and missed three partial tears on the bursal surface. Conventional MR imaging detected nine cuff tears and missed five tears; two of these were complete rotator cuff tears and three were partial tears of the undersurface of the rotator cuff. Our results suggest that MR arthrography enhances the accuracy of MR in the evaluation of the glenoid labrum and rotator cuff tendon.[MRI in subacromial pathology. Report of 20 cases].The authors report the results of MRI performed in 20 patients presenting clinical symptoms of subacromial pathology. The MRI results are correlated to the results of arthrography or arthro CT scan and also to surgical results. MRI is an excellent technique if a precise protocol with T2 weighted images is respected in order to visualize tears or minor perforations of the supraspinatus muscle.[Magnetic resonance of the shoulder: technic, anatomy ana clinical results].MR imaging was employed in 232 patients with traumatic or degenerative lesions of the shoulder. MR diagnosis was compared with arthrotomic findings in 19 cases, and with arthroscopic results in 3 cases. MR technique is here presented and the choice of scanning planes is discussed, together with the sequences of image acquisition and with the features of the surface coil employed. Axial, sagittal, and coronal scans were used in all cases. Both sagittal and coronal planes were performed obliquely on the basis of precise anatomical structures. T1-weighted sequences were used for they are reliable in locating the various anatomical structures and efficient in defining the several different pathologic conditions. The role of T2-weighted sequences was complementary, and they were employed in selected cases only. A surface coil is presented with a particular configuration of easy clinical use and with such technical features as to allow reduced fields to be imaged, with good spatial resolution. MR imaging could demonstrate with equal accuracy both skeletal-cartilage components and capsulo-ligamentous structures, thus defining associated lesions and small tears. In both degenerative and traumatic lesions of the rotator cuff, MR imaging showed both extent and entity of the pathologic process, with high accuracy in defining the impingement syndrome. MR imaging allowed the depiction of the anterior and posterior glenoid labra, even without intraarticular contrast media. Moreover, MR imaging made it possible to recognize both fractures and degenerative processes within the glenoid labrum on the basis of their signal intensities. This preliminary experience allows the authors to conclude that MR imaging is an accurate and non-invasive diagnostic method for the study of traumatic lesions and of degenerative changes of the shoulder.Rotator cuff sonography: a reassessment.This study is both a retrospective and prospective evaluation of the clinical usefulness of shoulder sonography. Ninety-eight patients suspected of having rotator cuff tears underwent sonography of both shoulders. Sixty-two patients underwent double-contrast arthrography performed on the same day as sonography, and 38 patients underwent surgery after sonography. A comparison of the results from ultrasound and arthrography, using published diagnostic criteria, demonstrated a sensitivity of 75% and a specificity of 43% for detection of a rotator cuff tear. In this study, use of more restricted criteria, a subset of the published criteria, yielded a sensitivity of 68% and a specificity of 90%. A comparison of sonography with surgery, using this study's criteria, demonstrated a sensitivity of 57% and a specificity of 76%. This report shows that shoulder sonography is less reliable than previously reported and appears to have a very limited role in the evaluation of rotator cuff injuries.Rotator cuff tear: clinical experience with sonographic detection.Between June 1986 and April 1988, 86 sonographic examinations of the shoulder were performed on patients suspected of having rotator cuff tears. Major sonographic diagnostic criteria included (a) a well-defined discontinuity usually visible as a hypoechoic focus within the cuff, (b) nonvisualization of the cuff and (c) an echogenic focus within the cuff. Seventy-five patients underwent both sonography and arthrography. Compared with arthrography alone, ultrasound examinations enabled detection of 92% of rotator cuff tears (24 of 26 tears), with a specificity of 84% and a negative predictive value of 95%. Correlation was obtained in 30 of these patients who underwent surgery for rotator cuff tear or other soft-tissue abnormality. In this group, the sensitivity of sonography for detection of a tear was 93%, with a specificity of 73%, while for arthrography sensitivity was 87% and specificity was 100%. These data indicate that sonography is a useful, noninvasive screening procedure for patients suspected of having rotator cuff injury.Rotator cuff tears: diagnostic performance of MR imaging.To determine the diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in the evaluation of suspected rotator cuff tears, eight asymptomatic volunteers and 32 patients with rotator cuff tendonopathy who underwent surgery were examined with MR imaging. Twenty-four of these patients also underwent contrast arthrography. The ability of MR imaging to depict the size of cuff tears and the quality of torn tendon edges was also evaluated. The MR imaging and arthrographic studies were reviewed without knowledge of surgical results or of the other studies. A scoring system was developed and a score assigned to each patient's MR study. The sensitivity of MR imaging for all tears (partial and full thickness) was 0.91, and the specificity was 0.88; whereas the sensitivity and specificity of arthrography were each 0.71. The scoring system improved the sensitivity to 1.0 and the specificity to 0.92. Linear regression analysis showed excellent correlation between preoperative assessment of the size of rotator cuff tears and measurement at surgery (r = .95).Rotator cuff tears: prospective comparison of MR imaging with arthrography, sonography, and surgery.Thirty-eight patients with suspected rotator cuff tears were examined at 1.5 T by using a loop-gap resonator surface coil. The MR findings were compared prospectively in a blinded fashion with the results from double-contrast arthrography in all 38 patients, high-resolution sonography in 23 patients, and surgery in 16 patients. In the total group of 38 patients, MR imaging detected 22 of 22 tears and 14 of 16 intact cuffs as determined by arthrography. In the 16 surgically proved cases, MR and arthrography showed identical results, with 92% sensitivity in the diagnosis of 12 tears and 100% specificity in the diagnosis of four intact cuffs. In a subgroup of 23 patients, sonography detected nine of 15 tears and seven of eight intact cuffs as determined by comparison with arthrography. In 10 surgically proved cases, sonography was 63% sensitive in the diagnosis of eight rotator cuff tears and 50% specific in the diagnosis of two intact cuffs. For the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears, MR imaging is comparable to arthrography in both sensitivity and specificity. In this study, sonography was not as accurate in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears as were the other two techniques. These results suggest that MR imaging should be considered the noninvasive test of choice for patients with suspected rotator cuff disease.Rotator cuff tears: correlation of sonographic and surgical findings.High-resolution, real-time sonography of the rotator cuff was performed in 51 shoulders, and the results were correlated with findings obtained during subsequent surgery. Prospective sensitivity of sonography in detection of a tear was 100%; specificity, 75%; and accuracy, 92%. Retrospective estimation of tear size on sonograms correlated well with the intraoperative measurements for small and moderate lesions. Large lesions were often underestimated sonographically. Retrospectively, partial tears were correctly diagnosed in seven patients, and bursal thickening was recognized in 17 patients. Sonography of the shoulder proved to be an accurate, noninvasive method for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tears. It is useful for estimating tear size and location and may be useful in recognizing partial tears.MR imaging diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Thirty-one symptomatic patients were studied with MR imaging to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of shoulder MR in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Correlative studies included arthroscopy in 19 patients and arthrography in 12 patients. Images were obtained on either a 0.5- or 1.5-T Philips superconducting magnet using spin-echo pulse sequences (650-850/30 [TR, TE], 2000/30, 100) with 5-mm slices oriented in an oblique coronal plane perpendicular to the glenohumeral joint. The MR studies were initially interpreted without knowledge of the results of other diagnostic procedures. The MR diagnosis of cuff tear was made when irregularity, discontinuity, and increased signal were identified in the rotator cuff. MR images showed tears in 10 patients (32%) and were negative for tear in 21 patients (68%). MR correlated with arthroscopy and arthrography in 17 of 18 normal patients, in eight of 10 patients with complete tears, and in one of three patients with partial tears. For complete rotator cuff tears, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 80%, 94%, and 89%, respectively. For all tears (partial and complete), the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 69%, 94%, and 84%, respectively. These data suggest that MR imaging is an accurate procedure for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tears. The number of partial tears (three) in this series is too small to evaluate the value of MR imaging in the diagnosis of partial tears.Ultrasonography of rotator cuff tears: a review of 500 diagnostic studies.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff has been shown to be of value in diagnosing rotator cuff tears. This report summarizes our experience with our first 500 diagnostic examinations. All patients were examined in the hyperextended internal rotation view with commercially available high-resolution real-time ultrasound equipment. Patients were diagnosed as having a rotator cuff tear if a focal echogenic lesion or a defect within the rotator cuff was identified. This study confirmed the value of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity all exceeded 90%, and correlated with surgical findings. This was better than arthrography in the same patient population. Ultrasound is an accurate noninvasive method of examining the rotator cuff for the presence of tears. We suggest that rotator cuff ultrasonography is the procedure of choice for the diagnosis of tears if adequate instrumentation is available.Value of ultrasonography in preoperative diagnosis of rotator cuff tears and postoperative follow-up.Four hundred and six patients presenting with shoulder pain underwent bilateral shoulder ultrasonography. Rotator cuff lesions were diagnosed in 197 patients. In 155 of the 308 patients who had additional arthrographic examinations, the arthrogram documented rotator cuff tears. Sixty-eight patients underwent surgery. There was good correlation between the ultrasonographic and arthrographic findings as well as the surgical results, with a sensitivity of 91% for each examination technique. Thirty-six postoperative patients were studied ultrasonographically; a minor to marked increase in rotator cuff echogenicity was demonstrated in them all. Its high predictive value makes ultrasonography the method of choice in diagnosing rotator cuff tears. Based on the evaluation of particular criteria, rotator cuff tears (greater than 1 cm) are commonly documented by ultrasonography. Only in patients with indeterminate or negative ultrasonograms in whom there is a high index of clinical suspicion, should arthrography be performed as a complementary imaging test. In postoperative follow-up the degree of scar formation at the reinsertion of the tendon is adequately documented by ultrasonography.Shoulder impingement syndrome: MR findings in 53 shoulders.The shoulder impingement syndrome refers to a condition in which the supraspinatus tendon and subacromial bursa are chronically entrapped between the humeral head inferiorly and either the anterior acromion itself, spurs of the anterior acromion or acromioclavicular joint, or the coracoacromial ligament superiorly. As a result, the space for the bursa and tendon is reduced, and repeated trauma to these structures leads to bursitis and rotator cuff injury. Although pain and limitation of motion are common early findings, the diagnosis is often delayed until a complete tear of the rotator cuff has occurred. In an attempt to determine if MR can be used to depict the abnormalities associated with impingement syndrome (subacromial bursitis, supraspinatus tendinitis, and rotator cuff tear), we reviewed 107 MR scans of painful shoulders. Changes consistent with impingement syndrome were found in 53 patients (50%), 32 of whom underwent subsequent arthrography or surgery. MR was found capable of depicting several soft-tissue and bony abnormalities that have been clinically described in impingement syndrome. In regions of inflammation, we found that the supraspinatus tendon and/or the subacromial bursa were compressed by spurs (25 shoulders), capsular hypertrophy of the acromioclavicular joint (six shoulders), and/or low-lying acromion (14 shoulders). While T1-weighted MR imaging was highly sensitive to abnormalities of the supraspinatus tendon, tendinitis could be differentiated from a small tear of the supraspinatus tendon only with T2-weighted imaging. Large, full-thickness tears, especially if chronic, produced characteristic MR findings on both T1- and T2-weighted images. We conclude that MR can be used to detect several abnormalities associated with the shoulder impingement syndrome.Sonographic evaluation of the rotator cuff: correlation with arthroscopy.High-resolution real-time sonography has been reported as a non-invasive means of evaluating the integrity of the rotator cuff. Fifty-two patients underwent both sonographic and arthroscopic evaluation of the rotator cuff. There were 42 men and 10 women with an average age of 47 years (range 28-71 years). The duration of shoulder pain averaged 24 months (range 3 months to 9 years). Thirty-five rotator cuff tears were noted arthroscopically. Twenty-seven of the tears were diagnosed by sonography for a sensitivity rate of 77%. Eleven of the 17 intact rotator cuffs were normal by sonography for a specificity rate 65%. The overall accuracy of sonography was 73% and the predictive value of a positive sonogram was 82%. Sonography appears to be a good initial screening examination in evaluating the integrity of the rotator cuff. It is noninvasive and relatively inexpensive. Technical limitations of this technique as well as the experience of the radiologist in performing and interpreting the examination play a major role in the accuracy of this test. As instrumentation improves and as experience in using this technique increases, we expect the accuracy of sonography in detecting tears of the rotator cuff to continue to improve.MR imaging of the shoulder: diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Twenty-five patients with known or suspected tears of the rotator cuff in 26 shoulders underwent MR imaging. All patients also underwent arthrography or surgery. MR visualized abnormalities consistent with a tear in 20 of the 22 tears diagnosed by arthrography or surgery. In most cases, tears were seen as regions of increased signal intensity within the cuff on long-TR pulse sequences, although two cases simply showed an almost complete absence of normal cuff. The MR appearance of the two cases with partial tears was similar to that of full-thickness tears. Of the four cases with normal arthrograms, one case had MR findings consistent with a tear. We conclude that MR has good potential for the noninvasive diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Its ultimate role in this diagnosis must await prospective studies comparing its accuracy with that of sonography, CT, and arthrography.The hyperextended internal rotation view in rotator cuff ultrasonography.[Sonography of the rotator cuff].[Sonography of the shoulder in rotator cuff defects. Technic and clinical value].[Lesions of the rotator cuff: the specific value of echography].Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff.The authors suggest that sonography may be the best screening study for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.US evaluation of the rotator cuff.Ultrasonographic (US) evaluation of the moving shoulder is a new method for evaluating the integrity of the rotator cuff. In the past, contrast arthrography has provided the only nonoperative technique for demonstrating defects in the rotator cuff. We present the details of this new technique and describe 79 patients whose US results were correlated with the findings at arthrography and/or surgery. US allows evaluation of both shoulders at once, an advantage over arthrography, where usually only one side is evaluated at a single sitting. Improvements in US instrumentation, especially the introduction of high-resolution linear-array devices and the use of experienced ultrasonographers, have improved the accuracy of US. Because US is rapid, safe, noninvasive, and inexpensive, we advocate its use instead of arthrography as the routine test of rotator cuff integrity.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff: surgical correlation.Rotator cuff tears are a common orthopedic problem. The portions of the cuff most commonly torn are accessible to sonographic examination with appropriate positioning of the shoulder. This study was undertaken to correlate the sonographic appearance of the pathologic rotator cuff with findings at the time of surgical repair. Rotator cuff tears are readily seen with high-resolution real-time sonography. Sonography can demonstrate tears not demonstrated arthrographically. In the appropriate clinical setting arthrography may not be necessary if the sonogram demonstrates characteristic findings.Shoulder Ultrasound vs MRI for rotator cuff pathology.[Rotator cuff tears: value of 3.0T MRI].To demonstrate the value of 3.0T MR imaging for the detection of rotator cuff tendon tears and surgical planning by correlating imaging findings to surgical findings. Materials and methods. Prospective follow-up of patients who underwent 3.0T MR imaging of the shoulder in our department between November 2005 and June 2007. Surgical findings were correlated to imaging findings for 48 patients who underwent surgery: detection, size, partial thickness or complete, and tendon edges.In this patient group, the positive predictive value of MRI for detecting surgical tears was 100% (100% of complete tears and 92% of partial thickness tears). No change in surgical management was recorded when arthroscopy was performed based on MRI findings (size of tear).3.0 T MRI is valuable for the detection of small tears, especially for partial thickness tears due to increased spatial resolution. The identification of surgical candidates and surgical planning are improved due to more accurate measurements of tear size and quality of the tendon edges.Ultrasound compared with magnetic resonance imaging for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears: a critically appraised topic.Comparison study of indirect MR arthrography and direct MR arthrography of the shoulder.To compare the diagnostic value of indirect magnetic resonance arthrography (I-MRA) with that of direct MR arthrography (D-MRA) for labral tears, rotator cuff tears, and long head of biceps tendon (LHBT) tears using a 3-T MR unit.Institutional review board approval was given; written informed consent was obtained from all patients. From November 2005 to June 2006, 19 patients (eight men and 11 women; mean age, 51 years) who had undergone both I-MRA and D-MRA underwent arthroscopic surgery. Both methods were performed in fat-saturated axial, coronal oblique, and sagittal oblique T1-weighted sequences, as well as axial and coronal oblique T2-weighted sequences. Two radiologists independently and retrospectively evaluated two sets of MRA for the diagnosis of superior and anterior labral tears, subscapularis tendon (SSC), and supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon (SSP-ISP) tears, and LHBT tears. With the arthroscopic finding as a gold standard, we analyzed statistical differences of sensitivities and specificities between two sets of MRA and inter-observer agreement was evaluated using the kappa value.The sensitivity and specificity of I-MRA and D-MRA for reader 1 were 79/80% and 71/80%, respectively, for superior labral tears; 100/100% and 100/100%, respectively, for anterior labral tears; 64/75% and 64/100%, respectively, for SSC tears; 100/86% and 100/100%, respectively, for SSP-ISP tears; and 67/100% and 78/100%, respectively, for LHBT tears. Those of I-MRA and D-MRA for reader 2 were 86/80% and 71/100%, respectively, for superior labral tears; 100/83% and 100/100%, respectively, for anterior labral tears; 64/88% and 82/100%, respectively, for SSC tears; 92/86% and 100/100%, respectively, for SSP-ISP tears; and 78/90% and 89/100%, respectively, for LHBT tears. No significant differences were found between the methods. Inter-observer agreements were higher than moderate (kappa > 0.41) with both methods.Based on a relatively small number of patients, no significant difference was detected between I-MRI and D-MRI with regard rotator cuff, labral, and LHBT tears.Comparison of indirect isotropic MR arthrography and conventional MR arthrography of labral lesions and rotator cuff tears: a prospective study.The purpose of our study was to prospectively compare the diagnostic accuracy of 3D isotropic indirect MR arthrography with conventional sequences of indirect MR arthrography for the diagnosis of labral and rotator cuff lesions on a 3-T MR unit.Thirty-six consecutive patients who were scheduled for shoulder arthroscopic surgery at our institution underwent indirect MR arthrography. Both conventional sequences and an additional 3D isotropic sequence were obtained 1 day before arthroscopic surgery. Two musculoskeletal radiologists prospectively evaluated the images in consensus for the presence of superior and anterior labral lesions and subscapularis and supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon tears using the conventional sequences and the 3D isotropic sequence. We analyzed the statistical difference between the sensitivities and specificities of both methods using arthroscopic findings as the reference standard.Surgical findings confirmed the presence of 23 superior labral lesions, eight anterior labral lesions, 21 subscapularis tears, and 24 supraspinatus-infraspinatus tears. The sensitivity and specificity of the conventional sequences were 74% and 54% for superior labral lesions, 88% and 96% for anterior labral lesions, 67% and 85% for subscapularis tendon tears, and 96% and 75% for supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon tears. The sensitivity and specificity of the 3D isotropic sequence were 70% and 85% for superior labral lesions, 100% and 100% for anterior labral lesions, 67% and 85% for subscapularis tendon tears, and 96% and 67% for supraspinatus-infraspinatus tendon tears. No statistically significant difference was seen in sensitivities and specificities for both methods.Three-dimensional isotropic MR arthrography sequences with multiplanar reconstruction can provide a similar capability for the diagnosis of labral and rotator cuff lesions as conventional MR arthrography sequences but in a shorter imaging time.3-T MRI of the shoulder: is MR arthrography necessary?The purpose of this study is to report the diagnostic sensitivity of 3-T conventional MRI versus MR arthrography of the shoulder in the same patient population.One hundred fifty consecutive conventional shoulder MRI and MR arthrography examinations performed on patients 50 years or younger who subsequently underwent arthroscopy were reviewed retrospectively by consensus reading by two musculoskeletal radiologists. All patients selected for arthroscopy had abnormal findings on clinical examination and MRI or MR arthrography. All 150 patients were referred from one orthopedic group. All patients consented to undergo both MRI and MR arthrography. None had undergone prior shoulder surgery. Full- or partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, superior labral anterior-to-posterior (SLAP) tears, and anterior or posterior labral tears were assessed.Three full-thickness and nine partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, seven SLAP tears, six anterior labral tears, and two posterior labral tears were seen on MR arthrography but not on conventional MRI. All additional MR arthrography findings were confirmed at arthroscopy. On conventional MRI, sensitivities and specificities compared with arthroscopy were as follows: anterior labral tear, 83% sensitivity and 100% specificity; posterior labral tear, 84% and 100%; SLAP tear, 83% and 99%; supraspinatus tendon tear, 92% and 100%; partial-thickness articular surface tear, 68% and 100%; and partial-thickness bursal surface tear, 84% and 100%. On MR arthrography, sensitivities and specificities compared with arthroscopy were as follows: anterior labral tear, 98% sensitivity and 100% specificity; posterior labral tear, 95% and 100%; SLAP tear, 98% and 99%; supraspinatus tendon tear, 100% and 100%; partial-thickness articular surface tear, 97% and 100%; and partial-thickness bursal surface tear, 84% and 100%. MR arthrography showed a statistical improvement in sensitivity (p<0.05) for detection of partial-thickness articular surface supraspinatus tears, anterior labral tears, and SLAP tears at 3 T.In this series, MR arthrography showed statistically significant increased sensitivity for detection of partial-thickness articular surface supraspinatus tears, anterior labral tears, and SLAP tears compared with conventional MRI at 3 T. On the basis of the above findings, we perform 3-T MR arthrography on patients for whom anterior labral tears, SLAP tears, and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears are suspected clinically.Symptomatic partial rotator cuff tears: diagnostic performance of ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging with surgical correlation.The painful shoulder is a relatively common clinical entity that may be attributed to a variety of pathologies, including partial rotator cuff tears. Conservative treatment or surgical intervention may be offered, depending on the extent of the partial tear and the degree of patient discomfort.To apply ultrasound (US) imaging in order to evaluate the prevalence of partial rotator cuff tears in patients with painful shoulders.Fifty-six patients (17 men, 39 women; mean age 53.7 years) were included in the study, with symptomatic impingement syndrome of the shoulder after having failed to respond to conservative treatment. All patients underwent US and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scans prior to surgical intervention.Arthroscopy or mini-open surgery revealed 53 cases with partial tears of the rotator cuff and three with extensive tendinopathy. Both imaging modalities detected successfully 44 cases of partial tears of the supraspinatus tendon. US imaging yielded a sensitivity of 95.6%, a specificity of 70%, an accuracy of 91%, and a positive predictive accuracy of 93.6%. The corresponding values for MRI were 97.7%, 63.6%, 91%, and 91.7%, respectively.US imaging can be considered almost equally effective in detecting partial tears of the rotator cuff compared to MRI, particularly located in the area of the supraspinatus tendon. MRI may be reserved for doubtful or complex cases, in which delineation of adjacent structures is mandatory prior to surgical intervention.[Shoulder injuries in overhead athletes: utility of MR arthrography].The goal of this work was to assess the accuracy of the MR-Arthrografie in the evaluation of over head athletes injuries in comparison with athroscopy.In 29 patients (middle age: 30 years, 21 male, 8 female, age 16 - 53 years) with persistent pain after conservative therapy an Arthro-MRI with intraarticular application of gadolinum was performed prior to arthroscopic surgery. The MRI was retrospectivly analysed of three examiners independently from one another. The result were compared to the results of the Arthroscopy. Interrater Reliability was calculated by using of Cohens Kappa.The MR-Arthrography could demonstrate 8 of 9 (88.9 %) partial tears of he rotator cuff. All SLAP (Superiores Labrum from Anterior to Posterior) Lesions as well as all bankart type Lesions were recognized through the MR-Arthrography. However, dependent upon the experience of the examiner in a span between 33.3 % (fellow radiologist) and 93.3 % (consultant radiologist). We found a high agreement between consultant radiologist and shoulder surgeon with Kappa of 0.79 for rotator cuff tear-, 0.86 for Bankart- and 0.82 for SLAP-Lsionen.[Shoulder joint disorder: correlation of findings by arthroscopy and magnetic resonance imaging].To evaluate the efficacy of magnetic resonance (MR) examination in intra- and extra- articular shoulder disorders, in comparison with arthroscopic findings, in patients with both acute injuries and chronic problems of the shoulder.Conventional MR images and MR arthrograms of the shoulder were obtained in 35 patients treated between January 2004 and January 2006. Each MR image was evaluated by five radiologists experienced in assessing findings on the musculoskeletal system. Subsequently, the patients underwent shoulder arthroscopy performed by shoulder arthroscopy surgeons. Each detailed arthroscopic report was compared with the pre-operative MR findings, and the sensitivity and specificity of MR examination were calculated. The arthroscopic findings served as standards of reference for comparison.SLAP lesions were found intra-operatively in seven out of the 35 patients (20 %). MR sensitivity was 43 % (3 to 7 patients) and specificity was 96 % (27 to 28). The accuracy of MR for SLAP lesion diagnosis was 86 % (30 of 35 patients). Tears in the anterior labrum were diagnosed by arthroscopy in 16 of 35 patients (46 %); MR sensitivity was 44 % (7 of 16 patients) and specificity was 89 % (17 of 19). The accuracy of MR for diagnosing labral tears was 68 % (24 of 35 patients).When designing our study, we tried to avoid limitations of similar investigations. We employed a nuclear magnetic resonance system with high resolution and standardized both the arthroscopic technique and the evaluation of MR images. Our results of diagnosing rotator cuff disorders and SLAP lesions are in agreement with those of other relevant studies. The limitation of our study was a small size of the group.Although MR imaging is a sensitive method suitable for diagnosing some shoulder disorders, the MR imaging of SLAP lesions and labral tears does not give results accurate enough to be used for pre-operative planning.[Role of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of shoulder joint injury].To define the role of ultrasonography in the diagnostic algorithm for patients with shoulder joint injury and to show its potential for the detection of rotator cuff tears and Hill-Sachs lesions.A group of 52 patients with clinical signs of shoulder disorders following trauma who were treated in the 2005-2006 period. After ultrasonographic examination, all patients were surgically treated by arthroscopy. In 12 of them an additional magnetic resonance imaging was carried out before surgery. The results of ultrasonography were compared with arthroscopic findings in terms of detection of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and Hill-Sachs lesions. These were the two most frequent traumatic lesions detected by ultrasonography.A full-thickness tear of the rotator cuff was correctly diagnosed in 13 patients. In further four the ultrasound finding was incorrectly interpreted as a moderate rotator cuff injury. For the detection of full-thickness tears, the sensitivity of the method was 76 %, its specificity was 94 % and accuracy 88 %. The detection of Hill-Sachs lesions by ultrasonography correlated with arthroscopic findings, with a sensitivity of 86 %, specificity of 93 % and accuracy of 92 %.A number of studies report on options for the ultrasonographic detection of various types of traumatic injury to shoulder structures. Examination by ultrasound shows skeletal surfaces, thus permitting detection of a minor bone injury or a Hill- Sachs defect, and reveals soft tissue shoulder structures including tendons, ligaments and bursae. In some studies the possibility of detecting rotator cuff tears by ultrasonography has been described. Although sufficient accuracy of ultrasonographic examination in this region is reported, the results are not consistent.Our results show high reliability of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of shoulder trauma. The detection of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and Hill-Sachs lesions was possible with sufficient accuracy, which makes this quick, simple and available examination a valuable diagnostic tool. The finding of a rotator cuff tear is important information for the orthopaedist and, in the majority of patients, is also an indication for surgery. An ultrasonographic examination can therefore be regarded as a standard part of the diagnostic algorithm for shoulder trauma.A 'one-stop clinic' for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff pathology: Getting the right diagnosis first time.We have introduced a one-stop clinic for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff tears (RCTs). The aim of the study was to determine the effect of the one-stop clinic on the interval and delay in management for patients with suspected rotator cuff pathology.Seventy-four patients were reviewed retrospectively; 39 had an ultrasound of the shoulder before (group 1), and 35 patients after (group 2) the new protocol was introduced. Patients in group 2 had a shoulder ultrasound scan (USS) on the day of their clinic appointment or beforehand based upon the General Practitioners (GP) letter. Indications included patients over the age of 30, or patients with a history of trauma or a painful shoulder.Twenty-four patients were diagnosed with RCTs on USS with an overall sensitivity of 93.75%, specificity 100% and accuracy of 91% for full thickness tears. Clinical detection alone had an overall sensitivity of 80%, a specificity of 91% and accuracy of 87%. Mean time from GP referral to definitive management plan was 6.49 months (SD 2.74) in group 1, compared with 4.63 months (SD 1.43) in group 2 with an overall reduction in half the number of clinic appointments. This was statistically significant (p < 0.001).Ultrasound scan of the shoulder is an accurate and reliable method of detecting full thickness RCTs. The one-stop clinic significantly shortened the interval between GP referral and definitive management.[Ultrasound--a good alternative to MR in shoulder problems].The clinical utility of ultrasonography for rotator cuff disease, shoulder impingement syndrome and subacromial bursitis.Periarticular shoulder disorders are common in clinical practice, and diagnosis is often difficult. Medicare statistics indicate that between 2001 and 2006 the use of diagnostic shoulder ultrasonography increased significantly. Rotator cuff disease, shoulder impingement syndrome and subacromial bursitis are among the most common diagnoses reported on shoulder ultrasonography. Shoulder ultrasonography is useful in the diagnosis of full thickness tears, but its utility for other rotator cuff disorders, shoulder impingement syndrome and subacromial bursitis is less well established.Ultrasonography of symptomatic rotator cuff tears compared with MR imaging and surgery.To compare the accuracy of ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging in the detection of rotator cuff tears.Ninety-six patients with clinically suspected rotator cuff pathology underwent ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder. The findings in 88 patients were compared with arthroscopy or open surgery.Full-thickness tear was confirmed in 57 cases, partial-thickness tear in 30 cases and degenerative changes without tear in 1. In all 57 cases of full-thickness tear and in 28 out of 30 cases of partial-thickness tear the supraspinatus tendon was involved. The accuracy in the detection of full-thickness tears was 98 and 100% for ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging, respectively. The accuracy in the detection of bursal or articular partial-thickness tears was 87 and 90% for ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging, respectively.In experienced hands ultrasonography should be considered as an accurate modality for the initial investigation of rotator cuff, especially supraspinatus, tears.Can isotropic fast gradient echo imaging be substituted for conventional T1 weighted sequences in shoulder MR arthrography at 3 Tesla?To assess the practical utility of isotropic shoulder imaging in patients undergoing MR arthrography. Isotropic shoulder imaging can be performed in less than three minutes with use of fast gradients.Two experienced musculoskeletal radiologists retrospectively interpreted MR images of the shoulder in 100 consecutive patients undergoing MR arthrography of the shoulder. All patients underwent MRI of the shoulder in oblique coronal, oblique sagittal, and axial planes on a 3.0-Tesla MRI system. All patients had conventional fast spin-echo T1-weighted imaging. All patients also had thin section (0.4 mm) isotropic spoiled gradient echo images performed. A total of 67 of the 100 patients underwent subsequent arthroscopy and results were compared with MR interpretations.There were 41 full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, nine partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (seven articular surface and two bursal surface), 21 superior labral, 18 anterior labral, and seven posterior labral tears demonstrated by consensus retrospective reading of the 100 shoulder MR exams. There was no difference in interpretation of the isotropic images as compared to the conventionally acquired images in the oblique coronal, oblique sagittal, and axial planes. Some patients had more than one finding on each exam. A total of 67 patients went on to arthroscopy. There were 41 full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, nine partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, 21 superior labral, 18 anterior labral, and seven posterior labral tears demonstrated on arthroscopy. All full- and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears seen at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MR reading. A total of 19 out of the 21 patients with superior labral anterior posterior (SLAP) tears at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MR reading. A total of 16 of the 18 anterior labral tears and six of the seven posterior labral tears seen at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MR reading. Some of the 67 patients had more than one finding on arthroscopy.Isotropic imaging of the shoulder is practical in clinical imaging when performed with use of fast gradients on a 3-Tesla system. Isotropic imaging provides the same clinical information as conventional imaging and can be acquired in less than three minutes.Diagnostic accuracy of shoulder ultrasound performed by a single operator.Both diagnostic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) are used for investigation of the presence and severity of rotator cuff lesions. There is no consensus as to which is the more accurate and cost-effective study. We sought to examine the sensitivity of ultrasound, when used by one experienced radiologist with modern equipment. We compared the ultrasound and surgical results obtained from 68 patients. Ultrasound showed a sensitivity of 89% and specificity of 100% (Positive Predictive Value 100%) for full-thickness tears, and a sensitivity of 79% and specificity of 94% (Positive Predictive Value 87%) for partial-thickness tears. We found that shoulder ultrasound, in the hands of an experienced radiologist with the use of modern high-resolution equipment, is highly sensitive in differentiating complete tears and partial-thickness tears. Our results are similar to the best published results for MRI and given that ultrasound is significantly cheaper and more available, ultrasound by an experienced radiologist should be considered as a primary diagnostic tool for imaging the rotator cuff.MR imaging of delamination tears of the rotator cuff tendons.The objective was to describe the imaging appearances and location of delamination tears of the rotator cuff tendons on non-contrast conventional MR imaging.This study was reviewed and approved by our Institutional Review Board. The reports of 548 consecutive MR examinations of the shoulder were reviewed, looking for mention or description of delamination tears of the rotator cuff. The images of the identified cases were then reviewed by two radiologists to confirm the findings. Correlation with surgical and arthroscopic information was then performed. Delamination tears were defined as horizontal retraction of either the bursal or articular surface of the tendon, manifest as thickening of the torn retracted edge, and/or interstitial splitting of the tendon, manifest as fluid-like high signal intensity on fat-suppressed T2-weighted oblique coronal images.Fourteen cases of delamination tears were identified in 13 patients. Ten of the cases involved the supraspinatus tendon, all with articular surface involvement. Nine of these supraspinatus cases were isolated tears and one occurred as part of a full thickness tear. All 10 of these supraspinatus cases showed medial retraction of the articular surface of the tendon, with thickening of the retracted edge, and 5 of the 10 had a demonstrable horizontal cleft in the interstitium. Four cases involved the subscapularis tendon, with articular surface disruption in three and pure interstitial delamination in one. Medial subluxation of the tendon of the long head of the biceps was present in all four cases. No delamination tears occurred on the bursal surface. Only three of the 14 shoulders underwent surgical repair with one confirmation of supraspinatus delamination, one confirmation of a subscapularis tear that had become a full thickness tear 10 months after initial imaging and another interstitial subscapularis delamination that was not identified arthroscopically.Delamination tears occur most often in the supraspinatus tendon, and in our series always involved the articular surface of the tendon. Only half of these tears have a visible cleavage plane in the interstitium, but this cleavage plane is not necessary for diagnosis if the torn edge is retracted.Sonography of the rotator cuff in painful shoulders performed without knowledge of clinical information: results from 58 sonographic examinations with surgical correlation.To assess the value of sonography as an isolated diagnostic test for the detection and quantification of rotator cuff tears.Preoperative sonographic examination was performed on 58 shoulders. Key biases on sonographic interpretation such as history-taking, physical examination, or concurrent imaging examinations were excluded by way of blinding. Tears of the rotator cuff were the positive findings of interest. Assessment of tear size and localization was done sonographically, and the results were compared with operative findings.All 24 full-thickness tears observed at surgery had been diagnosed correctly via sonography. In 19 of 20 cases with an intact rotator cuff, preoperative sonography was negative. Thirteen of 14 partial-thickness tears were not detected via sonography; 1 was misinterpreted as a full-thickness tear. Location of the tears relative to the rotator cuff tendons was described correctly in 21 of 25 cases. For tear size measurement, the 95% range of agreement was less than +/-1 cm.Blinded sonographic examination is effective in the detection and quantification of full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff but lacks sensitivity in the detection of partial-thickness tears.3.0-T MRI of the supraspinatus tendon.MRI of the shoulder has been found to be highly sensitive and specific for detection of full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears at 1.5-T or lower field strength compared with arthroscopy. MRI of the shoulder at 3.0 T has not been specifically assessed. This study assesses the sensitivity and specificity of MRI at 3.0 T for supraspinatus tendon tears compared with arthroscopy.Two experienced musculoskeletal radiologists retrospectively reviewed MR images of the shoulder in 150 consecutive patients who had subsequent arthroscopy. All patients had oblique coronal and sagittal T1-weighted and fat-saturated T2-weighted axial, oblique coronal, and sagittal imaging performed. The radiologists interpreted the MR images by consensus without knowledge of the arthroscopy results. Scans were interpreted for full-thickness or partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears. If partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears were seen on MRI, the reviewers noted whether the partial-thickness tear was articular or bursal in location. The radiologists also separated the supraspinatus tendon tears into small (< 1 cm retraction from the humeral head) and large (> 1 cm retraction from the humeral head). All 150 patients went on to arthroscopy. After consensus review of the MR images, arthroscopy results were compared with consensus MR interpretations.Ninety-eight of the 150 patients had full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears at arthroscopy. Twenty-six of the 150 patients had partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears. Seventeen of these 26 partial-thickness tears were along the articular surface and nine were along the bursal surface. Ninety-six of 98 full-thickness tears seen at arthroscopy were seen on consensus MRI interpretation. All 26 partial-thickness tears seen at arthroscopy were seen at consensus MR interpretation; however, two of the partial-thickness articular surface tears seen at arthroscopy were interpreted as full-thickness tears on consensus MRI interpretation. Twenty-eight of the 98 full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears were small tears (< 1 cm retraction from the humeral head) on arthroscopy. Two of these 28 small tears seen on arthroscopy were not seen on consensus MRI interpretation. Twenty-six patients had intact supraspinatus tendons on both retrospective consensus MRI interpretation and at arthroscopy.MRI of the shoulder at 3.0 T is highly sensitive and specific compared with arthroscopy in the detection of full-thickness and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears.Rotator cuff tears: assessment with MR arthrography in 275 patients with arthroscopic correlation.We assessed the diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography in the diagnosis of articular-sided partial-thickness and full-thickness rotator cuff tears in a large symptomatic population. MR arthrograms obtained in 275 patients including a study group of 139 patients with rotator cuff tears proved by arthroscopy and a control group of 136 patients with arthroscopically intact rotator cuff tendons were reviewed in random order. MR imaging was performed on a 1.0 T system (Magnetom Expert, Siemens). MR arthrograms were analyzed by two radiologists in consensus for articular-sided partial-thickness and full-thickness tears of the supraspinatus, infraspinatus, and subscapularis tendons. At arthroscopy, 197 rotator cuff tears were diagnosed, including 105 partial-thickness (93 supraspinatus, nine infraspinatus, three subscapularis) and 92 full-thickness (43 supraspinatus, 20 infraspinatus, 29 subscapularis) tendon tears. For full-thickness tears, sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 96%, 99%, and 98%, respectively, and for partial tears 80%, 97%, and 95%, respectively. False negative and positive assessments in the diagnosis of articular-sided partial-thickness tears were predominantly [78% (35/45)] observed with small articular-sided (Ellman grade1) tendon tears. MR arthrography is highly accurate in the diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and is accurate in the diagnosis of articular-sided partial-thickness tears. Limitations in the diagnosis of partial-thickness tears are mainly restricted to small articular-sided tears (Ellman grade 1) due to difficulties in differentiation between fiber tearing, tendinitis, synovitic changes, and superficial fraying at tendon margins.Indirect MR arthrography of the shoulder: use of abduction and external rotation to detect full- and partial-thickness tears of the supraspinatus tendon.To evaluate prospectively the accuracy of indirect magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography for supraspinatus tendon tears during neutral positioning or abduction and external rotation (ABER) and neutral positioning.Informed consent was obtained in all patients, and the study was approved by the institutional review board. Indirect MR arthrography of the shoulder was performed in 51 symptomatic patients (14 female, 37 male; mean age, 47 years) in the neutral position (set 1) and in the neutral and ABER positions (set 2). Two readers independently interpreted both sets, and diagnoses were compared with arthroscopic findings. Diagnostic accuracy was calculated, and 95% confidence intervals were used to detect significant differences between sets. Diagnostic confidence was recorded by using a three-level confidence score. Differences between sets were evaluated by using the Wilcoxon signed rank test. Interobserver agreement was determined separately for each set and for all diagnoses, full-thickness tears, and partial-thickness tears.For full-thickness tears, there was no benefit to reading set 2. For reader 1, sensitivity and specificity were 95% and 100%, respectively, for set 1 and 100% and 100%, respectively, for set 2. For reader 2, sensitivity and specificity were 80% and 100%, respectively, for set 1 and 100% and 100%, respectively, for set 2. For partial-thickness tears, sensitivity was significantly higher after reading set 2. For reader 1, sensitivity and specificity were 71% and 88%, respectively, for set 1 and 93% and 100%, respectively, for set 2. For reader 2, sensitivity and specificity were 50% and 88%, respectively, for set 1 and 86% and 94%, respectively, for set 2. For both readers, diagnostic confidence for partial-thickness tears was significantly higher after reading set 2. After the interpretation of set 2, kappa values increased from 0.35 to 1.00 for full-thickness tears and from 0.12 to 0.63 for partial-thickness tears.Indirect MR arthrography with supplementary images obtained with patients in the ABER position significantly improved sensitivity and increased diagnostic confidence for partial-thickness tears of the supraspinatus tendon. Interobserver agreement was improved for both full- and partial-thickness tears.Images in clinical medicine. Rotator-cuff tear.One-shot CT and MR arthrography of the shoulder with a mixture of iodinated and paramagnetic contrast agents using arthroscopy as a gold standard.Our aim was to perform computed tomography arthrography (CTA) and magnetic resonance arthrography (MRA) of the shoulder as a one-shot examination and to evaluate its value on the basis of arthroscopy as a gold standard.Fifteen men and 16 women with planned arthroscopy for chronic (n=17) or traumatic tear of the rotator cuff (n=8), congenital atraumatic (n=1) or traumatic glenohumeral instability (n=2), traumatic tear of the rotator cuff with glenohumeral instability (n=1), or "frozen shoulder" (n=2) underwent plain helical CT in neutral position and intra-articular CT-guided injection of a mixture of iodinated and paramagnetic contrast agents (gadodiamide at 1:250 and iobitridol 350 at 1:5 in 20 ml of saline solution). CT helical scans in intra- and extrarotation and T1-weighted MRA scans in the neutral position were obtained. CTA and MRA were evaluated separately and jointly (CTA-MRA) in different blinded sessions, giving a 0-3 score to the agreement of CTA, MRA, and CTA-MRA with arthroscopy.The injected volume of the solution ranged from 10 to 24 ml. No side effects were observed. CTA obtained a score of 2.33+/-0.62, MRA 2.47+/-0.52, and CTA-MRA 2.67+/-0.49. Significant differences were found for CTA-MRA versus CTA (p=0.0281) and MRA (p=0.0277). There was no significant difference for CTA versus MRA.CTA and MRA can be performed as a one-shot exam. CTA-MRA seems to give more information than CTA or MRA separately.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff: a comparison with arthroscopy in one-hundred-and-ninety consecutive cases.To evaluate the accuracy of high-resolution ultrasonography compared to arthroscopy in the detection of rotator cuff tears.Preoperative ultrasonography (US) with a 10-MHz commercially available linear-array transducer and a standardized study protocol was performed in 190 consecutive shoulders in 185 patients with a history of shoulder pain for more than 3 months. The findings at US were classified into intact cuff, partial-thickness, and full-thickness rotator cuff tears, and correlated with findings at shoulder arthroscopy.US correctly depicted 118 of 124 rotator cuff tears with sensitivity 95%, specificity 94%, PPV 97%, NPV 91% and accuracy 95%, all 94 full-thickness tears (sensitivity 100%, specificity 91%, PPV 91%, NPV 100%, and accuracy 95%), 24 of 30 partial-thickness tears (sensitivity 80%, specificity 98%, PPV 86%, NPV 96%, and accuracy 95%).US is a highly accurate diagnostic method for detecting full-thickness rotator cuff tears, but is less sensitive in detecting partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.Use of preoperative magnetic resonance imaging to predict rotator cuff tear pattern and method of repair.To determine the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) criteria for predicting rotator cuff tear pattern and method of repair.Retrospective MRI/arthroscopy correlation.Sixty-six preoperative MRI scans were evaluated. The maximum medial to lateral length (L) of the tear was measured on T2-weighted coronal cuts. The maximum anterior to posterior width (W) was measured on T2-weighted sagittal cuts. The cases were divided into 3 groups: group 1, short-wide tears, L < or = W, L < 2 cm; group 2, long-narrow tears, L > W, W < 2 cm; and group 3, long-wide tears, L > or = 2 cm, W > or = 2 cm.Of the 66 MRI scans, 55 were adequate for standardized measurement. Group 1, 16 cases: 15 were found at arthroscopy to be crescent-shaped tears repaired end-to-bone; 1 was repaired with interval slides. Group 2, 22 cases: all 22 were repaired side-to-side/margin convergence. Group 3, 17 cases: 12 required interval slides, 1 partial repair was performed, and 4 were repaired side-to-side/margin convergence.Tear pattern and method of repair can be predicted on high-quality MRI scan. Group 1, L < or = W and L < 2 cm, predicts a crescent-shaped tear and end-to-bone repair (positive predictive value, 93.8%). Group 2, L > W and W < 2 cm, predicts a longitudinal tear and side-to-side/margin convergence repair (positive predictive value 100%). Group 3, L > or = 2 cm and W > or = 2 cm, predicts a massive contracted tear and that primary end-to-bone or side-to-side repairs are usually not possible and that interval slides or partial repair may be necessary (positive predictive value, 76.5%). The overall diagnostic model based on usable MRI scans significantly predicted arthroscopic findings (P < .001 for chi-square test).Level III, development of diagnostic criteria with universally applied reference (nonconsecutive patients).Shoulder impingement syndrome: relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic findings.Although there has been much research about imaging methods for shoulder impingement syndrome, the clinical information and upper limb level of disability have been generally ignored. The purpose of this study was to detect the relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic variables in patients with shoulder impingement syndrome.A cross-sectional, clinical, and radiologic study was planned and 59 shoulders of 58 consecutive patients waiting for physical therapy because of a clinically suspected shoulder impingement syndrome were included into this study. Comprehensive clinical examination, radiography, shoulder ultrasonography, and magnetic resonance imaging were performed in the same month.Despite the high sensitivities of ultrasonography for diagnosing rotator cuff tears (98.1%) and biceps pathologies (100%), magnetic resonance imaging was superior to ultrasonography in many important shoulder structures such as a glenoid labral tear and subacromial bursal effusion/hypertrophy (P < 0.01). These structures were the determinants of the shoulder's disability measured by disabilities of the arm, shoulder, and hand questionnaire.Ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging had comparable high accuracy for identifying the biceps pathologies and rotator cuff tears. The basic clinical tests had modest accuracy in both disorders. The choice of which imaging test to perform should be based on the patient's clinical information (regarding lesion of glenoid labrum, joint capsule, muscle, and bone), cost, and imaging experience of the radiology department.Diagnostic ultrasound of the shoulder--a method for experts only? Results from an orthopedic surgeon with relative inexpensive compared to operative findings.Diagnostic ultrasound examination of the shoulder is generally considered to require long experience. We examined the results of an orthopedic surgeon with little experience of ultrasound.A relatively inexperienced examiner performed preoperative ultrasound scanning of 79 patients with symptoms from the rotator cuff and/or the long head of the biceps muscle. Tears of the rotator cuff and rupture or dislocation of the long head of the biceps muscle were the positive findings of interest. Results were compared to operative findings.In 66 of 79 shoulders, ultrasonographic rotator cuff findings were confirmed at surgery (accuracy 84%). 20 of 26 full-thickness tears were diagnosed correctly. 6 of 7 partial-thickness tears were overlooked. Ultrasound was false positive in 1 case. For the long head of the biceps muscle, all 8 cases of dislocation or rupture of the tendon were diagnosed but differentiation between the two conditions was not possible in 2 cases.Our results may encourage orthopedic surgeons to start using ultrasound as a diagnostic technique for full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff and for pathology in the long head of the biceps muscle.Sonography and visualizing rotator cuff injuries in older people.Accuracy of office-based ultrasonography of the shoulder for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.This prospective multi-institutional study was designed to define the accuracy of ultrasonography, when performed in an orthopaedic surgeon's office, for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.An anatomic diagnosis and a treatment plan were made on the basis of office-based shoulder ultrasonography, physical examination, and radiographs for ninety-eight patients (ninety-nine shoulders) with a clinical diagnosis of a rotator-cuff-related problem. The results of the ultrasonographic studies were then compared with the results of magnetic resonance imaging and the operative findings.Office-based ultrasonography led to the correct diagnosis for thirty-seven (88%) of forty-two shoulders with a full-thickness rotator cuff tear or both full and partial-thickness tears, twenty-six (70%) of thirty-seven shoulders with a partial-thickness rotator cuff tear only, and sixteen (80%) of twenty shoulders with normal tendons. In no case was the surgical approach (open or arthroscopic) that had been planned on the basis of the ultrasonography altered by the operative findings, but the operative finding of a full-thickness tear resulted in an arthroscopic cuff repair in four shoulders. Magnetic resonance imaging led to the correct diagnosis for forty (95%) of forty-two shoulders with a full-thickness rotator cuff tear or both full and partial-thickness rotator cuff tears, twenty-seven (73%) of thirty-seven shoulders with only a partial-thickness tear, and fifteen (75%) of twenty shoulders with normal tendons. There were no significant differences between magnetic resonance imaging and ultrasonography with regard to the correct identification of a full-thickness tear or its size. The sensitivity of ultrasonography for detecting tear size in the anterior-posterior dimension was 86% (95% confidence interval, 71% to 95%), and that of magnetic resonance imaging was 93% (95% confidence interval, 81% to 99%) (p = 0.26). The sensitivity of ultrasonography for detecting tear size in the medial-lateral dimension was 83% (95% confidence interval, 69% to 93%), and that of magnetic resonance imaging was 88% (95% confidence interval, 74% to 96%) (p = 0.41).A well-trained office staff and an experienced orthopaedic surgeon can effectively utilize ultrasonography, in conjunction with clinical examination and a review of shoulder radiographs, to accurately diagnose the extent of rotator cuff tears in patients suspected of having such tears. Errors in diagnosis made on the basis of ultrasonography most often consist of an inability to distinguish between partial and full-thickness tears that are approximately 1 cm in size. In this study, such errors did not significantly affect the planned surgical approach.Detection and measurement of rotator cuff tears with sonography: analysis of diagnostic errors.The purpose of this study was to analyze the causes of errors in the detection and measurement of rotator cuff tears in our patient population.Seventy-one consecutive patients with shoulder pain who were prospectively studied with sonography had subsequent arthroscopy that showed a full-thickness or partial-thickness tear or intact cuff. For sonography and arthroscopy, the length or degree of retraction and width of a tear, when present, was recorded. When there were discrepant findings, representative images were jointly evaluated by the radiologist and orthopedic surgeon to determine the cause of the error.Fifteen detection errors were found, including five misses (three < 5-mm subscapularis and two small partial-thickness tears), four errors inherent with the test (distinguishing large bursal side or extensive partial-thickness from full-thickness tears and tendinopathy from partial-thickness tears), three errors of an unknown cause, two due to misinterpretation, and one error inherent with the patient. Seventeen measurement errors occurred with full-thickness tears, 15 of those in patients with large or massive tears. Bursal thickening (n = 4), non-visualization of the torn tendon end (n = 2), nonretracted tear (n = 2), and complex tear (n = 1) contributed to the errors. Eight measurement errors occurred with partial-thickness tears. Difficulty distinguishing tendinopathy from partial-thickness tears (n = 3) and complex tears (n = 3) accounted for six errors.Although infrequent, detection errors were due to limitations inherent with the test or misses. Limitations inherent with the patient and misinterpretation of the findings were rare. Most measurement errors occurred in patients with large or massive cuff tears.Sonography of full-thickness supraspinatus tears: comparison of patient positioning technique with surgical correlation.Sonography has become a popular technique for the assessment of musculoskeletal disorders. Patient positioning is crucial to a thorough and accurate assessment of rotator cuff tendons. Two positions, the Crass and modified Crass, have been routinely used in the research and clinical settings to examine the supraspinatus tendon. Our study was a prospective trial to determine whether the Crass or the modified Crass position affords the most accurate measure of supraspinatus tears when compared with surgical findings.Twenty-one patients with full-thickness supraspinatus tears underwent shoulder sonography in both the Crass and the modified Crass positions. Measurements of supraspinatus tears were performed in the sagittal and transverse dimensions. Patients subsequently underwent either arthroscopic or open supraspinatus repair. Intraoperative measurements were made in two dimensions and were compared with sonographic findings.Sonography had 100% specificity in detecting full-thickness supraspinatus tears. No statistically significant difference was seen between the size of supraspinatus tears in the Crass and modified Crass positions and surgical findings in the transverse plane (p = 0.55 and 0.61, respectively). In the sagittal dimension, no statistically significant difference was seen between surgical findings and the Crass position (p = 0.14); however, a difference existed when the modified Crass position was used (p = 0.03).Sonography reliably detects and quantifies supraspinatus tears. Both the Crass and the modified Crass positions reflected the true size of supraspinatus tears in the transverse plane. In the sagittal plane, the Crass position is the more useful to quantify supraspinatus tears because the modified Crass position overestimates the size of such tears.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder.Assessment of fat content in supraspinatus muscle with proton MR spectroscopy in asymptomatic volunteers and patients with supraspinatus tendon lesions.To evaluate proton magnetic resonance (MR) spectroscopy in the assessment of lipid content of the supraspinatus muscle in asymptomatic volunteers and patients with supraspinatus tendon lesions.Single-voxel proton MR spectroscopy was used to assess lipid content of the supraspinatus muscle in asymptomatic volunteers (n = 30) and patients with partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (n = 30), newly diagnosed full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (n = 30), and chronic full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears (n = 30). The apparent lipid content of the supraspinatus muscle measured with proton MR spectroscopy was related to its appearance on sagittal-oblique T1-weighted spin-echo MR images (grades 0-4). One-way analysis of variance was performed to test for significant differences, and the Tukey honestly significant difference procedure was performed for post hoc comparisons.Mean apparent lipid content was 13.7% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 11.5%, 15.8%) for asymptomatic volunteers, 29.5% (95% CI: 25.1%, 34.0%) for patients with partial-thickness tears, 48.6% (95% CI: 41.3%, 55.9%) for patients with full-thickness tears, and 66.1% (95% CI: 57.7%, 74.5%) for patients with chronic tears. Values were significantly different (analysis of variance, P <.001; P <.001-.002 for all post hoc pairwise comparisons). Mean apparent lipid content for the supraspinatus muscle was as follows: grade 0, 19.6% (95% CI: 16.7%, 22.6%); grade 1, 36.8% (95% CI: 33.2%, 40.4%); grade 2, 53.6% (95% CI: 43.1%, 64.2%); grade 3, 67.5% (95% CI: 52.6%, 82.3%); and grade 4, 79.2% (95% CI: 73.2%, 85.3%). With analysis of variance (P <.001), all post hoc pairwise comparisons were significant (P </=.001) except between grades 2 and 3 (P =.112) and between grades 3 and 4 (P =.261). In 14 (25%) subjects who had grade 0 appearance on T1-weighted images, lipid content values were greater than the upper range of values in the volunteers.Proton MR spectroscopy is suitable in the assessment of apparent lipid content of rotator cuff muscles.Assessment of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum using an extremity MR system: MR results compared to surgical findings from a multi-center study.To conduct a multi-center assessment of the use of a 0.2-T, extremity MR system (E-scan; General Electric Lunar Corp. and Esaote, Genoa, Italy) for identifying tears of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum.A retrospective study was performed involving 160 patients (age range, 15-84 years old) from five facilities in the United States, comparing shoulder MR imaging to surgical findings. MR imaging of the shoulder was conducted as follows: shoulder coil; T1-weighted spin echo, coronal-oblique and axial images; short Tau inversion recovery (STIR), coronal-oblique images and axial images; and T2-weighted spin echo, coronal-oblique and sagittal-oblique images. The MR examinations were interpreted in an independent, prospective manner by two radiologists with extensive musculoskeletal MRI experience. Arthroscopic (N = 103) or open surgical (N = 57) procedures were performed within a mean of 53 days after MR imaging.Surgical findings demonstrated rotator cuff tears in 131 patients and labral tears in 60 patients. For the rotator cuff, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 90%, 93%, 98%, and 68%, respectively. For the labrum, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 55%, 100%, 100%, and 82%, respectively.There was good agreement when MR results obtained using the extremity MR system were compared to surgical findings for identifying rotator cuff tears, while the sensitivity of MR imaging for determining labral tears was relatively poor. Nevertheless, these findings were comparable to those reported in the peer-reviewed literature for MR systems operating at mid-, and high-field-strengths.Full-thickness and partial-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears: value of US signs in diagnosis.To determine which US signs are important in the diagnosis of a surgically identifiable supraspinatus tendon tear.Fifty consecutive ultrasonographic (US) studies of the shoulder in patients who underwent arthroscopic follow-up were retrospectively reviewed by a musculoskeletal radiologist. US images of the supraspinatus tendon were evaluated for tendon nonvisualization, abnormal tendon echogenicity, tendon thinning, greater tuberosity cortical irregularity, cartilage interface sign, joint fluid, and subacromial-subdeltoid bursal fluid. US findings were compared with arthroscopic results. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy were calculated for each US sign in the diagnosis of full-thickness tendon tear and again for any type of supraspinatus tendon tear.Arthroscopy revealed 21 full-thickness tears, five bursal surface partial-thickness tears, 10 articular surface partial-thickness tears, and 14 patients without tear of the supraspinatus tendon. The presence of greater tuberosity cortical irregularity and joint fluid was most important in the diagnosis of full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tear (sensitivity, 60%; specificity, 100%; positive predictive value, 100%; negative predictive value, 78%; accuracy, 84%). For diagnosis of any type of supraspinatus tendon tear (partial or full thickness), tendon nonvisualization, greater tuberosity cortical irregularity, and cartilage interface sign are most important, although a combination of signs did not improve accuracy.Secondary US signs, such as greater tuberosity cortical irregularity and joint fluid, are most valuable in the diagnosis of supraspinatus tendon tear.Comparison of high-field-strength versus low-field-strength MRI of the shoulder.Previous studies have reported similar results of shoulder MRI versus arthroscopy for high-field-strength (1.5-T) and low-field-strength (0.2-T) units. We report our experience with the accuracy of high- versus low-field-strength units versus arthroscopy for detection of supraspinatus tendon tears and labral tears in the same patients. SUBJECTS AND METHODS. Three musculoskeletal radiologists prospectively interpreted shoulder MRIs from 40 patients who had a complete shoulder MRI examination on a 0.2-T system and limited imaging on a 1.5-T unit. Proton-density axial and fat-saturated T2-weighted coronal and sagittal sequences were performed. Each radiologist interpreted the open unit images first and the high-field-strength images second. Results from 28 patients who also underwent arthroscopy were also compared with the MRI interpretations. All scans were then retrospectively reinterpreted by consensus of the three reviewers, who were unaware of the patient's name, results of previous MRI, or arthroscopy report (if any).High-field-strength images altered reviewers' interpretations of low-field-strength scans for nine of 40 patients. In four patients, full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears could be diagnosed definitively on the high-field-strength unit but not on the open unit. Three labral tears and two superior labral anteroposterior lesions could be depicted definitively on the high-field-strength unit but not on the open unit. All tears were confirmed at arthroscopy.High-field-strength MRI units provide better spatial and contrast resolution and allow more accurate interpretations than low-field-strength units; these findings may affect clinical treatment.Role of community diagnostic ultrasound examination in the diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears.Diagnostic ultrasound examination has become the most commonly used investigation in Australia for diagnosing rotator cuff tears. The authors felt that the results of such investigations were often inaccurate in their clinical practices.The diagnostic ultrasound findings in 336 cases were compared to arthrography, and in 225 cases findings at surgery.A very poor accuracy rate of 0.38 was found for diagnostic ultrasound examination. The sensitivity was 0.24 and specificity was 0.61.Extreme caution is recommended in the use of diagnostic ultrasound, as currently practised in a general community setting, in diagnosing full-thickness rotator cuff tears.MR arthrography of partial thickness tears of the undersurface of the rotator cuff: an arthroscopic correlation.Partial thickness tears of the undersurface (articular surface) of the rotator cuff (RTC) have been recognized increasingly in recent years as a source of treatable shoulder pain in the athletic population. This study evaluated the efficacy of MR arthrography (MR-ARTH) in diagnosing these tears.The study design was a retrospective review of medical records of patients who had presented with refractory shoulder complaints and subsequently undergone MR arthrography with multiple signal MRI sequences followed by shoulder arthroscopy. Of particular interest were patients who had oblique T1 fat suppression (COT1FS), coronal oblique T2 (COT2), and coronal oblique T2 fat suppression (COT2FS) images taken. Seventy-six subjects met the study criteria. Investigators examined the MR-ARTH images from these patients' charts while blinded as to arthroscopic results, clinical signs and symptoms.Based on COT1FS images, investigators identified nine subjects as having had full thickness tears, 28 as having had partial thickness tears of the undersurface of the rotator cuff (PRTC), and 39 as having had intact RTC. These results were compared to actual findings at arthroscopy: nine full thickness tears, 26 of 28 with PRTC and 34 of 39 intact. The sensitivity of MR-ARTH was 84%, with a positive predictive value of 93%. The overall accuracy was 91% (69/76). The specificity was 96%. That is, if a PRTC was not seen on the MR-ARTH images, it was very unlikely to exist. COT2 and COT2FS sequences failed to increase sensitivity and overall efficacy of MRI.PRTC can be diagnosed accurately by MR-ARTH with gadopentatate contrast. A COT1FS sequence is recommended for evaluation when tears are suspected.Usefulness of the simultaneous acquisition of spatial harmonics technique during MRI of the shoulder.The simultaneous acquisition of spatial harmonics (SMASH) technique is a parallel imaging technique that uses fewer echoes than conventional techniques to obtain the desired resolution. Production of images occurs more quickly with parallel imaging than with conventional imaging. This study assesses the usefulness of the SMASH technique for MRI of the shoulder. SUBJECTS AND METHODS. Five experienced musculoskeletal radiologists prospectively interpreted MRIs of the shoulder in 50 consecutive patients. All patients underwent a complete MRI examination of the shoulder on a 1.5-T commercially available scanner. Axial fat-saturated proton density-weighted, coronal T1-weighted, and coronal and sagittal fat-saturated T2-weighted sequences were performed. Patients also underwent SMASH T2-weighted imaging in the coronal and sagittal planes. Coronal and sagittal SMASH T2-weighted imaging took approximately 50% as long to complete compared with conventional T2-weighted imaging. Each radiologist interpreted MRIs of the shoulder without knowing whether the images were obtained using the SMASH or the fat-saturated T2-weighted technique. Twenty-eight of the 50 patients also underwent subsequent arthroscopy, and the results were compared with MRI interpretations based on SMASH and fat-saturated T2-weighted images.We found no intraobserver variability between the interpretations of SMASH imaging and the interpretations of fat-saturated T2-weighted imaging. Of the 28 patients who also underwent subsequent arthroscopy, 19 were found to have full-thickness supraspinatus tendon tears and nine had superior labral anterior-to-posterior lesions. All arthroscopic findings correlated with prospective MRI interpretations.SMASH imaging allows significant time savings compared with fat-saturated T2-weighted MRI. We found that the use of the SMASH technique did not affect the MRI interpretation or the clinical outcome of patients.The significance of subacromial arthrography to verify partial bursal-side rotator cuff ruptures.The purpose of this study was to verify a partial bursa-side rupture of the rotator cuff (RC) using different imaging techniques with special emphasis on the validity of a specific method of subacromial arthrography (SAA).Patients (n=92, mean age 53.8 years) with a subacromial impingement syndrome underwent sonography, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and SAA. All diagnostic results were checked by subsequent arthroscopic surgery.Of 31 surgically verified ruptures, 17 showed a partial rupture located towards the bursa. These had been detected by MRI and ultrasound with a sensitivity of 64% and 41%, respectively, while SAA as a diagnostic tool yielded a sensitivity of 82%. In 14 cases of complete RC ruptures, all imaging techniques had a similar sensitivity of 86-93%.It appears that SAA is an adequate and valid diagnostic tool for the detection of partial bursa-sided RC ruptures. Ultrasound and MRI showed a comparably lower sensitivity. It is therefore concluded that SAA has clear advantages in the diagnosis of this defect with the consequence that open surgical techniques can be avoided.Association of shoulder sonographic findings with subsequent surgical treatment for rotator cuff injury.To identify any clinical and radiologic findings of rotator cuff injury that predict whether patients will undergo shoulder surgery.We retrospectively studied all shoulder sonograms obtained at a single institution over 12 months. Possible predictors of surgical treatment were documented, including patient age and sex, duration and types of symptoms, and the location and severity of tendon damage on sonography. One hundred twenty-eight patients underwent shoulder sonography; 34 patients eventually underwent shoulder surgery. Multivariate logistic regression was performed to identify clinical and sonographic factors associated with the use of surgical therapy.The only statistically significant predictor of surgical intervention was the finding of full-thickness tears (with or without tendon retraction) on sonography (P = .03). Patients with full-thickness tears were 4.3 times more likely to undergo surgery than those with no tears (odds ratio, 4.3).The sonographic diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears is the only finding statistically associated with the use of surgical treatment. No single clinical variable was consistently associated with subsequent surgery. Partial-thickness tears on sonography also do not show any statistical association with the eventual use of surgery for rotator cuff symptoms.Horizontal component of partial-thickness tears of rotator cuff: imaging characteristics and comparison of ABER view with oblique coronal view at MR arthrography initial results.To determine the characteristics of horizontal components of partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff at magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography and to determine whether use of the abduction and external rotation (ABER) position improved detection of a horizontal component in partial-thickness tears.MR studies in 16 patients (mean age, 32 years) who had partial-thickness tear with a horizontal component were retrospectively evaluated. All 16 patients had undergone arthroscopic surgery. The depth and extent of the horizontal component were measured on MR images, and the presence or absence of articular surface tear was recorded. The characteristics of the horizontal component on ABER views were compared with those on oblique coronal views.A horizontal component (24 lesions; one tendon involved in eight patients and two tendons involved in eight patients) was observed in 100% of the lesions on ABER views and in 21% of the lesions (n = 5) on oblique coronal images. The mean length of the horizontal components, measured on ABER views, was 1.9 cm (range, 0.6-4.5 cm). Thirteen (54%) of the 24 lesions were classified as grade I (<3 mm) in depth, four (17%) were classified as grade II (3-6 mm), and seven (29%) were classified as grade III (>6 mm). Articular separation sites with a flap lesion were visualized in 15 (62%) of 24 lesions on ABER views.MR arthrography of the shoulder with patients in the ABER position may provide additional information in cases of partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff with a horizontal component.Distinction between supraspinatus, infraspinatus and subscapularis tendon tears with ultrasound in 332 surgically confirmed cases.The aim of this retrospective study was to determine the diagnostic value of preoperative ultrasonography for the characterisation of size and location of the involved tendons. in 332 consecutive patients who underwent surgery, all preoperative ultrasonographic reports were reviewed and ultrasound (US) and surgical findings were compared. Ultrasound criteria for cuff tears were complete nonvisualisation of the cuff tendons or localised absence and focal discontinuity. In all but 12 cases, US diagnoses corresponded with intraoperative findings (sensitivity 98%, confidence interval 95.1-99.3; specificity 93%, CI 85.7-97.1; accuracy 97%, CI 93.8-98.1). Size and location of the tear were correctly predicted in 69 of 96 cases (accuracy 87%, sensitivity 89%, specificity 87%). US demonstrated less extensive tears than observed at surgery in 18%. Ultrasonography was highly accurate and sensitive for detecting rotator cuff tears, but seems to be a method of limited value for evaluation of the size of cuff tears, in particular, for the detection of small tears.Diagnosing patients with longstanding shoulder joint pain.To examine the interobserver agreement of commonly used clinical tests and diagnoses in patients with shoulder pain, and the accuracy of these tests and ultrasonographic findings in comparison with arthroscopic findings.Eighty six patients with longstanding shoulder joint pain were "blindly" examined by two trained doctors using several clinical tests. In all patients an ultrasonographic examination was performed, and in 42 (49%) an arthroscopy.Tests for impingement showed poor to moderate agreement. Tenderness of muscles, muscle weakness, and tests for labral lesion also showed poor agreement. Pain during muscle contraction showed moderate agreement. The agreement of clinical diagnoses was poor and the accuracy was low in comparison with arthroscopy. Ultrasonography was accurate in full thickness supraspinatus tendon tears, but inaccurate for partial tears and labral lesions.Most clinical tests showed poor agreement. Clinical and ultrasonographic diagnoses had low accuracy in comparison with arthroscopy.[Ultrasound diagnosis of the rotator cuff].Shoulder sonography is a well-established and standardized method to evaluate the status of the rotator cuff, the long head of the biceps, and the subacromial and subdeltoid bursae. Using high-frequency linear probes, the sensitivity in detecting total tears sized 0.5 cm and greater is > 90% and in detecting partial thickness tears of at least one-third of the cuff substance > 75% when using the dual-criteria standard. Ultrasound achieves comparable or better results than native magnetic resonance tomography at far less cost. False results can be excluded in the majority of cases by strict adherence to a dual-criteria model. The ability to display the joint's soft tissue structures in real time is unique up to now. The limits of sonography are (1) in the estimation of tear size in global tears as retraction of tendon stumps under the acromion cannot be visualized and (2) in the evaluation of status of rotator cuff muscles since volumetric information about atrophy can be gained by ultrasonography, but a differentiation between simple atrophy and fatty degeneration is not possible.Supraspinatus tendon tears: comparison of US and MR arthrography with surgical correlation.The aim of this study was to compare the diagnostic reliability of US with MR arthrography in diagnosing supraspinatus tendon tears. Surgical findings were used as the gold standard in detecting tears. A total of 44 patients were assessed with transverse and longitudinal US scans with respect to the long axis of the rotator cuff tendons and then examined with MR arthrography. This technique involved free-hand injection of contrast medium into the shoulder joint. At surgery 20 incomplete and 24 complete tears were observed. Ultrasound offered good results for the large tears, but its sensitivity decreased proportionally with the size of the tears. Magnetic resonance arthrography correctly diagnosed 43 tears, whereas only one false-negative diagnosis of tendinosis was made for a partial tear on the bursal side. Since it improves the diagnosis of small tears, MR arthrography must be performed on all patients for whom surgical repair is necessary in order to restore normal functions.Evaluation of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum using a 0.2-Tesla extremity magnetic resonance (MR) system: MR results compared to surgical findings.The purpose of this investigation was to evaluate the diagnostic capabilities of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) performed using a dedicated-extremity MR system in detecting lesions of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum. This retrospective study compared the MR results obtained in 47 patients that underwent MRI using a 0.2-Tesla extremity MR system (E-scan) to the surgical findings. MR images of the shoulder were obtained as follows: shoulder coil, T1-weighted, coronal-oblique and axial images; short Tau inversion recovery (STIR), coronal-oblique images; and T2-weighted, coronal-oblique, sagittal-oblique, and axial images. The MR examinations were interpreted by three highly experienced, musculoskeletal radiologists. Open surgical (N = 26) or arthroscopic (N = 21) procedures were performed within a mean time of 33 days after MRI. The surgical findings revealed rotator cuff tears in 28 patients and labral lesions in 9 patients. For the rotator cuff tears, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 89%, 100%, 100%, and 90%, respectively. For the labral lesions, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 89%, 95%, 80%, and 97%, respectively. The findings indicated that there was good agreement comparing the MR results obtained using the low-field extremity MR system to the surgical findings for determination of lesions of the rotator cuff and glenoid labrum. Notably, the statistical values determined for the use of this MR system were comparable to those reported in the peer-reviewed literature for the use of whole-body, mid- and high-field-strength MR systems.Comparative studies of MRI and operative findings in rotator cuff tear.A prospective study was performed to determine the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) compared with operative findings in the evaluation of patients associated with rotator cuff tears. Fifty-four of 60 shoulders (58 patients) examined by MRI were confirmed as full-thickness tears and 6 as partial-thickness tears at the time of surgery. The oblique coronal, oblique sagittal, and axial planes of T2-weighted images with the 0.5 tesla MRI system were obtained preoperatively and compared with operative findings. MRI correctly identified 46 of 54 full-thickness rotator cuff tears and 5 of 6 partial-thickness tears. A comparison of MRI and operative findings in full-thickness cuff tears showed a sensitivity of 85%, a specificity of 83%, and a positive prospective value (PPV) of 99%. A comparison of partial-thickness tears showed a sensitivity of 83%, a specificity of 85%, and PPV of 39%. Linear regression analysis showed an excellent correlation between the MRI assessment and measurement at the time of surgery (r = 0.90, P < 0.01). MRI was useful in evaluating large and medium-sized rotator cuff tears, but less useful in distinguishing small full-thickness tears from partial-thickness tears.[Diagnosis of rotator cuff injury].Three-dimensional ultrasonography in the diagnosis of rotator cuff lesions.Two-dimensional (2-D) ultrasound (US) of rotator cuff lesions is a well-established tool. The aim of this study was to elucidate if the use of 3-D sonography can increase the diagnostic yield of US. A total of 40 patients were preoperatively evaluated using 2-D and 3-D sonography, and these results were compared to intraoperative findings. Ultrasound was performed on a 530D US machine (Kretztechnik, Zipf, Austria) with a 10-MHz transducer. We found an increased validity of 3-D imaging, mainly based on the higher reliability in the diagnosis of partial-thickness cuff lesions. Sensitivity and specificity were found to be 91% and 82% for 3-D sonography and 74% and 82% for 2-D sonography, respectively. With 3-D US partial-tear rotator cuff lesions can be predicted more accurately.[Rotator cuff rupture. Diagnostic imaging].Conventional radiography, ultrasound, Magnetic Resonance (MR), Arthrography Computed Tomography (Arthro-CT) and Arthrography Magnetic Resonance (Arthro-MR) are available for diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Our purpose is to assess the specificity and sensitivity of these examinations and if they could give to the surgeon all the informations to select the more accurate treatment. We have evaluated retrospectively the images of 68 patients, 43 male and 25 female (average age 51 years), which then have been surgically treated for rotator cuff pathology. On the basis of our findings, we think that conventional radiography and ultrasound are excellent in a first evaluation. MR images, particularly in the coronal and sagittal oblique planes, are able to demonstrate partial or complete rotator cuff tears. The use of intra-articular contrast medium (arthro-CT, arthro-MR) should be reserved for partial lesions on specific cases.Angled oblique sagittal MR imaging of rotator cuff tears: comparison with standard oblique sagittal images.To compare the accuracy for diagnosing rotator cuff tears of oblique coronal images supplemented with standard oblique sagittal images versus thinner-section angled oblique sagittal images.The study included 75 consecutive patients who had a shoulder MR scan followed by arthroscopy. MR images included oblique coronal, oblique sagittal (4 mm thick, 1 mm interslice gap), and angled oblique sagittal (3 mm/0.2 mm) images perpendicular to the lateral cuff. A musculoskeletal staff radiologist and fellow separately evaluated the cuff for tears on the oblique coronal images supplemented with either the oblique sagittal or the angled sagittal images.For distinguishing a cuff tear from no tear, the staff radiologist had an accuracy of 0.76 (95% confidence interval: 0.67, 0.85) with the standard sagittal set, and 0.88 (0.80, 0.95) with the angled set (P=0.04). There was a nonsignificant improvement in accuracy for the fellow, calculated as 0.73 (0.63, 0.83) on the standard sagittal set and 0.76 (0.67, 0.85) on the angled set. Both readers also improved their diagnostic accuracy for partial-thickness tears with the angled set, although the improvement was statistically significant only for the staff radiologist.There is a slight improvement in accuracy for diagnosing rotator cuff tears, particularly partial-thickness tears, for the more experienced radiologist using thinner-section angled oblique sagittal images. These images may be useful as a supplemental sequence in patients where it is important to identify partial-thickness tears accurately.[Normal anatomy and pathological conditions of subscapular muscle: US findings compared with surgery].To compare US results with those of surgery in the assessment of the subscapularis tendon.From January 1995 to December 1998 1500 patients underwent US of the shoulder. 12 of these patients had an injured subscapularis tendon. US results of these patients were evaluated retrospectively and compared with those of surgery. US examinations of the subscapularis tendon were performed with two US units (AU4 Idea and HDI 3000), using linear arrays 10-13 MHz transducers. The following features of the tendon were evaluated: morphology, thickness and echotexture.A) US findings. US showed: - chronic degenerative tendon changes with diffusely inhomogeneous echotexture (5 cases); - focal tears with small hypoechoic ill-defined areas or gross hypo-anechoic areas involving the full thickness of the tendon (4 cases); - complete tendon tear with disappearance on US of the subscapularis tendon or with severe thickening of the tendon (2 cases); - in 1 case of recent anterior dislocation of the shoulder a bulky hematoma was seen with coexisting thickening and subtotal tear of the tendon. B) Surgical findings. US findings were confirmerd at surgery in 10 of the 12 patients. In the patient with anterior dislocation of shoulder the diagnosis hematoma was confirmed, but the subscapularis tendon was undamaged. Moreover, in 1 out of the 5 patients with US diagnosis of chronic degenerative tendon changes, a small focal tear of the tendon was found at surgery.US is a first level investigation which is able to demonstrate early changes of the subscapularis tendon and nearby structures. Awareness of pitfalls might decrease the use of second level investigations such as CT arthrography and MR imaging, which on the other hand allow a better definition and assessment of the extent of the injury.[On: Indirect MR arthrography in the diagnosis rotator cuff injuries. By J. Rudolph, Berlin et. al. In: Fortsch Rontgenstr 2000; 172: 686-691].Diagnostic capabilities of shoulder ultrasonography in the detection of complete and partial rotator cuff tears.Our study assessed the accuracy of shoulder ultrasonography in detecting complete and partial rotator cuff tears. We performed a prospective study in 24 patients scheduled for shoulder arthroscopy for impingement, partial-thickness or full-thickness (complete) rotator cuff tears, adhesive capsulitis, or arthritis. Before surgery, all patients underwent diagnostic shoulder ultrasonography followed by a shoulder arthroscopy with examination of the rotator cuff. The arthroscopic findings of rotator cuff integrity were compared with the diagnoses made from ultrasonography. The ultrasonographer was not blinded to the history and examination findings, and the surgeon was not blinded to the results of the ultrasonography. Ultrasound had sensitivity and specificity rates of 80% and 100%, respectively (positive and negative predictive rates of 100% and 88%), in the diagnosis of full-thickness rotator cuff tears and sensitivity and specificity rates of 71% and 100%, respectively (positive and negative predictive values of 100% and 88%), for partial-thickness tears. Although the potential for bias exists in this study, the results suggest that diagnostic ultrasound is effective in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Indirect MR arthrography of the shoulder in detection of rotator cuff ruptures.The aim of this study was to compare the efficacy of indirect MR arthrography images obtained following intravenous contrast injection and conventional MR imaging in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Twenty-four patients with clinically suspected rotator cuff disease were examined. Conventional MR images and post-contrast indirect MR arthrography images were obtained. All images were evaluated in a blinded fashion by two musculoskeletal radiologist. Results were than analyzed depending on surgical output. The correlation coefficient (Spearman rank correlation test) and the kappa values for agreement between surgery and imaging techniques were calculated. The correlation coefficients between indirect MR arthrography and surgery for reader 1 and reader 2 were 0.9137 and 0.9773, respectively. Whereas the agreement between conventional MR imaging and surgery was moderate (n = 0.383-0.571), the agreement between indirect MR arthrography and surgery was excellent (n = 0.873-0.936). We suggest the use of indirect MR arthrography technique when conventional MR images are equivocal in diagnosis of rotator cuff disease.MR arthrography of the shoulder: comparison of low-field (0.2 T) vs high-field (1.5 T) imaging.The objective of this study was to compare the image quality, sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic accuracy of an open low-field MR system (0.2 T) with a standard high-field MR system (1.5 T) after arthrography of the shoulder. Thirty-eight patients either with suspected chronic instability (n = 12) or rotator cuff abnormalities (n = 26) were examined. Intra-articular injection of diluted Gd-DTPA was followed in randomized order either first by imaging on an open 0.2-T system or on a 1.5-T system. The image material was evaluated independently by two radiologists in a blinded fashion with respect to overall image quality and the detection of rotator cuff as well as capsular and labral abnormalities. Surgical correlation was available in 27 (71%) of 38 patients. For both systems, sensitivity and specificity for rotator cuff tears were 100% each, and for labrum pathologies, these values were 100 and 93%, respectively. The agreement for detection of labral pathologies between low-field and high-field examinations was good (kappa = 0.69, kappa = 0.61). For the detection of full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff, the agreement between the low-field and high-field MR examinations was very good and significant (kappa = 0.94, kappa = 1, p < 0.001). Overall image quality was rated good in 17 (45%) and fair in 21 (55%) of 38 cases on the 0.2-T MR system, and good in 32 (84%) and fair in 6 (16%) of 38 cases on the 1.5-T system. Motion artifacts were considered low in 24 (63%) and moderate in 14 (37%) of 38 cases for the 0.2-T system and low in 34 (89%) and moderate in 4 (11%) for 1.5-T system. Based on our results, low-field MR compares favorably to high-field MR in the detection of major abnormalities of the glenohumeral joint, at least when MR arthrography is used. Disadvantages are the duration of the examination and thus the risk of reduced image quality caused by motion artifacts.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff. A comparison of ultrasonographic and arthroscopic findings in one hundred consecutive cases.There has been limited acceptance of shoulder ultrasonography by orthopaedic surgeons in the United States. The purpose of this retrospective study was to determine the diagnostic performance of high-resolution ultrasonography compared with arthroscopic examination for the detection and characterization of rotator cuff tears.One hundred consecutive shoulders in ninety-eight patients with shoulder pain who had undergone preoperative ultrasonography and subsequent arthroscopy were identified. The arthroscopic diagnosis was a full-thickness rotator cuff tear in sixty-five shoulders, a partial-thickness tear in fifteen, rotator cuff tendinitis in twelve, frozen shoulder in four, arthrosis of the acromioclavicular joint in two, and a superior labral tear and calcific bursitis in one shoulder each. All ultrasonographic reports were reviewed for the presence or absence of a rotator cuff tear and a biceps tendon rupture or dislocation. All arthroscopic examinations were performed according to a standardized operative procedure. The size and extent of the tear and the status of the biceps tendon were recorded for all shoulders. The findings on ultrasonography and arthroscopy then were compared for each parameter.Ultrasonography correctly identified all sixty-five full-thickness rotator cuff tears (a sensitivity of 100 percent). There were seventeen true-negative and three false-positive ultrasonograms (a specificity of 85 percent). The overall accuracy was 96 percent. The size of the tear on transverse measurement was correctly predicted in 86 percent of the shoulders with a full-thickness tear. Ultrasonography detected a tear in ten of fifteen shoulders with a partial-thickness tear that was diagnosed on arthroscopy. Five of six dislocations and seven of eleven ruptures of the biceps tendon were identified correctly.Ultrasonography was highly accurate for detecting full-thickness rotator cuff tears, characterizing their extent, and visualizing dislocations of the biceps tendon. It was less sensitive for detecting partial-thickness rotator cuff tears and ruptures of the biceps tendon.Subscapularis tendon tears: detection and grading at MR arthrography.To assess diagnostic accuracy in the detection and grading of subscapularis tendon lesions at magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography.MR arthrograms in 50 consecutive patients (29 with normal subscapularis tendons, 11 with a lesion in the cranial quarter, seven with a major tear but not complete detachment, three with complete detachment) with arthroscopic or surgical confirmation were evaluated independently by two radiologists. Diagnosis was established on findings from transverse and/or parasagittal images.With transverse images alone, sensitivity was 95%/100% (reader 1/reader 2); specificity was 55%/62%. With parasagittal images alone, sensitivity was 91%/91%; specificity was 76%/90%. With combined images, sensitivity was 91%/91%; specificity was 86%/79%. Interobserver agreement was substantial (kappa = 0.67). Forty-one of 50 (82%) grades for subscapularis abnormalities matched at MR imaging and surgery; nine mismatches differed by only one degree. Several signs were specific (90%-100%) but insensitive (29%-62%); these included leakage of contrast material onto the lesser tuberosity, fatty degeneration of the subscapularis muscle, and abnormality in the course of the long biceps tendon (luxation, subluxation).MR arthrography is accurate in the detection and grading of subscapularis tendon lesions. Specificity of findings on transverse images for this diagnosis can be improved by including indirect signs and findings on parasagittal images.Sonography and magnetic resonance imaging equivalent for the assessment of full-thickness rotator cuff tears.To investigate the diagnostic value of sonography (SG) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the assessment of full-thickness rotator cuff tears (RCTs).Twenty-one consecutive, otherwise healthy patients with noninflammatory unilateral chronic (>3 months) shoulder complaints due to a possible full-thickness RCT were studied (9 women and 12 men, mean +/- SD age 56 +/- 12). According to standardized procedures, SG was performed by both a radiologist and a rheumatologist, and MRI was evaluated by 2 radiologists. All assessors were blinded to the patient's diagnosis. Within 3 weeks after SG and MRI, arthroscopy was performed. SG, MRI, and arthroscopy results were scored as negative or positive for the presence of a full-thickness RCT. The result of surgical inspection was used as the "gold standard."For full-thickness RCTs, the sensitivity was 0.81 for SG and 0.81 for MRI. The specificity was 0.94 for SG and 0.88 for MRI. The positive predictive value was 0.96 for SG and 0.91 for MRI. The negative predictive value was 0.77 for SG and 0.74 for MRI. Accuracy was 0.86 for SG and 0.83 for MRI.Full-thickness RCTs can be identified accurately by both SG and MRI. Because of its low cost and because it can be performed in the rheumatology unit, SG seems to be a promising diagnostic tool for use by the rheumatologist.Evaluation of chronic tears of the rotator cuff by ultrasound. A new index.The diagnosis of chronic lesions of the rotator cuff is challenging. We have developed a new index to improve the sonographic diagnosis of chronic tears of the cuff. In a pilot study, we examined 50 asymptomatic healthy volunteers by ultrasound to establish the diameter of the rotator cuff in relation to the tendon of the long head of biceps. Subsequently, the index was calculated in 64 patients who had had shoulder pain for more than three months caused by clinically diagnosed lesions of the rotator cuff. The compensatory hypertrophy of the biceps tendon was quantified sonographically in relation to the diameter of the cuff. Comparison with the contralateral shoulder revealed a significantly higher biceps rotator-cuff ratio (p < 0.05) for patients with torn rotator cuffs. A ratio greater than 0.8 was considered pathological (index positive); the mean ratio in the control group was 0.43. The sensitivity of a positive index was 97.8%, the specificity 63.2%, the positive predictive value 86.3%, and the negative predictive value 92.4% in comparison with surgical findings. Use of the index improves sensitivity in the diagnosis of chronic tears of the cuff by ultrasound.[The sensitivity and specificity of sonographic examination in detection of rotator cuff tear].Sonographic examination was performed in 72 patients (74 shoulders) suffering from different shoulder diseases. The results were correlated with findings obtained during subsequent surgery in 57 patients (58 shoulders) and arthrography in 15 cases (16 shoulders). Rotator cuff tear was proved during surgical procedure in 37 patients (38 shoulders). The sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography in detection of cuff tear was 98.2% and 90% respectively. In case of partial cuff tear ultrasonography had lower sensitivity--50% while specificity was 96.3%. In detection of supraspinatus tendon tear the ultrasound sensitivity was 100% and specificity 95.6%, in case of infraspinatus tear sensitivity was 66.7% and specificity 94% while for subscapularis tear these values were equal 75% and 98.1%. The size of sonographically estimated cuff defect correlated properly with intrasurgical measurement in 76.3% of all cases.Ultrasonographic analysis of shoulder rotator cuff tears.Seventy-nine shoulders suspected of rotator cuff tears were examined by ultrasonography (US) and forty-three received surgery. Long and short axis scans were performed and findings of each were separately classified according to a five-grade system, and the results were correlated with the actual extent of tear observed during surgery. Internal echogenicity and subacromial impingement were analyzed before and after surgery. A accuracy of US in detecting rotator cuff tears was analyzed. In addition, the correlation between cuff shape observed by US before surgery and actual shape observed during surgery was assessed. It was noted that cuff thinning and abnormalities in shape did not recover to normal after surgery. However, in the cases of discontinuities observed by US before surgery, US findings indicated that the torn cuff was anchored to the greater tuberosity and functional during active motion. Although post-operative US findings were not normal, clinical results were good in most cases. Sensitivity of US for detecting rotator cuff tear was 100% and specificity 94%. US is non-invasive, cost effective and allows the physician to examine the joint while it is in motion. Therefore, at this time, we use US as a screening method for detecting rotator cuff tears. Furthermore, US allows us to check for re-tears while the joint is in motion, which is essential for accurate diagnosis.Diagnostic and therapeutic impact of MRI and arthrography in the investigation of full-thickness rotator cuff tears.Investigation of shoulder pain is important before surgical treatment. The presence or absence of a full-thickness rotator cuff tear (FTRCT) may determine the type of surgical treatment. Both MRI and conventional arthrography can be used, but little is known about their relative diagnostic and therapeutic impact. We performed a prospective trial assessing: (a) the influence of MRI and arthrography results on the clinician's diagnostic thinking (diagnostic impact); (b) the influence of the results on the clinician's therapeutic thinking (therapeutic impact); and (c) the diagnostic performance of the two techniques in patients with surgical confirmation. A total of 104 consecutive patients with shoulder problems referred to a specialist orthopaedic shoulder clinic underwent pre-operative investigation with MRI and arthrography. The surgeon's diagnosis, diagnostic confidence and planned treatment were measured before the investigation, and then again after the results of each investigation. Before the presentation of the investigation, results, the patients were randomised into two groups. In one group MRI was presented first; in the other group, arthrography. The MRI results led to fewer changes in diagnostic category (14 of 46, 30%) than arthrography (20 of 54, 37%), but the difference was not significant (P > 0.5). Magnetic resonance imaging led to slightly more changes in planned management (17 of 47, 36%) than arthrography (14 of 55, 25%), but again the difference was not statistically significant (P > 0.3). The results of the second investigation always had less diagnostic and therapeutic impact than the first. The accuracy of MRI for FTRCT in 38 patients with surgical confirmation was 79%, sensitivity 81% and specificity 78%; the accuracy of arthrography was 82%, sensitivity 50% and specificity 96%. The clinical diagnosis and management plan can be adequately defined by a single radiological investigation. Magnetic resonance imaging and arthrography had fairly similar diagnostic and therapeutic impact and comparable accuracy, although MRI was more sensitive and less specific. Magnetic resonance imaging may be the preferred investigation because of its better demonstration of soft tissue anatomy.Indirect MR arthrography of the unexercised glenohumeral joint in patients with rotator cuff tears.To evaluate the diagnostic utility of indirect MR arthrography of the unexercised glenohumeral joint in patients with rotator cuff tears confirmed by arthroscopy or arthrotomy as the gold standard.Twenty-six patients underwent conventional MR imaging and indirect MR arthrography of the stationary glenohumeral joint using a wrap-around surface coil. Unenhanced T1-weighted spin echo/T2-weighted fast spin echo sequences and T1-weighted gradient echo sequences, adding spectral fat suppression after intravenous administration of contrast medium, were performed in the oblique coronal and oblique sagittal planes. Images were analyzed by three experienced radiologists in consensus. Levels of diagnostic confidence were evaluated using a four-point scale of diagnostic certainty.Performing indirect MR arthrography of the unexercised shoulder leads to a diagnostically efficient enhancement of joint fluid (120% at 4 minutes and 145% at 8 minutes after intravenous injection of gadodiamide). In terms of soft tissue delineation, characterization of rotator cuff tears was significantly improved by using enhanced fat-suppressed T1-weighted gradient echo sequences compared with conventional MR imaging.Indirect MR arthrography without glenohumeral joint exercise in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears is feasible and represents a more convenient and less time-consuming alternative to indirect MR arthrography after joint exercise.Magnetic resonance imaging assessment of the rotator cuff: is it really accurate?Is sonography performed by the rheumatologist as useful as arthrography executed by the radiologist for the assessment of full thickness rotator cuff tears?Sonography and arthrography are techniques used to detect rotator cuff tears (RCT). The diagnostic value of sonography executed by a rheumatologist versus that of arthrography performed by a radiologist for assessment of RCT was investigated among patients with unilateral chronic shoulder complaints without an underlying inflammatory rheumatic disease.Forty-eight patients underwent sonography, arthrography, and surgical inspection, the results of surgical inspection being the gold standard.Sensitivity for assessment of a full thickness RCT was 0.86 for sonography and 0.77 for arthrography, specificity was 0.88 for sonography and 0.92 for arthrography.Compared to arthrography performed by the radiologist, sonography executed by the rheumatologist is as useful for assessment of full thickness rotator cuff tears. Sonography performed by the rheumatologist in combination with history taking and the physical examination during a single visit might change the routine daily practice of rheumatologists.Sonography for the office screening of suspected rotator cuff tears: early experience of the orthopedic surgeon.This study examined the feasibility of orthopedic surgeons performing sonography of the shoulder at the initial office evaluation of the rotator cuff and assessed the sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value of sonography for the detection of tears in the rotator cuff. Initial results in 24 patients suggest that sonography by the orthopedic surgeon is feasible and that it detects tears in the rotator cuff with sufficient accuracy for clinical decision making.Anterior versus posterior, and rim-rent rotator cuff tears: prevalence and MR sensitivity.To determine the relative distribution of the locations of rotator cuff tears, and the sensitivity of anterior versus posterior tears on MR images.We identified 110 consecutive patients who had a shoulder MR and either a partial-thickness or a small full-thickness rotator cuff tear diagnosed at arthroscopy. From the arthroscopy videotapes, we classified the tears as centered in the anterior or posterior half of the cuff, and as either in the critical zone or adjacent to the bony insertion. The original MR interpretation was compared with the arthroscopic findings. MR sensitivity and patient age were compared between patients with tears in the anterior and posterior halves of the cuff. In addition, in patients with partial tears less than 2 cm in diameter, an age comparison between those with tears in the critical zone and those with articular surface tears adjacent to the bony insertion (rim-rent tear) was performed.The tear was centered in the anterior half of the rotator cuff in 79% of the patients younger than 36 years old, and in 89% of the patients 36 years old and over. The average age of the patients with tears in the anterior half (44 years) was not significantly different from the average age of those with posterior tears (40 years) (P = 0.23). The sensitivity of MR for anterior tears was 0.69, and for posterior tears it was 0.56 (P = 0.17). The average age of the 9 patients with rim-rent tears was 31 years, while that of the 28 patients with similarly-sized partial tears not involving the insertion was 40 years old (P = 0.048). Five of the nine rim-rent tears (0.56) were interpreted correctly on the original MR report; two of the other tears were misinterpreted as intratendinous fluid but were diagnosable in retrospect.Even in patients less than 36 years old, most partial and small full-thickness rotator cuff tears are centered in the anterior half of the supraspinatus. Although our figure for MR sensitivity for these tears is lower than in recent articles, we found no significant difference between the sensitivity of MR for diagnosing posterior tears versus tears in the anterior half of the supraspinatus tendon. Rim-rent tears can be mistaken for intratendinous signal, and should be carefully looked for in younger patients with shoulder pain.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder.[Echography of the shoulder with the patient supine in the diagnosis of rotator cuff rupture].We report a new method for shoulder sonography (US): the patient lies supine and his/her arm is positioned so as to optimize tendon depiction. The supraspinatus tendon, which is the most frequently involved structure in rotator cuff tears, is studied with the patient's arm dropped, elbow extended and forearm prone. Our series consisted of 49 surgical patients (arthroscopy in 16 and open surgery in 33 patients): US sensitivity in tear depiction was 84.8%, specificity 100% and accuracy 89.8%. Medium-small tears appeared as transonic areas within tendon substance and/or tendon focal thinning. Large tears appeared as: (a) missed or markedly thinned rotator cuff, with deltoid muscle approximation to the humeral head surface, (b) plenty of fluid collected around bulky tear margins. The US images of 36 patients were then reviewed and the details discussed. A new sign was observed in medium-small tears, that is a sharp hyperechoic band encircling the humeral cartilage (the compass sign). In conclusion, we believe that US performed with the patient in supine recumbency is easier to perform and provides a bigger field of view of the supraspinatus tendon; it also permits to keep stretched rotator cuff, with consequent image quality improvement.Magnetic resonance imaging assessment of the rotator cuff: is it really accurate?Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is used increasingly for evaluating the rotator cuff. This study of 39 shoulders (38 patients) compared the accuracy of MRI interpretation of rotator cuff integrity by a group of community hospital radiologists (clinical community scenario, CCS) with that of a musculoskeletal radiologist (experienced specialist scenario, ESS), relative to arthroscopy. For the CCS subgroup, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PV), negative PV, and accuracy for partial tears were: 0%, 68%, 0%, 82%, and 59%, respectively; for complete tears: 56%, 73%, 36%, 86%, and 69%, respectively; and for all tears combined: 85%, 52%, 50%, 87%, and 64%, respectively. For the ESS subgroup, the respective values for partial tears were: 20%, 88%, 20%, 88%, and 79%, respectively; for complete tears: 78%, 83%, 58%, 92%, and 82%, respectively; and for all tears: 71%, 71%, 59%, 81%, and 71%, respectively. We concluded that MRI assessment of the rotator cuff was not accurate relative to arthroscopy. MRI was most helpful if the result was negative, and MRI diagnosis of partial tear was of little value. Considering the high cost of shoulder MRI, this study has significant implications for the evaluation of patients with possible rotator cuff pathology.The clinical role of shoulder ultrasound.Rotator cuff surgery is facilitated by accurate pre-operative information regarding the presence and size of cuff tears, and the extent of any cuff retraction or lamination.A total of 117 consecutive patients who underwent shoulder ultrasound followed by surgical management were assessed, and the pre-operative ultrasound diagnoses were correlated with the operative findings.Ultrasound was found to be reliable for the detection of full-thickness cuff tears (positive predictive value 96%). In the assessment of partial thickness tears, ultrasound produced few false positives, but failed to diagnose a significant proportion of these lesions. Lamination and other interstitial cuff pathology were not reliably detected by ultrasound. In the diagnosis of subacromial impingement, ultrasound produced few false positives (positive predictive value 95%), but did produce a significant number of false negative results (negative predictive value 66%).Ultrasound is cheaper than MRI and arthrography, and is both non-invasive and 'dynamic'. It is reliable in the diagnosis of full-thickness cuff tears and is a useful adjunct in the diagnosis of cuff impingement and partial thickness tears, but is very much operator-dependent.MR imaging of the rotator cuff tendon: interobserver agreement and analysis of interpretive errors.To evaluate accuracy in interpretation of shoulder magnetic resonance (MR) images and interobserver agreement and to characterize the types of errors.Five radiologists with varying experience independently and retrospectively twice interpreted the MR images of 222 symptomatic patients who underwent both MR imaging and shoulder arthroscopy. The first interpretation was a blind review; the second was with knowledge of the arthroscopic findings.For full-thickness tears, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 84%-96%, 94%-98%, and 92%-97%, respectively, and for partial tears, 35%-44%, 85%-97%, and 77%-87%, respectively. There was no statistically significant difference between readers in the detection of partial or full-thickness tears. There was a statistically significant difference between readers in the no-tear category. Cohen kappa values generally indicated improved interobserver agreement proportional to the readers' experience (full-thickness tears, 0.731-0.881; partial tears, 0.168-0.443).Diagnosis of a full-thickness tear can be learned to a high degree of accuracy. Despite the radiologist's level of experience and knowledge of the arthroscopic findings, the sensitivity for diagnosis of partial tears is poor.MR imaging of rotator cuff tendon tears: comparison of T2*-weighted gradient-echo and conventional dual-echo sequences.Although MR imaging evaluation of the rotator cuff is usually done with proton density- and T2-weighted spin-echo techniques, interest also exists in T2*-weighted gradient-recalled echo techniques. The shorter scan times of T2*-weighted sequences can be used to increase the number of signal averages and thus improve the signal-to-noise ratio. Our purpose in this study was to compare the sensitivity and specificity of oblique coronal T2*-weighted MR image interpretations with conventional dual-echo T2-weighted MR image interpretations when diagnosing rotator cuff tears.Forty-seven consecutive patients who underwent both MR imaging and shoulder arthroscopy were included in this study. The MR examination included both a 7 min 20 sec acquisition time proton density- and T2-weighted oblique coronal sequence and a 7 min 5 sec T2*-weighted oblique coronal sequence. The oblique coronal dual-echo T2-weighted images were evaluated by two of the authors independently, who were unaware of the arthroscopic findings. Each of the two observers graded each cuff as being intact, having a partial-thickness tear, or having a full-thickness tear. After a 3-week interval, each of the two observers then interpreted the T2*-weighted oblique coronal MR images in the same manner. Sensitivity and specificity for the two sets of interpretations were calculated in terms of the ability of the observers to use the two sequences to distinguish an intact cuff from a rotator cuff tear and to distinguish a partial-thickness cuff tear from an intact cuff or full-thickness tear. The results were then compared using Student's t test calculations.For distinguishing an intact cuff from a torn cuff, the sensitivity of the observers' interpretations was lower for the T2*-weighted images than for the conventional dual-echo T2-weighted images. The specificity also decreased with interpretation of the T2*-weighted images for one observer and was unchanged for the second observer. For distinguishing a partial-thickness cuff tear from a non-partial-thickness cuff tear (intact or full-thickness tear), the sensitivity and specificity of both observers decreased with interpretations of the T2*-weighted images when compared with the conventional dual-echo T2-weighted images. The results did not reach statistical significance.In this small study evaluating the ability of observers to diagnose rotator cuff tears on oblique coronal MR images only, interpretations of T2*-weighted images tended to be less sensitive and specific than interpretations of standard dual-echo T2-weighted images.[Normal anatomy and pathologic features of the supraspinatus muscle: comparison between ultrasonography and surgery. Analysis of the potential sources of diagnostic errors].The supraspinatus muscle performs about 60% of the elevation-abduction motion of the arm; therefore, it has a prominent functional role among the extrarotational muscles of the shoulder and is the most injured in subacromial space conditions. Seventy-four patients, aged 21-64 years, were examined to compare ultrasonography (US) results with surgical findings in supraspinatus conditions and to analyze the possible pitfalls in US diagnosis. All the patients underwent conventional X-ray, US and then surgery or arthroscopy. The following criteria were considered: morphology, thickness, echotexture, the convexity of the superior border of supraspinatus tendon, the relationships with the subacromial bursa and the tendon of the biceps long head, the regularity of the bone cortex of the humeral head. US showed: chronic degenerative tendinopathy in 10 patients; perforating focal injuries in 21 patients; deep focal injuries in 10 patients; intramural focal injuries in 6 patients; superficial focal injuries in 8 patients; complete tendon tear with detachment in 19 cases. 62/74 US diagnoses were surgically confirmed, with a specificity of 83.7%. In our experience, US provided very useful information about the pattern, size and site of the injuries and was very helpful in the surgical planning.Not-so-fast MR imaging of the rotator cuff.MR imaging of rotator cuff impingement: correlation with full-thickness rotator cuff tear.Rotator cuff tears usually derive from shoulder impingement, and need surgical treatment. This study is to verify the Magnetic Resonance Image (MRI) findings of rotator cuff impingement which are related to full-thickness rotate cuff tear (FTRCT).Totally 68 patients with shoulder impingement syndrome were studied, including 39 shoulders with surgically-proven FTRCT, and 29 shoulders without FTRCT. MRI findings of shoulder impingement were evaluated for peribursal fat plane, subacromial distance, acromion shape, subacromioclavicular space, irregularity of coracoacromial ligament and presence of subacromial spurs. The correlation with FTRCT was also determined.Peribursal fat plane obliteration (p = 0.0001), hook-shaped acromion (p = 0.0148), subacromioclavicular indentation (p = 0.0004), and decreased subacromial distance (p = 0.0005) showed significant correlation with FTRCT; however, subacromial spurs (p = 0.6238) and thickened irregular coracoacromial ligament (p = 0.1611) showed poor correlation.Specific MRI findings of rotator cuff impingement are fairly reliable and helpful for discrimination of FTRCT from non-FTRCT cases, and can be used preoperatively and noninvasively to determine the necessity of surgical repair of rotator cuff.MR imaging of the rotator cuff mechanism: comparison of spin-echo and turbo spin-echo sequences.Although well documented in other MR imaging applications, the value of turbo spin-echo sequences in evaluating the shoulder has not been addressed. This study was designed to directly compare matched spin-echo and turbo spin-echo sequences in the MR imaging evaluation of the rotator cuff.Using otherwise matched double-echo sequences of equal time duration, we performed 123 paired spin-echo (TR/TE, 200/25,75; one excitation) and turbo spin-echo (3500-5000/22,90; two excitations) sequences in the paracoronal and/or parasagittal plane of the shoulders of 76 patients referred to our institution for possible rotator cuff tear. The sequences were retrospectively analyzed for cuff signal and morphology, fluid conspicuity, coracoacromial arch morphology, and bone marrow signal abnormalities. Surgical and nonsurgical clinical results were correlated when available.We found 100% diagnostic correlation between spin-echo and turbo spin-echo sequences for rotator cuff integrity. Surgical data were available for 26 patients, and clinical follow-up for another 37. For complete rotator cuff tear in the surgical subpopulation, sensitivity was 89%, specificity was 94%, and diagnostic accuracy was 24 of 26 (92%). We found no diagnostically significant difference between the two imaging sequences for fluid conspicuity, coracoacromial morphology, or marrow signal. Signal-to-noise ratios were superior in the turbo spin-echo sequences.Turbo spin-echo sequences are an accurate and efficient tool in the MR imaging evaluation of the rotator cuff. Potential benefits include time saving, increased spatial resolution, and improved signal-to-noise ratio.Site and size of rotator-cuff tear. Findings at ultrasound, double-contrast arthrography, and computed tomography arthrography with surgical correlation.The authors discuss findings of ultrasound (US), double-contrast arthrography (AG), and contrast computed tomography arthrography (CTA) in assessing precise site and size of rotator-cuff tears.Eighty-six patients were compared prospectively in a masked fashion; the results of surgery were studied in 25 patients and the results of arthroscopy were studied in 61 patients.Ultrasound detected 80% (8 of 10) of the partial-thickness tears and 90% (18 of 20) of the full-thickness tears. Arthrography and CTA had identical results with 70% sensitivity (7 of 10) in partial-thickness tears; AG showed 90% (18 of 20) and CTA 95% (19 of 20) of the full-thickness tears. Arthrography had two false-positive findings, and US and CTA had one each. The size of a tear could be evaluated correctly with AG in 30% (9 of 30), with US in 70% (21 of 30) and with CTA in 76% (23 of 30). More extensive tears were encountered at US than had been found at surgery in 2% (2 of 86) and less extensive tears in 9% (8 of 86); CTA depicted more extensive tears in 2% (2 of 86) and less extensive tears in 6% (6 of 86), respectively. The site of a tear could be evaluated with AG in 30% (9 of 30); US and CTA showed the site correctly in every patient in which the tear could be diagnosed.Ultrasound and CTA were equally accurate in diagnosing and evaluating the size and site of rotator-cuff tears. Double-contrast AG was less accurate in the diagnosis of tears and the size and site of tears clearly could be assessed worse.MR evaluation of rotator cuff pathology using T2-weighted fast spin-echo technique with and without fat suppression.This study was designed to compare MR imaging findings from T2-weighted fast spin-echo images with and without fat suppression and then to compare surgical results with those MR imaging interpretations in the evaluation of rotator cuff disease.T2-weighted fast spin-echo images--with and without fat suppression--of 177 shoulder MR imaging studies were reviewed separately in a retrospective, randomized, and blinded fashion. Both sets of images were read in conjunction with the corresponding proton density-weighted images. The diagnosis of normal tendon, tendinosis, degeneration, and partial- and full-thickness tears was made using established criteria.T2-weighted fast spin-echo techniques with and without fat suppression showed excellent agreement in the diagnosis of normal tendon (kappa=.90) amd full-thickness tears (kappa=.98), good agreement for partial tears (kappa=.70) and moderate agreement for the combined group of tendinosis and degeneration (kappa=.53). MR imaging and surgical correlation in 43 patients showed 86% specificity (95% confidence interval, 65-96%) for intact tendons, and 100% sensitivity (95% confidence interval, 82-100%) for full-thickness tears on T2-weighted fast spin-echo imaging--both without and with fat suppression. For partial tears, MR imaging showed a sensitivity of 92% (95% confidence interval, 65-99%) with fat suppression and 67% (95% confidence interval, 39-86%) without fat suppression.T2-weighted fast spin-echo imaging--with or without fat suppression--is a highly sensitive technique in the diagnosis of normal tendons and complete tears of the rotator cuff. Because of increased lesion conspicuity, fat suppression tends to perform better in the diagnosis of partial tears.Ultrasonography for diagnosis of rotator cuff tear.In this study the clinical usefulness of ultrasonography in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears was assessed. One hundred twenty-two patients undergoing preoperative ultrasonography were evaluated surgically. Three different ultrasonographic machines were applied with a 7.5-MHz linear-array transducer. Surgery confirmed a sensitivity of 79% for full-thickness tears and 50% for partial thickness tears. In 73 patients with negative ultrasonographic findings, the specificity was 100% for full-thickness tears and 90% for partial-thickness tears. The diagnostic sensitivity for full-thickness tears of the Hitachi EUB-340 system was significantly lower than those of Hitachi EUB-415 and EUB-515, and thus the former cannot be recommended for detection of rotator cuff tears. The sensitivity with regard to partial-thickness tears was also significantly lower with the Hitachi EUB-340 system as compared to the Hitachi EUB-515. There were no significant differences in false-positive rate among the three machines used. In conclusion, accurate ultrasonographic diagnosis of rotator cuff tear requires a high-resolution machine, as well as considerable experience in interpretation.[Magnetic resonance in the study of the painful shoulder. The surgical comparison in 30 consecutive cases].Eighty patients complaining of shoulder pain were examined with MRI from January, 1993, through December, 1994. Thirty of them were submitted to surgery, with an exhaustive inspection of shoulder structures and the treatment of abnormal findings. In this subgroup of surgical patients, MRI had depicted 16 complete tears of the rotator cuff, 4 partial tears, 8 cases of subacromial impingement, I humeral head osteochondritis and, finally, I humeral head osteochondritis with complete rotator cuff tear. Surgical findings confirmed MR diagnosis in 97% of cases. MR findings were then compared with literature data and some atypical features were observed in our series. MRI was totally reliable in complete cuff tears (16/30 patients), always showing the involvement of supraspinatus tendons and, in some cases, of other cuff tendons. In partial cuff tears (4/30 patients), besides the classic pattern of a fissure in the deep/superficial supraspinatus tendon, we observed intra- and peritendinous changes, with no tendon interruption, due to diffuse microlesions. When impingement due to subacromial space narrowing, with no cuff tear, was present (8/30 patients), MRI depicted different causes--e.g., acromioclavear arthrosis, coracoacromial ligament hypertrophy and posttraumatic changes. MRI showed tendinosis in all patients but overestimated it in one case where partial cuff tear was not confirmed surgically--the only false positive in our series. At surgery, all these cases were classified as stage I-II impingement (according to Neer's classification). Finally, MRI was very reliable in the study of bone conditions (osteochondritis), both isolated and associated with cuff tears. The diagnostic accuracy of MRI in the study of the painful shoulder was very high (97%), in agreement with literature data. This is very important because many different causes of shoulder conditions (abnormal tendons, bones and mechanics) may present with similar clinical symptoms. MRI appears as the only imaging method yielding complete and accurate pieces of information in the patients with a painful shoulder.Sonographic detection of tears of the anterior portion of the rotator cuff (subscapularis tendon tears).We studied the value of ultrasonography in identifying tears of the most anterior portion of the rotator cuff (subscapularis tendon tears). Shoulder sonography was performed on 1640 patients with shoulder symptoms, 435 of whom underwent surgery. Among the patients who were operated on, 17 had predominantly or exclusively subscapularis tendon tears; 14 of these were full-thickness and three were partial-thickness tears. Ultrasonography demonstrated 82% (14 of 17) of the subscapularis tendon tears; 86% (12 of 14) of the full-thickness tears and 67% (2 of 3) of the partial-thickness tears were correctly diagnosed with ultrasonography. Sonography can diagnose and show the size of subscapularis tendon tears reliably, but it necessitates that the arm can be externally rotated to the maximum extent when performing the study.Correlation of MR imaging, CT arthrography, and arthroscopy of the shoulder.Rotator cuff tears and instability of the glenohumeral joint are a common cause of chronic shoulder pain and disability. Currently CT arthrography is the method of choice to evaluate the extent of osseous and soft tissue abnormalities. This study was undertaken to determine if magnetic resonance imaging was able to depict post-dislocation abnormalities and rotator cuff pathology and if MRI can replace CT arthrography. Sixty four patients, who were operated on for the first time (arthroscopy or arthrotomy) between November 1986 and July 1991, were compared in a blinded fashion with the results of MR imaging in 40 cases and of CT arthrographies in 24 cases. For the evaluation of rotator cuff tears MRI proved to have a sensitivity of 83.3% and an accuracy of 90.3%. Labral pathology was depicted with a sensitivity of 69.2% and an accuracy of 87.1%. In cases involving a Hill-Sachs lesion the sensitivity of MRI was 90% and the accuracy 95%. MR imaging is an accurate method in the evaluation of rotator cuff pathology and to some extent labral abnormalities.[Diagnostic imaging of the shoulder joint in impingement].Accuracy of fat-suppressed MR imaging of the shoulder for detection of partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.US depiction of partial-thickness tear of the rotator cuff.To test previously defined ultrasound (US) criteria for identification of partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff.Before shoulder arthroscopy, 52 patients with shoulder pain for more than 3 months were examined with a 7.5-MHz commercially available linear-array transducer and a standardized study protocol. The criteria used to detect partial-thickness tears were (a) a mixed hyper- and hypoechoic focus in the crucial zone of the supraspinatus tendon and (b) a hypoechoic lesion visualized in two orthogonal imaging planes with either articular or bursal extension.The US findings were reported as partial-thickness tears in 17 shoulders, of which three were false-positive findings. There was one false-negative finding. The sensitivity of US in depiction of partial-thickness tears was 93%, and specificity was 94%. The positive predictive value was 82%, and the negative predictive value was 98%.US can depict most partial-thickness tears with use of the criteria described.Effect of field of view on MR diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.To determine the effect of decreasing the field of view (FOV) on the accuracy of MR for diagnosing rotator cuff tears.One hundred shoulder MR scans with surgical correlation were evaluated for the presence or absence of a cuff tear. The sensitivity and specificity of MR relative to the surgical results were determined for the 59 patients scanned with a 24-cm FOV, and the 41 patients scanned with an 18-cm FOV. All other imaging parameters including acquisition time were identical. The sensitivity and specificity of the two groups were compared using a t-test.The specificity of MR for diagnosing a rotator cuff tear improved from 0.65 for the 24-cm FOV group to 0.89 for the 18-cm FOV group (P = 0.04). The sensitivity changed from 0.91 to 0.96 (P = 0.25).Reducing the FOV from 24 cm to 18 cm results in a statistically significant improvement in specificity of MR for diagnosing rotator cuff tears.Acute traumatic tears of the rotator cuff: value of sonography.To determine the value of sonography in the evaluation of acute traumatic tears of the rotator cuff.Preoperative sonography was performed within 3 weeks of trauma in 184 patients, 98 of whom underwent surgery. The rotator cuff tears were preoperatively classified as partial-thickness tears or as small, large, or massive full-thickness tears. Sonographic findings were correlated with surgical findings (n = 70) and arthroscopic inspection (n = 28).Adequate examination was possible in 163 (88%) of 184 patients. Sonography demonstrated 42 (91%) of 46 full-thickness tears and seven (78%) of nine partial-thickness tears. Sonography showed more extensive tears than were found at surgery in four (4%) of 98 patients and less extensive tears in seven (7%) of 98 patients. Sonographic patterns were a defect (31 [63%] of 49 tears), focal thinning (10 [21%] of 49 tears), and nonvisualization (eight [16%] of 49 tears).Sonography is useful in the evaluation of acute shoulder trauma when a rotator cuff tear is suspected and findings at plain radiography are negative.Association of sonographically detected subacromial/subdeltoid bursal effusion and intraarticular fluid with rotator cuff tear.Although an association between sonographically detected joint fluid and rotator cuff disease has been reported, the significance of sonographically detected subacromial/subdeltoid bursal effusion has not been studied. We examined a group of patients who had shoulder sonography and surgery to determine the association between bursal and joint effusion and surgically proved tears of the rotator cuff.We retrospectively reviewed the preoperative shoulder sonography reports of 163 patients for the presence of fluid within the subacromial/subdeltoid bursa or glenohumeral joint. Surgical reports were obtained to determine the status of the rotator cuff. The sonographic reports of 232 asymptomatic shoulders were also reviewed to determine the prevalence of fluid within the subacromial/subdeltoid bursa or the glenohumeral joint.Sixty-seven (41%) of the 163 patients had a joint effusion, bursal fluid, or both. Joint effusion alone was seen in 35 patients. Fourteen of these had a normal rotator cuff at surgery, and 21 had a rotator cuff tear (sensitivity, 22%; specificity, 79%; positive predictive value, 60%). Bursal fluid alone was seen in 10 patients, seven of whom had a rotator cuff tear (sensitivity, 7%; specificity, 96%; positive predictive value, 70%). In 22 patients, fluid was seen in both the bursa and the joint; 21 had surgically proved rotator cuff tears (sensitivity, 22%; specificity, 99%; positive predictive value, 95%). Of the 232 asymptomatic shoulders, 16 (6.9%) had isolated joint effusions, eight (3.4%) had isolated bursal effusions, and four (1.7%) had both joint and bursal effusions.The sonographic finding of intraarticular fluid alone (without bursal fluid) has both a low sensitivity and a low specificity for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. However, the finding of fluid in the subacromial/subdeltoid bursa, especially when combined with a joint effusion, is highly specific and has a high positive predictive value for associated rotator cuff tears. Sonographically detected fluid in both the joint and the bursa is an uncommon finding in asymptomatic shoulders. The sonographic observation of fluid in the subacromial bursa, either isolated or combined with a joint effusion, should prompt a careful evaluation of the supraspinatus tendon for tear.MR diagnosis of rotator cuff tears of the shoulder: value of using T2-weighted fat-saturated images.The purpose of this study was to compare the use of fat-saturated T2-weighted spin-echo MR imaging with that of conventional T2-weighted spin-echo MR imaging to detect full- and partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff of the shoulder, using arthroscopy as the standard for the diagnosis.Forty-nine consecutive patients with shoulder pain who had both MR imaging and arthroscopy of their affected shoulders were studied. The study group consisted of 10 patients with full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff, 20 with partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff, and 19 with intact rotator cuff tendons proved arthroscopically. All patients had T1-weighted, conventional T2-weighted, and fat-saturated T2-weighted MR images obtained in a plane slightly oblique to the coronal plane along the long axis of the supraspinous tendon. The images were divided into two sets, one including both T1-weighted and conventional T2-weighted images, the other including T1-weighted and fat-saturated T2-weighted images. Two musculoskeletal radiologists reviewed each set of MR images in a blinded fashion. The reviewers were asked to decide whether the rotator cuff showed a full-thickness tear, a partial-thickness tear, or no tear on each set of images. In the case of partial-thickness tears, the reviewers were asked to indicate which surface (bursal or joint) of the rotator cuff was affected. These data were correlated with the arthroscopic findings and with each other using McNemar and kappa analysis.Detection of full-thickness tears was excellent for both reviewers using either imaging technique. However, when the fat-saturated technique was used, the sensitivity increased significantly, from 80% to 100%. Detection of partial-thickness tears was poor with conventional spin-echo MR imaging (15%). Although significantly improved when fat saturation was used (35%), detection rates were still lower than rates reported in the literature. Identification of the torn surface of the rotator cuff was correct in 50% of cases in which partial-thickness tears were successfully identified. Fat saturation decreased the specificity of identification of both partial and full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff but significantly increased the specificity with which intact rotator cuffs were identified.Use of the fat-saturation technique improved detection of both full-thickness and partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff on MR images compared with standard spin-echo imaging techniques. Despite this improvement, detection of partial-thickness tears was poor with both techniques. Furthermore, correct identification of which surface of the rotator cuff was torn in patients with partial tears was nearly random.Rotator cuff tendon tears: evaluation with fat-suppressed MR imaging with arthroscopic correlation in 100 patients.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of fat-suppressed magnetic resonance (MR) imaging of rotator cuff tears in a large symptomatic population.One hundred patients underwent both MR imaging and arthroscopy of the shoulder. Ninety-two patients underwent fat-suppressed conventional spin-echo MR imaging (repetition time msec/echo time msec = 2,500/20, 60), and eight patients underwent fat-suppressed, fast spin-echo MR imaging (2,000/80).With data combined for complete and partial tears of the rotator cuff (n = 31), MR imaging had an accuracy of 93%; sensitivity, 84%; and specificity, 97%. Seventeen of 20 complete tears and nine of 11 partial tears were properly identified with MR imaging. Two partial tears were not detected and three complete tears were incorrectly called partial tears at MR imaging. Of two false-positive MR imaging findings, one was called a complete tear and the other, a partial tear.Fat-suppressed MR imaging has high diagnostic accuracy in evaluating tears of the rotator cuff tendon.[Chronic shoulder pain. Ultrasonography versus surgery].This work was aimed at investigating US reliability in the diagnosis of rotator cuff lesions. A series of 554 patients with a chronically painful shoulder submitted to US was retrospectively reviewed to search for any possible rotator cuff lesion. US demonstrated total or partial cuff tears in 82 potentially surgical patients (14.8%) Then, in this group, the occurrence of every US sign was investigated. Cuff disappearance was observed in 42 patients (51.2%), convexity loss in 20 (24.4%), cuff thinning in 17 (20.75%) and focal discontinuity in 3 patients only (3.7%). In the second part of the study, we considered only 33 surgical patients. Surgery confirmed cuff tears in 30 patients (90.9%), whereas in 3 false-positive patients US had overestimated focal hyperechoic areas and tendon thinning. Thus, our study confirms the almost absolute sensitivity of some US signs of cuff lesions, e.g., cuff disappearance and convexity loss, in the screening of the patients with a chronically painful shoulder. On the contrary, when focal hyperechoic lesions or tendon thinning are present and US poorly demonstrates them, potentially surgical patients must be submitted to MRI.Rotator cuff disorders: interobserver and intraobserver variation in diagnosis with MR imaging.To determine interobserver and intraobserver variation in the interpretation of magnetic resonance (MR) images in rotator cuff disorders.MR images of the shoulder in 97 patients were retrospectively reviewed twice, with a 3-week interval. Surgical findings indicated a full-thickness tear in 29 patients, grade 1 impingement in 19 (tendinitis), and grade 2 impingement (partial tear) in 26. The control population comprised 23 asymptomatic volunteers or patients.All observers were accurate in the diagnosis of a full-thickness tear (89%-98%), with good intraobserver (kappa = 0.67-0.84) and interobserver agreement (kappa = 0.74-0.92). In diagnoses of tendinitis, partial tear, and normal cuff, there were wide ranges of sensitivity (13%-74%) and specificity (72%-93%), as well as poor interobserver (kappa = 0.12-0.60) and intraobserver agreement (kappa = 0.35-0.78).Full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff can be accurately identified at MR imaging with little observer variation. Consistent differentiation of normal rotator cuff, tendinitis, and partial thickness tears is more difficult.[Ultrasonography of the tendons of the rotator cuffs of the shoulder].After a short review of the use of ultrasonography to study shoulder rotator tendons, the technique of the investigation is described, as well as the main landmarks, findings indicative of complete rotator cuff tear, and limitations of ultrasonography in this indication. A number of issues concerning the preoperative workup are discussed. Results in a prospective study of 100 patients are reported. Findings upon ultrasonography, arthrography, and surgical exploration in these patients are analyzed comparatively. Sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tear (RCT) were 95% and 100%, respectively. These data show that ultrasonography is a reliable investigation for confirming, detecting, and evaluating RCT, although extensive experience with the technique is required.[The value of MRI in the evaluation of lesions of the supraspinous muscle. Multicentric retrospective study of 66 records].[Lesions of the rotatory cuff: diagnostic validity of echography. Surgical findings].Ultrasonography is the method of choice in the study of rotator cuff tears, a very frequent event especially as the final outcome of the impingement syndrome. The authors investigated US sensitivity with the retrospective review of 20 surgical patients with a chronically painful shoulder. US sensitivity was 85%, with 15% false-negative results. Seventeen true-positive cases were restudied for the three main US signs of cuff tear: marked tendon thinning was observed in 64.7% of cases, cuff disappearance in 23.5% and focal discontinuity in 11.8%. This retrospective study confirms that, whenever US shows a cuff tear, the diagnosis can be made, while when US findings are negative or questionable, but clinics are positive, MRI must be performed.[Rotator cuff rupture in the shoulder impingement syndrome. Echography and arthrography: 2 diagnostic methods compared].After briefly reviewing the shoulder impingement syndrome, the authors investigate the role of two diagnostic imaging methods, i.e., ultrasonography (US) and arthrography, in demonstrating the typical features of this condition. Over a 15 months' period, 190 patients suffering from shoulder pain were examined with arthrography; 50 of them subsequently underwent acromion plastic surgery and rotator cuff stitching. This study was aimed at comparing US and arthrographic results, applying classifiable criteria to make the most accurate diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. The lack of visibility of the rotator cuff at US was the major and clearest sign of tear (100% of cases). The association between cuff thinning and hypo/hyperechoic damaged focal areas was another major sign (in 76.19% of complete tears and in 14.28% of incomplete tears). Hyperechoic focal areas alone proved to be a false-positive finding in 5 cases, while in 11 of 19 cases normal US patterns were a false-negative finding; in 3 cases other conditions were diagnosed. To conclude, the value of US is emphasized in the screening of the painful shoulder and the use of arthrography is suggested when both clinical tests and US fail to yield enough information for a diagnosis to be made.Imaging options for suspected rotator cuff disorder.Diagnosis of partial and complete rotator cuff tears using combined gradient echo and spin echo imaging.Most magnetic resonance (MR) studies evaluating the rotator cuff for tears have used T2-weighted imaging in the coronal oblique and sagittal oblique planes. T2*-weighted gradient echo imaging, however, has advantages over spin echo imaging, including contiguous slices without cross-talk, high contrast around the cuff, and intrinsically shorter imaging times which can be used to increase the number of signals averaged and thus improve the signal-to-noise ratio. We reviewed the shoulder MR scans of 87 consecutive patients who underwent both a MR scan and a shoulder arthroscopy during which the size of tears, if present, was graded. The reviewers were blinded as to the history and arthroscopic results. The MR scans included oblique coronal T2*-weighted gradient echo and oblique sagittal T2-weighted spin echo images. MR cuff grades were correlated with arthroscopic findings. For complete tears, the sensitivity of MR was 0.91 and the specificity 0.95. For partial tears, the sensitivity was 0.74 and the specificity 0.87. This accuracy is similar to two-plane T2-weighted imaging as previously reported in the literature. There was a statistically significant correlation (p < 0.0005) between the cuff grade as determined by MR and the arthroscopic findings.Isolated subacromial bursal fluid on MRI of the shoulder in symptomatic patients: correlation with arthroscopic findings.Fluid in the subacromial bursa (SAB) is a common finding on magnetic resonance (MR) images of the shoulder, and the implications of this finding have not been clarified. We retrospectively reviewed and correlated the MR features with arthroscopic findings in 21 symptomatic patients who had fluid in the SAB on MR imaging without demonstrable rotator cuff tear. Rotator cuff impingement was the most frequent surgical finding (42.9%). Other frequent surgical observations were glenoid labrum abnormality (28.6%), bursitis (19%), and supraspinatus tendinitis (14.3%). Distribution of acromial types was similar to that reported by Bigliani et al., and impingement was evenly distributed among acromial types in our study population. We conclude that in our patient population group the MR finding of isolated SAB fluid in symptomatic patients is highly likely to be associated with the finding of other abnormalities in the shoulder joint at surgery.MR arthrographic depiction of tears of the rotator cuff: benefit of abduction and external rotation of the arm.To show the effectiveness of positioning the arm in abduction and external rotation (ABER) during magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography for depiction of tears of the rotator cuff.Five throwing athletes with shoulder pain were prospectively imaged with standard MR imaging, MR arthrography, and ABER MR arthrography. The status of the rotator cuff was recorded; arthroscopic correlation was obtained.One partial tear of the distal infraspinatus tendon was detected with ABER MR arthrography only. One full-thickness tear was detected with both MR arthrography and ABER MR arthrography, but the component of the tear that extended into the infraspinatus tendon was depicted with ABER MR arthrography only. One partial tear was detected with both MR arthrography and ABER MR arthrography; no additional information was provided by either technique alone.The ABER position may be useful in detection and characterization of tears of the rotator cuff, especially partial tears of the undersurface. This information would be useful in selection of patients for conservative therapy, arthroscopy, or arthrotomy.What is the significance on increased signal within the rotator cuff on T2-weighted images in the coronal oblique plane?Is shoulder arthrography considered an acceptable alternative to MR imaging in the evaluation of rotator cuff tears?Intraarticular findings in the chronically painful shoulder. A study of 32 posttraumatic cases.32 consecutive patients suffering from chronic shoulder pain for more than 6 months after a single, nondislocating shoulder trauma were examined clinically and by special radiographs, dynamic sonography, MRI and arthroscopy. Typical complaints were pain during loading, especially during over the head activities. Symptoms of a "dead arm" and instability were also present. Patients with previous dislocations, traumas or radiographic signs of degenerative shoulder lesions were excluded. The patients had a decreased active range of motion and positive signs of apprehension and impingement, but only 4 had clinical signs of shoulder instability. Diagnostic evaluation identified labral tears, partial and total rotator cuff lesions with subacromial impingement and tendinitis of the biceps tendon. Surgery was performed in 24 patients, using capsulolabral and rotator cuff reconstruction, arthroscopic labral resection and open subacromial decompression. In conclusion, patients with chronic posttraumatic shoulder pain have intraarticular injuries, especially tears of the glenoid labrum. History, clinical findings, radiography and sonography are seldom diagnostic. MRI is valuable, particularly for identification of labral pathology, but arthroscopy appears necessary for a preoperative assessment.Ultrasonography and arthrography in the diagnosis of tears of the rotator cuff.The accuracy of ultrasonography and arthrography in the prediction of lesions of the rotator cuff was evaluated and compared with the operative findings in a retrospective study of forty-nine patients (forty-nine shoulders). In the detection of full-thickness (stage-III) tears of the rotator cuff, ultrasonography had an over-all sensitivity of 74 per cent, a specificity of 95 per cent, an accuracy of 84 per cent, a predictive value of a positive test of 95 per cent, and a predictive value of a negative test of 75 per cent. In contrast, arthrography demonstrated a sensitivity of 93 per cent, a specificity of 95 per cent, an accuracy of 94 per cent, a predictive value of a positive test of 96 per cent, and a predictive value of a negative test of 91 per cent. Ultrasonography could not reliably differentiate between partial (stage-II) and full-thickness (stage-III) tears. Lesions of the long head of the biceps brachii tendon were recorded by ultrasonography for twenty-two patients (45 per cent) and by arthrography for eleven patients (22 per cent). The ultrasonographic finding of fluid in the sheath of this tendon is not a reliable sign of a lesion in the tendon.Magnetic resonance imaging of rotator cuff lesions.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in rotator cuff diseases. Forty consecutive patients studied by MRI from September 1990 to September 1992 were included in the study. MRI was performed on a 1.5 tesla MR scanner. Each MRI study was reviewed by two radiologists experienced in rotator cuff tendons. The MRI finding was compared with the surgical result. MRI sensitivity for all tears (partial and complete) was 1.0 (22/22), specificity 0.89 (16/18), accuracy rate 0.95 (38/40), and the predictive value 0.92 (22/24). Signal changes of the rotator cuff tendon (primary signs) were the most reliable criteria in diagnosis of the tear. Changes of subacromial and subdeltoid fat planes and bursa (secondary signs) were complimentary when primary signs were indeterminant. The direction of the long axis of abnormal signal intensity in the rotator cuff tendon may be a good indicator when differentiating tears from tendinitis. We conclude that MRI shows excellent performance in the determination of the presence or absence of a rotator cuff tear.Correlation between MRI and operative findings of the rotator cuff tear.Rotator cuff disease is one of the most common causes of shoulder pain. Various methods have been used to evaluate this problem. In this study, we determine the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the shoulder in diagnosing the rotator cuff tear based on operative findings. Ten patients with a painful shoulder requiring operation received an MRI of the shoulder before surgery. A GE 1.5 Tesla MR scanner with a five-inch planar surface coil was applied and the diagnosis was confirmed by an experienced radiologist in the field of musculoskeletal MRI. All patients underwent surgery within two weeks of MRI examination. Nine of the 10 patients were shown to have rotator cuff tear by MRI. Among the nine MRI positive patients, eight were proven to have such lesions on operation (two massive tears, four moderate complete tears, and two bursal side tears). One false-positive result was found to be an adhesive capsulitis and supraspinatus tendinitis at operation. The remaining case, diagnosed as tendinitis by MRI, turned out to be a small incomplete tear on operation. Therefore, the sensitivity of MRI for rotator cuff tear in this study was 0.89. The overall accuracy was 80%. We concluded that MRI has a high accuracy in detecting the rotator cuff tear. False-positive and false-negative diagnoses were attributed to a severe tendinitis and an incomplete tear, respectively.Magnetic resonance imaging studies of the shoulder: diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff.Diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance imaging for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears using supplemental images in the oblique sagittal plane.The authors evaluated the diagnostic utility of supplemental imaging in the oblique sagittal (OS) plane for the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Two radiologists with varying levels of MRI experience blindly reviewed shoulder MR examinations of 50 patients for rotator cuff tears. Shoulder examinations were interpreted twice, initially using only double-echo spin-echo images obtained in the oblique coronal (OC) plane and later using double-echo spin-echo images obtained in the both the OC and OS planes. Tears were characterized according to size, location, and extent, and levels of diagnostic confidence were evaluated.Sensitivity and specificity of MR for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tear was 85% and 80%, respectively, with the OC series increasing to 95% and 93%, respectively with OCOS scans. However, these increases were not statistically significant. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves suggest a trend toward increased diagnostic confidence when supplemental OS scans are available, especially for the less experienced reader. Characterization of rotator cuff tears was not improved with additional OS images.Supplemental OS scans did not demonstrate a definite improvement in diagnostic accuracy for rotator cuff tears compared to OC scans alone. Estimations based on sample size calculations indicate that a much larger population of patients would be needed to show a statistically significant difference.Rotator cuff: evaluation with fat-suppressed MR arthrography.Thirty-seven shoulders with rotator cuff diagnoses proved at arthrography, arthroscopy, or open surgery were examined prospectively with magnetic resonance (MR) arthrography. T1-weighted MR images were obtained with and without fat suppression after intraarticular injection of gadopentetate dimeglumine. Without fat suppression, overall accuracy was 84%. False-positive full-thickness tears were diagnosed in three patients who were proved to have partial tears. False-negative normal tendons were diagnosed in two patients who had partial tears. The corresponding sensitivity and specificity were 90% and 75%, respectively. With the aid of fat-suppressed imaging, full-thickness and partial cuff tears were identified with 100% sensitivity and specificity. Fat-suppressed images also showed intratendinous contrast material imbibition in three torn cuffs with frayed, friable tendon margins. Fat suppression in MR arthrography is valuable in the differentiation of partial from full-thickness cuff tears and in the detection of small partial tears of the inferior tendon surface.Magnetic resonance-imaging studies of the shoulder. Diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff.[MRI in the pre-operative evaluation of lesions of the rotator cuff].The authors report a series of 38 patients who had been examined by MRI and then operated for a rotator cuff syndrome. The correlation between the description of the cuff lesions after MRI and the surgical observations were excellent for 37 patients. In one case MRI showed a false image of tear of the supra spinatus m. on its anterior edge. This was due to a bad knowledge of the anatomy of the muscle and tendon and to a poor orientation of the frontal cut plane. This study was complete with MRI and anatomic study of 12 non embalmed cadaveric shoulders. The results showed that MRI was very sensitive (0.93) and specific (0.94) for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. MRI allowed also to show partial tears of the tendons of the rotator cuff. The authors propose a MRI classification of cuff lesions which permits to establish a good surgical planning.Sonography of the shoulder in patients with tears of the rotator cuff: accuracy and value for selecting surgical options.The management of patients with signs and symptoms referable to the rotator cuff depends on the presence of cuff injury and the size of the tear. Treatment options include conservative nonsurgical management for patients with an intact or partially torn cuff, arthroscopic decompression of the coracoacromial space for those not responding to nonsurgical management, and a range of surgical techniques to repair full-thickness tears. This study was designed to determine whether sonographic evaluation with classification of the extent of cuff injury is accurate for purposes of treatment planning.Preoperative sonography of the rotator cuff was performed on 225 patients, and findings were classified into intact, partial tear, small full-thickness tear, large full-thickness tear, and massive tear groups. Surgical correlation with the predicted sonographic classification was provided by arthroscopic inspection or open surgery.The sonographic findings were surgically confirmed for 206 (92%) of the 225 patients. More extensive cuff injury was encountered during surgery than had been predicted sonographically in 11 patients (5%); less extensive injury than predicted was found during surgery in eight patients (4%).Our results show a high correlation between the sonographic classification of rotator cuff injury and the surgical findings. The selection of appropriate treatment programs can be reliably based on the sonographic classification.[Possibilities of shoulder arthroscopy in comparison with magnetic resonance tomography and arthro-computerized tomography].In the last 15 years the methods of examination of the shoulder have intensively expounded. According to a well documented retrospective study we describe the value of the shoulder arthroscopy and its correlation to MRI and arthro-CT findings. MRI represents nowadays the best way of exploring rotator cuff lesions and of investigating an impingement syndrome. Associated with a contrast medium its ability to clear up an anterior or posterior shoulder instability is now superior to the arthro-CT's. The arthroscopy allows the dynamic exploration of the joint and can be used not only as a diagnostic but also as a therapeutic procedure.Fat-suppression MR arthrography of the shoulder.[Arthroscopy and MRT of the shoulder--a comparative retrospective analysis].MR Imaging is proving to an effective means for evaluating the shoulder. The use of a surface coil and high resolution scanning techniques have allowed detailed analysis of normal anatomy and suspected pathology of the shoulder. On the other way arthroscopic inspection provides a more extensive visualization of the joint in different positions. 31 patients, well documented, were studied with MR Imaging and correlated with findings in arthroscopy and open revision in some cases. The MR studies were retrospective interpreted without the knowledge of the results of other diagnostic procedures. For the evaluation of rotator cuff tears MRI proved to have a sensitivity of 83.3% and an accuracy of 90.3%. When Arthroscopy was correlated with open revision the sensitivity was 61.8% and the accuracy 78%. Labral pathology and Hill-Sachs lesions will be better evaluated in arthroscopy as in MRI (sensitivity of arthroscopy 100% and of MRI 69%, accuracy of arthroscopy 100% and of MRI 87.1%). With the high resolution scanning technique and a surface coil MRI has been shown to be useful in the evaluation of rotator cuff tears and impingement syndrome but not in diagnosis of labral pathology and Hill-Sachs lesions.Full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff of the shoulder: diagnosis with MR imaging.The purpose of this study was to describe MR findings in full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff. Of 102 shoulders examined by MR imaging, 31 were found to have a full-thickness tendon tear at arthroscopy/bursoscopy (five shoulders) or open surgery (26 shoulders). All shoulders were imaged in oblique coronal and axial planes. MR images of the 102 shoulders were evaluated for (1) the presence of fluid in the subacromial and subdeltoid bursae; (2) abnormal signal of the supraspinatus, subscapularis, infraspinatus, and teres minor tendons; (3) interruption of tendon continuity and thinning of the tendon; and (4) proximal retraction of the junction of the muscle and tendon. The presence or absence of each finding was determined by consensus of two radiologists, who interpreted the images without knowledge of the surgical findings. Results in those 31 shoulders with proved full-thickness tears were: fluid in the subacromial bursae (29 shoulders), interruption of tendinous continuity (22 shoulders), focally increased signal of the tendon equivalent to that of water (27 shoulders), and musculotendinous retraction (24 shoulders). The finding of subacromial fluid was a sensitive indicator (93%) of a full-thickness tear, and interruption of tendinous continuity was a specific finding (96%) in diagnosing a full-thickness tear. Our experience shows interruption of tendon continuity is the most specific MR finding of full-thickness rotator cuff tears, while subacromial fluid is the most common finding.Rotator cuff disease: assessment with MR arthrography versus standard MR imaging in 36 patients with arthroscopic confirmation.Standard proton-density- and T2-weighted magnetic resonance (MR) imaging and MR arthrography were used to depict rotator cuff disease in 36 shoulders in 36 patients; the findings were compared with arthroscopic findings in every patient. In 19 rotator cuffs normal at arthroscopy, MR arthrography revealed no tear in 16 patients, a partial tear in one patient, and a full-thickness tear in two patients. Standard proton-density- and T2-weighted images were normal in 15 of these patients and revealed a partial tear in two patients and a full-thickness tear in two patients. In 13 partial tears found at arthroscopy, MR arthrography showed a partial tear in six patients, no tear in five patients, and a full-thickness tear in two patients; standard MR imaging revealed a partial tear in one patient, no tear in 10 patients, and a full-thickness tear in two patients. All four full-thickness tears proved with arthroscopy were correctly diagnosed with both MR imaging methods. The main advantage of MR arthrography was better depiction of partial tears in the articular surface.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder joint.Because the shoulder is the most mobile joint in the body, it is naturally predisposed to several disorders. The most commonly encountered disorders requiring diagnostic imaging are rotator cuff disease and glenohumeral instability. Plain film radiography and arthrography have for many years been the mainstays of shoulder imaging. CT added a third dimension to shoulder imaging, improving its sensitivity with respect to glenoid labral pathology. Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff showed early promise in noninvasive evaluation of cuff tears, but it did not gain universal acceptance because of various negative factors, including inadequate visualization of the cuff, poor results regarding partial tears, and most importantly, operator dependency. The development of MR imaging afforded the radiologist improved comprehensive visualization of the shoulder joint in a noninvasive manner.[Contribution of gradient-echo MRI in the study of subacromial pathology: correlation between surgery and arthrography].30 asymptomatic volunteer subjects and more than 400 patients with suspected rotator cuff lesions were examined by MRI at 0.5 T using T2*-PD weighted gradient echo (T2-GEI) sequences. Its superiority over T2 spin echo imaging was established in previous studies. The results were compared to those of surgery in 87 cases and arthrography in 233 cases (associated with CT arthrography in 70 cases). In the operated patients, T2-GEI and arthrography correctly diagnosed 49 complete ruptures (CR). T2-GEI was found to be superior to arthrography for defining the real extent of the rupture, the degree of tendon retraction and the local muscular trophicity, essential information to define the therapeutic indications. In contrast, among 22 lesions of the long biceps tendon, correctly demonstrated by arthrography or CT arthrography, 5 intracapsular lesions were not detected by MRI. MRI was able to detect 8 lesions of the anterior labrum associated with a CR not demonstrated by arthrography. Lastly, among the 18 cases of partial inferior rupture (PIR), 6 partial superficial ruptures and 14 cases of inflammatory changes, correctly diagnosed by MRI, only 8 PIR were also demonstrated by arthrography. For the non-operated patients investigated by the two modalities (146 cases), T2-GEI and arthrography were concordant in 43 cases. In contrast, 103 intact cuffs on arthrography showed features on T2-GEI compatible with tendinopathy without rupture, bursitis and degenerative changes. In the absence of very fine surgical or histological correlations for these small lesions, it is impossible, at the present time, to determine the real sensitivity and specificity of MRI.[Ultrasonography of the shoulder: diagnosis of rupture of tendons of the rotator muscles].After a short historical review of the use of ultrasonography to study shoulder rotator tendons, the technique of the investigation is described, as well as the main landmarks, findings indicative of complete rotator cuff tear, and limitations of ultrasonography in this indication. A number of issues concerning the preoperative workup are discussed. Results in a prospective study of 24 patients are reported. Findings upon ultrasonography, arthrography, and surgical exploration in these patients are analyzed comparatively. Sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tear (RCT) were 95% and 100%, respectively. These data show that ultrasonography is a reliable investigation for confirming, detecting, and evaluating RCT, although extensive experience with the technique is required.Sonography for diagnosis of rotator cuff tear. Comparison with observations at surgery in 58 shoulders.To investigate the correlation between ultrasonographic and anatomic changes of the rotator cuff of the shoulder, we studied the findings in 58 surgical cases. Fifteen cases had a full thickness tear, 10 of which had a positive and 5 a negative ultrasonogram. Nine cases had partial tears of the cuff on the bursal side. Ultrasonographically, 3 of these were normal. Among the 34 cases that proved to be normal at surgery, 9 had positive ultrasonograms. The predictive value of a negative examination was 0.8, whereas the predictive value of a positive examination was 0.6. A cautious attitude towards ultrasonography for evaluation of the rotator cuff seems appropriate.Effect of arm rotation on MR imaging of the rotator cuff.The effect of humeral rotation on the appearance of the rotator cuff tendon in oblique coronal magnetic resonance images was evaluated in 70 such images. Internal rotation produced overlap of the supraspinatus and infraspinatus tendons with soft-tissue interposition or apparent discontinuity of the tendon in 22 cases, including 14 of 15 shoulders positioned in the first 30 degrees between extreme internal and external rotation. Imaging in internal rotation makes assessment of the tendon difficult and should be avoided.Imaging evaluation of rotator cuff tears.Evaluation of the painful shoulder. A prospective comparison of magnetic resonance imaging, computerized tomographic arthrography, ultrasonography, and operative findings.Twenty-one patients who had had pain in the shoulder for more than three months were evaluated with ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging followed by computerized tomographic arthrography. The results of the imaging studies were then compared with the operative findings. Magnetic resonance imaging was found to be the most useful modality for establishment of the etiology of pain in the shoulder due to disease of the rotator cuff, instability associated with abnormality of the glenoid labrum, subacromial impingement, stenosis of the coracoacromial arch, and osteoarthrosis of either the glenohumeral or the acromioclavicular joint. The accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging was found to depend on both the operator and the technique and was decreased in extremely obese patients, due to difficulties in positioning, and in patients who had had a previous operation. Magnetic resonance imaging was more accurate than either computerized tomographic arthrography or ultrasonography in identifying partial-thickness tears (intrasubstance changes in the rotator cuff). Magnetic resonance imaging provided the same level of accuracy as computerized tomographic arthrography in the detection of abnormalities of the glenoid labrum.Evaluation of degenerative lesions of the rotator cuff. A comparison of arthrography and ultrasonography.A prospective study was performed to determine the accuracy of arthrography compared with ultrasonography in the evaluation of thirty-two patients who had a degenerative lesion of the rotator cuff. Both tests were done preoperatively, and the condition of the rotator cuff was determined intraoperatively. Arthrography was accurate in the diagnosis of twenty-eight (87 per cent) of the thirty-two patients (twenty who had a full-thickness tear, seven who had a partial-thickness tear, and five who had an untorn rotator cuff and tendinitis), while ultrasonography was diagnostic in only twelve (37 per cent). In this specific population of patients, arthrography was found to be superior to ultrasonography.Magnetic resonance imaging of the shoulder. Sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value.The sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value of magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff, glenohumeral capsule, and glenoid labrum were evaluated in ninety-one patients and fifteen asymptomatic volunteers. Magnetic resonance imaging demonstrated 100 per cent sensitivity and 95 per cent specificity in the diagnosis of complete tears, and it consistently predicted the size of the tear of the rotator cuff. There was a definite correlation between atrophy of the supraspinatus muscle and the size of a complete, chronic tear of the rotator cuff. The sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance imaging in the differentiation of tendinitis from degeneration of the cuff were 82 and 85 per cent, and in the differentiation of a normal tendon from one affected by tendinitis with signs of impingement the sensitivity and specificity were 93 and 87 per cent. The formation of spurs around the acromion and acromiocalvicular joint correlated highly with increased age of the patient and with chronic disease of the rotator cuff. The sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of labral tears associated with glenohumeral instability were 88 and 93 per cent. The study showed that high-resolution magnetic-resonance imaging is an excellent non-invasive tool in the diagnosis of lesions of the rotator cuff and glenohumeral instability.MRI and ultrasound evaluation of the shoulder.[Contribution of echogradient magnetic resonance imaging in the study of subacromial diseases. Surgical and arthrographic correlations].Fifteen asymptomatic volunteers and 300 patients with suspected lesions of the rotator cuff were examined with T2*- and proton density-weighted gradient echo (T2*-Rho-GEI) MRI sequences (500-700 ms/30 ms/30 degrees) with a 0.5 T (GE-CGR) system and an adapted surface coil. For the patients, the findings were compared with those of arthrography in 130 cases and of surgery in 42 cases. For the operated patients, T2*-Rho-GEI and arthrography allowed correctly diagnosing 31 complete ruptures (CR). However, surgical exploration of the ruptures showed that T2*-Rho-GEI showed the actual extent of the rupture and the degree of tendon retraction better than arthrography. T2*-Rho-GEI also provides information about the thickness and trophicity of the remaining cuff and on local muscle trophicity. T2*-Rho-GEI allows directly evaluating the tendon of the long head of the biceps both in its extra-articular and its intra-articular parts. In 3 cases of complete cuff rupture, MRI allowed detecting 3 associated lesions of the anterior labrum, which had not been suspected on the clinical examination and had not been demonstrated by conventional arthrography. Lastly, out of 12 cases of deep incomplete rupture (n = 12) correctly diagnosed with MRI, 5 had been undetected on arthrography. Similarly, 8 cases of inflammatory alterations suspected with T2*-Rho-GEI and confirmed by surgery had not been recognized with arthrography. For the non-operated patients, T2*-Rho-GEI and arthrography had corresponding results for the diagnosis of CR (8 cases), of DIR (6 cases) and of intact cuff (6 cases).(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)[Contribution of MRI to the preoperative evaluation of rotator cuff tears].The authors report a series of 38 patients who had been examined by MRI and then operated for a rotator cuff syndrome. The correlation between the description of the cuff lesions after MRI and the surgical observations were excellent for 37 patients. In one case MRI showed a false image of tear of the supra spinatus m. on its anterior edge. This was due to a bad knowledge of the anatomy of the muscle and tendon and to a poor orientation of the frontal cut plane. This study was completed with MRI and anatomic study of 12 non embalmed cadaveric shoulders. The results showed that MRI was very sensitive (0.93) and specific (0.94) for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. MRI allowed also to show partial tears of the tendons of the rotator cuff. The authors propose a MRI classification of cuff lesions which permits to establish a good surgical planning.Rotator cuff lesions: signal patterns at MR imaging.The signal intensity patterns of rotator cuff lesions at magnetic resonance (MR) imaging were evaluated in 80 patients who had surgical correlation and in 13 asymptomatic individuals (14 shoulders). Six cadaver shoulders were examined with MR, and histologic correlation was obtained in four. All studies were performed at 1.5 T with a flexible circular surface coil. The accuracy of MR imaging in detection of full-thickness cuff tears (31 patients) was 0.95 and of partial thickness tears (16 patients), 0.84. The most common and accurate pattern for full-thickness cuff tears (22 of 31 tears) was a region of intense signal seen on T2-weighted images. Less often the torn region consisted of an extremely degenerated and attenuated tendon with moderate signal intensity or was obscured by low-signal-intensity scar. The intense signal pattern on T2-weighted images was also accurate, although a less common finding (seven of 16 cases), in the diagnosis of partial tears. Tendinitis was recognized as focal or diffuse regions of increased signal intensity or a nonhomogeneous pattern of increased signal often associated with tendinous enlargement. In some patients, manifestations of subacromial-subdeltoid bursitis was present. Tendon degeneration was also manifested as regions of increased signal intensity. Some similarity and overlap of signal patterns of partial interstitial tears, tendinitis, and tendon degeneration are observed.MR arthrography of the shoulder: comparison with conventional MR imaging.Twenty-three patients underwent both conventional MR imaging of the shoulder and MR shoulder arthrography for clinically suspected labral or rotator cuff abnormalities. Images obtained before and after contrast administration were studied independently, and without knowledge of clinical findings, by two radiologists for the presence of abnormalities of the glenoid labrum or rotator cuff. Results were correlated with surgical findings in all patients. Nine patients had surgically proved labral tears. MR arthrography detected all nine labral abnormalities, while six of the nine were missed on conventional MR imaging. Fourteen patients had surgically proved rotator cuff tears. MR arthrography detected 11 of the 14 tears and missed three partial tears on the bursal surface. Conventional MR imaging detected nine cuff tears and missed five tears; two of these were complete rotator cuff tears and three were partial tears of the undersurface of the rotator cuff. Our results suggest that MR arthrography enhances the accuracy of MR in the evaluation of the glenoid labrum and rotator cuff tendon.[MRI in subacromial pathology. Report of 20 cases].The authors report the results of MRI performed in 20 patients presenting clinical symptoms of subacromial pathology. The MRI results are correlated to the results of arthrography or arthro CT scan and also to surgical results. MRI is an excellent technique if a precise protocol with T2 weighted images is respected in order to visualize tears or minor perforations of the supraspinatus muscle.[Magnetic resonance of the shoulder: technic, anatomy ana clinical results].MR imaging was employed in 232 patients with traumatic or degenerative lesions of the shoulder. MR diagnosis was compared with arthrotomic findings in 19 cases, and with arthroscopic results in 3 cases. MR technique is here presented and the choice of scanning planes is discussed, together with the sequences of image acquisition and with the features of the surface coil employed. Axial, sagittal, and coronal scans were used in all cases. Both sagittal and coronal planes were performed obliquely on the basis of precise anatomical structures. T1-weighted sequences were used for they are reliable in locating the various anatomical structures and efficient in defining the several different pathologic conditions. The role of T2-weighted sequences was complementary, and they were employed in selected cases only. A surface coil is presented with a particular configuration of easy clinical use and with such technical features as to allow reduced fields to be imaged, with good spatial resolution. MR imaging could demonstrate with equal accuracy both skeletal-cartilage components and capsulo-ligamentous structures, thus defining associated lesions and small tears. In both degenerative and traumatic lesions of the rotator cuff, MR imaging showed both extent and entity of the pathologic process, with high accuracy in defining the impingement syndrome. MR imaging allowed the depiction of the anterior and posterior glenoid labra, even without intraarticular contrast media. Moreover, MR imaging made it possible to recognize both fractures and degenerative processes within the glenoid labrum on the basis of their signal intensities. This preliminary experience allows the authors to conclude that MR imaging is an accurate and non-invasive diagnostic method for the study of traumatic lesions and of degenerative changes of the shoulder.Rotator cuff sonography: a reassessment.This study is both a retrospective and prospective evaluation of the clinical usefulness of shoulder sonography. Ninety-eight patients suspected of having rotator cuff tears underwent sonography of both shoulders. Sixty-two patients underwent double-contrast arthrography performed on the same day as sonography, and 38 patients underwent surgery after sonography. A comparison of the results from ultrasound and arthrography, using published diagnostic criteria, demonstrated a sensitivity of 75% and a specificity of 43% for detection of a rotator cuff tear. In this study, use of more restricted criteria, a subset of the published criteria, yielded a sensitivity of 68% and a specificity of 90%. A comparison of sonography with surgery, using this study's criteria, demonstrated a sensitivity of 57% and a specificity of 76%. This report shows that shoulder sonography is less reliable than previously reported and appears to have a very limited role in the evaluation of rotator cuff injuries.Rotator cuff tear: clinical experience with sonographic detection.Between June 1986 and April 1988, 86 sonographic examinations of the shoulder were performed on patients suspected of having rotator cuff tears. Major sonographic diagnostic criteria included (a) a well-defined discontinuity usually visible as a hypoechoic focus within the cuff, (b) nonvisualization of the cuff and (c) an echogenic focus within the cuff. Seventy-five patients underwent both sonography and arthrography. Compared with arthrography alone, ultrasound examinations enabled detection of 92% of rotator cuff tears (24 of 26 tears), with a specificity of 84% and a negative predictive value of 95%. Correlation was obtained in 30 of these patients who underwent surgery for rotator cuff tear or other soft-tissue abnormality. In this group, the sensitivity of sonography for detection of a tear was 93%, with a specificity of 73%, while for arthrography sensitivity was 87% and specificity was 100%. These data indicate that sonography is a useful, noninvasive screening procedure for patients suspected of having rotator cuff injury.Rotator cuff tears: diagnostic performance of MR imaging.To determine the diagnostic performance of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in the evaluation of suspected rotator cuff tears, eight asymptomatic volunteers and 32 patients with rotator cuff tendonopathy who underwent surgery were examined with MR imaging. Twenty-four of these patients also underwent contrast arthrography. The ability of MR imaging to depict the size of cuff tears and the quality of torn tendon edges was also evaluated. The MR imaging and arthrographic studies were reviewed without knowledge of surgical results or of the other studies. A scoring system was developed and a score assigned to each patient's MR study. The sensitivity of MR imaging for all tears (partial and full thickness) was 0.91, and the specificity was 0.88; whereas the sensitivity and specificity of arthrography were each 0.71. The scoring system improved the sensitivity to 1.0 and the specificity to 0.92. Linear regression analysis showed excellent correlation between preoperative assessment of the size of rotator cuff tears and measurement at surgery (r = .95).Rotator cuff tears: prospective comparison of MR imaging with arthrography, sonography, and surgery.Thirty-eight patients with suspected rotator cuff tears were examined at 1.5 T by using a loop-gap resonator surface coil. The MR findings were compared prospectively in a blinded fashion with the results from double-contrast arthrography in all 38 patients, high-resolution sonography in 23 patients, and surgery in 16 patients. In the total group of 38 patients, MR imaging detected 22 of 22 tears and 14 of 16 intact cuffs as determined by arthrography. In the 16 surgically proved cases, MR and arthrography showed identical results, with 92% sensitivity in the diagnosis of 12 tears and 100% specificity in the diagnosis of four intact cuffs. In a subgroup of 23 patients, sonography detected nine of 15 tears and seven of eight intact cuffs as determined by comparison with arthrography. In 10 surgically proved cases, sonography was 63% sensitive in the diagnosis of eight rotator cuff tears and 50% specific in the diagnosis of two intact cuffs. For the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears, MR imaging is comparable to arthrography in both sensitivity and specificity. In this study, sonography was not as accurate in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears as were the other two techniques. These results suggest that MR imaging should be considered the noninvasive test of choice for patients with suspected rotator cuff disease.Rotator cuff tears: correlation of sonographic and surgical findings.High-resolution, real-time sonography of the rotator cuff was performed in 51 shoulders, and the results were correlated with findings obtained during subsequent surgery. Prospective sensitivity of sonography in detection of a tear was 100%; specificity, 75%; and accuracy, 92%. Retrospective estimation of tear size on sonograms correlated well with the intraoperative measurements for small and moderate lesions. Large lesions were often underestimated sonographically. Retrospectively, partial tears were correctly diagnosed in seven patients, and bursal thickening was recognized in 17 patients. Sonography of the shoulder proved to be an accurate, noninvasive method for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tears. It is useful for estimating tear size and location and may be useful in recognizing partial tears.MR imaging diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Thirty-one symptomatic patients were studied with MR imaging to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of shoulder MR in the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Correlative studies included arthroscopy in 19 patients and arthrography in 12 patients. Images were obtained on either a 0.5- or 1.5-T Philips superconducting magnet using spin-echo pulse sequences (650-850/30 [TR, TE], 2000/30, 100) with 5-mm slices oriented in an oblique coronal plane perpendicular to the glenohumeral joint. The MR studies were initially interpreted without knowledge of the results of other diagnostic procedures. The MR diagnosis of cuff tear was made when irregularity, discontinuity, and increased signal were identified in the rotator cuff. MR images showed tears in 10 patients (32%) and were negative for tear in 21 patients (68%). MR correlated with arthroscopy and arthrography in 17 of 18 normal patients, in eight of 10 patients with complete tears, and in one of three patients with partial tears. For complete rotator cuff tears, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 80%, 94%, and 89%, respectively. For all tears (partial and complete), the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy were 69%, 94%, and 84%, respectively. These data suggest that MR imaging is an accurate procedure for the diagnosis of complete rotator cuff tears. The number of partial tears (three) in this series is too small to evaluate the value of MR imaging in the diagnosis of partial tears.Ultrasonography of rotator cuff tears: a review of 500 diagnostic studies.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff has been shown to be of value in diagnosing rotator cuff tears. This report summarizes our experience with our first 500 diagnostic examinations. All patients were examined in the hyperextended internal rotation view with commercially available high-resolution real-time ultrasound equipment. Patients were diagnosed as having a rotator cuff tear if a focal echogenic lesion or a defect within the rotator cuff was identified. This study confirmed the value of ultrasonography for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity all exceeded 90%, and correlated with surgical findings. This was better than arthrography in the same patient population. Ultrasound is an accurate noninvasive method of examining the rotator cuff for the presence of tears. We suggest that rotator cuff ultrasonography is the procedure of choice for the diagnosis of tears if adequate instrumentation is available.Value of ultrasonography in preoperative diagnosis of rotator cuff tears and postoperative follow-up.Four hundred and six patients presenting with shoulder pain underwent bilateral shoulder ultrasonography. Rotator cuff lesions were diagnosed in 197 patients. In 155 of the 308 patients who had additional arthrographic examinations, the arthrogram documented rotator cuff tears. Sixty-eight patients underwent surgery. There was good correlation between the ultrasonographic and arthrographic findings as well as the surgical results, with a sensitivity of 91% for each examination technique. Thirty-six postoperative patients were studied ultrasonographically; a minor to marked increase in rotator cuff echogenicity was demonstrated in them all. Its high predictive value makes ultrasonography the method of choice in diagnosing rotator cuff tears. Based on the evaluation of particular criteria, rotator cuff tears (greater than 1 cm) are commonly documented by ultrasonography. Only in patients with indeterminate or negative ultrasonograms in whom there is a high index of clinical suspicion, should arthrography be performed as a complementary imaging test. In postoperative follow-up the degree of scar formation at the reinsertion of the tendon is adequately documented by ultrasonography.Shoulder impingement syndrome: MR findings in 53 shoulders.The shoulder impingement syndrome refers to a condition in which the supraspinatus tendon and subacromial bursa are chronically entrapped between the humeral head inferiorly and either the anterior acromion itself, spurs of the anterior acromion or acromioclavicular joint, or the coracoacromial ligament superiorly. As a result, the space for the bursa and tendon is reduced, and repeated trauma to these structures leads to bursitis and rotator cuff injury. Although pain and limitation of motion are common early findings, the diagnosis is often delayed until a complete tear of the rotator cuff has occurred. In an attempt to determine if MR can be used to depict the abnormalities associated with impingement syndrome (subacromial bursitis, supraspinatus tendinitis, and rotator cuff tear), we reviewed 107 MR scans of painful shoulders. Changes consistent with impingement syndrome were found in 53 patients (50%), 32 of whom underwent subsequent arthrography or surgery. MR was found capable of depicting several soft-tissue and bony abnormalities that have been clinically described in impingement syndrome. In regions of inflammation, we found that the supraspinatus tendon and/or the subacromial bursa were compressed by spurs (25 shoulders), capsular hypertrophy of the acromioclavicular joint (six shoulders), and/or low-lying acromion (14 shoulders). While T1-weighted MR imaging was highly sensitive to abnormalities of the supraspinatus tendon, tendinitis could be differentiated from a small tear of the supraspinatus tendon only with T2-weighted imaging. Large, full-thickness tears, especially if chronic, produced characteristic MR findings on both T1- and T2-weighted images. We conclude that MR can be used to detect several abnormalities associated with the shoulder impingement syndrome.Sonographic evaluation of the rotator cuff: correlation with arthroscopy.High-resolution real-time sonography has been reported as a non-invasive means of evaluating the integrity of the rotator cuff. Fifty-two patients underwent both sonographic and arthroscopic evaluation of the rotator cuff. There were 42 men and 10 women with an average age of 47 years (range 28-71 years). The duration of shoulder pain averaged 24 months (range 3 months to 9 years). Thirty-five rotator cuff tears were noted arthroscopically. Twenty-seven of the tears were diagnosed by sonography for a sensitivity rate of 77%. Eleven of the 17 intact rotator cuffs were normal by sonography for a specificity rate 65%. The overall accuracy of sonography was 73% and the predictive value of a positive sonogram was 82%. Sonography appears to be a good initial screening examination in evaluating the integrity of the rotator cuff. It is noninvasive and relatively inexpensive. Technical limitations of this technique as well as the experience of the radiologist in performing and interpreting the examination play a major role in the accuracy of this test. As instrumentation improves and as experience in using this technique increases, we expect the accuracy of sonography in detecting tears of the rotator cuff to continue to improve.MR imaging of the shoulder: diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.Twenty-five patients with known or suspected tears of the rotator cuff in 26 shoulders underwent MR imaging. All patients also underwent arthrography or surgery. MR visualized abnormalities consistent with a tear in 20 of the 22 tears diagnosed by arthrography or surgery. In most cases, tears were seen as regions of increased signal intensity within the cuff on long-TR pulse sequences, although two cases simply showed an almost complete absence of normal cuff. The MR appearance of the two cases with partial tears was similar to that of full-thickness tears. Of the four cases with normal arthrograms, one case had MR findings consistent with a tear. We conclude that MR has good potential for the noninvasive diagnosis of rotator cuff tears. Its ultimate role in this diagnosis must await prospective studies comparing its accuracy with that of sonography, CT, and arthrography.The hyperextended internal rotation view in rotator cuff ultrasonography.[Sonography of the rotator cuff].[Sonography of the shoulder in rotator cuff defects. Technic and clinical value].[Lesions of the rotator cuff: the specific value of echography].Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff.The authors suggest that sonography may be the best screening study for the diagnosis of rotator cuff tears.US evaluation of the rotator cuff.Ultrasonographic (US) evaluation of the moving shoulder is a new method for evaluating the integrity of the rotator cuff. In the past, contrast arthrography has provided the only nonoperative technique for demonstrating defects in the rotator cuff. We present the details of this new technique and describe 79 patients whose US results were correlated with the findings at arthrography and/or surgery. US allows evaluation of both shoulders at once, an advantage over arthrography, where usually only one side is evaluated at a single sitting. Improvements in US instrumentation, especially the introduction of high-resolution linear-array devices and the use of experienced ultrasonographers, have improved the accuracy of US. Because US is rapid, safe, noninvasive, and inexpensive, we advocate its use instead of arthrography as the routine test of rotator cuff integrity.Ultrasonography of the rotator cuff: surgical correlation.Rotator cuff tears are a common orthopedic problem. The portions of the cuff most commonly torn are accessible to sonographic examination with appropriate positioning of the shoulder. This study was undertaken to correlate the sonographic appearance of the pathologic rotator cuff with findings at the time of surgical repair. Rotator cuff tears are readily seen with high-resolution real-time sonography. Sonography can demonstrate tears not demonstrated arthrographically. In the appropriate clinical setting arthrography may not be necessary if the sonogram demonstrates characteristic findings.